The Project Gutenberg EBook of Fritiofs Saga, by Esaias Tegner

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org


Title: Fritiofs Saga

Author: Esaias Tegner

Posting Date: September 26, 2011 [EBook #8518]
Release Date: July, 2005
[This file was first posted on July 18, 2003]

Language: English


*** START OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK FRITIOFS SAGA ***




Produced by David Starner, Tapio Riikonen and the Online
Distributed Proofreading Team









FRITIOFS SAGA

BY
ESAIAS TEGNÉR

Introduction, Bibliography, Notes, and Vocabulary _Edited by_
ANDREW A. STOMBERG




PREFACE.


Ever since the establishment, many years ago, of courses in Swedish in a
few American colleges and universities the need of Swedish texts,
supplied with vocabularies and explanatory notes after the model of the
numerous excellent German and French editions, has been keenly felt.
This need has become particularly pressing the last three years during
which Swedish has been added to the curricula of a large number of high
schools. The teachers in Swedish in these high schools as well as in
colleges and universities have been greatly handicapped in their work by
the lack of properly edited texts. It is clearly essential to the success
of their endeavor to create an interest in the Swedish language and its
literature, at the same time maintaining standards of scholarship that
are on a level with those maintained by other modern foreign language
departments, that a plentiful and varied supply of text material be
furnished. The present edition of Tegnér's Fritiofs Saga aims to be a
modest contribution to the series of Swedish texts that in the most
recent years have been published in response to this urgent demand.

Sweden has since the days of Tegnér been prolific in the creation of
virile and wholesome literary masterpieces, but Fritiofs Saga by Tegnér
is still quite generally accorded the foremost place among the literary
products of the nation. Tegnér is still hailed as the prince of Swedish
song by an admiring people and Fritiofs Saga remains, in popular
estimation at least, the grand national epic.

Fritiofs Saga has appeared in a larger number of editions than any other
Scandinavian work with the possible exception of Hans Christian
Andersen's Fairy Tales. It has been translated into fourteen European
languages, and the different English translations alone number
approximately twenty. In German the number is almost as high. Several
school editions having explanatory notes have appeared in Swedish and in
1909 Dr. George T. Flom, Professor of Scandinavian Languages and
Literature of the University of Illinois edited a text with introduction,
bibliography and explanatory notes in English, designed for use in
American colleges and universities, but the present edition is the first
one, as far as the editor is aware, to appear with an English vocabulary.

Fritiofs Saga abounds in mythological names and terms, as well as in
idiomatic expressions, and the preparation of the explanatory notes has
therefore been a perplexing task. A fairly complete statement under each
mythological reference would in the aggregate reach the proportions of a
treatise on Norse mythology, but the limitations of space made such
elaboration impossible. While brevity of expression has thus been the
hard rule imposed by the necessity of keeping within bounds, it is hoped
that the notes may nevertheless be found reasonably adequate in
explaining the text. Many mythological names occur frequently and in
different parts of the text, and as constant cross references in the
notes would likely be found monotonous, an effort has been made to
facilitate the matter of consulting and reviewing explanatory statements
for these terms by adding an index table.

It has not been thought necessary or desirable to translate many
idiomatic expressions in the text, as the vocabulary ought to enable the
student, without the assistance of a lavish supply of notes, to get at
the meaning. It would seem that the study of a foreign text would be most
stimulating and invigorating to a student, if he himself be given a
chance to wrestle with difficult sentences.

The introduction that precedes the text makes no pretension of being
anything more than an attempt to state in broad outline the salient facts
in the life of Tegnér and in the genesis and development of the Fritiofs
Saga theme.

The text in the present edition has been modernized to conform with the
orthography officially adopted in Sweden in 1906.

This new edition of the great masterpiece is accompanied by the editor's
sincere hope that it may in a measure at least serve to create an
increased interest in the study of the sonorous Swedish language and its
rich literature and give a clearer conception of the seriousness and
strength of Swedish character.

The book owes much to the kindly suggestions and corrections of those
who have examined it in proof or manuscript. Special acknowledgment is
due Professor A. Louis Elmquist of Northwestern University, who carefully
revised the vocabulary, and to Mr. E. W. Olson of Rock Island, Ill.,
whose accuracy and scholarship has been of invaluable assistance
throughout.

University of Minnesota, December, 1913.

A. A. S.




INTRODUCTION.


I.

In the personality of Esaias Tegnér the vigor and idealism of the
Swedish people find their completest and most brilliant incarnation. A
deep love of the grandeurs of nature, keen delight in adventure and
daring deeds, a charming juvenility of spirit that at least in the prime
of his life caused him to battle bravely and hopefully for great ideas, a
clearness of perception and integrity of purpose that abhor shams and
narrow prejudices and with reckless frankness denounce evils and abuses,
a disposition tending at times to brooding and melancholy, all these
elements, combined in Tegnér, have made him the idealized type of the
Swedish people. He was cast in a heroic mold and his countrymen continue
to regard him as the completed embodiment of their national ideals. And
in the same measure that Tegnér stands forth as an expression of Swedish
race characteristics it may be said that Fritiofs Saga is the
quintessence of his own sentiments and ideals.

Tegnér, according to his own words, "was born and reared in a remote
mountain region where nature herself composes noble but wild music, and
where the ancient gods apparently still wander about on winter evenings."
His ancestry went back for several generations through the sturdy bonde
class, though his father was a preacher and his mother the daughter of a
preacher. The father's people dwelt in the province of Småland and the
mother's ancestors had lived in the picturesque province of Värmland. The
future poet was born on the 13 of November, 1782, at Kyrkerud, Värmland,
his father holding a benefice in that province. While he was yet a mere
child of nine the father died and the family was left in poverty. A
friend of the Tegnér family, the judicial officer Branting, gave the
young Esaias a home in his house. The lad soon wrote a good hand and was
given a desk and a high, three-legged chair in the office. Branting took
a fancy to the young clerk and soon fell into the habit of inviting him
to accompany the master upon the many official journeys that had to be
made through the bailiwick. Thus Esaias came to see the glories of nature
in his native province, and deep and lasting impressions were left upon
his mind. His quick imagination was further stirred by the heroic sagas
of the North, in the reading of which he at times became so absorbed that
the flight of the hours or the passing events were entirely unnoticed by
him.

Branting, who had become convinced that his young clerk was by nature
endowed for a much higher station than a lowly clerkship offered,
generously provided Esaias with an opportunity for systematic study. In
1796 he wrote a good friend in whose home an elder brother of Esaias was
then acting as tutor, suggesting that the younger brother be given a home
there also and thus have the advantage of the brother's tutelage. A ready
acquiescence meeting this proposal, Esaias now went to Malma, the home of
Captain Löwenhjelm, and at once plunged into the study of Latin, French
and Greek under the brother's guidance. Independently of the instructor
he at the same time acquired a knowledge of English and read principally
the poems of Ossian, which greatly delighted him.

The following year the elder brother accepted a more profitable position
as tutor in the family of the great iron manufacturer Myhrman at Rämen in
Värmland and thither Esaias accompanied him. Here he could drink deep
from the fountain of knowledge for at Rämen he found a fine library of
French, Latin and Greek classics. He worked prodigiously and this,
coupled with a remarkably retentive memory, enabled him to make
remarkably rapid progress in his studies. He would have remained in the
library all the time poring over his dear classic authors but for the
fortunate intervention of the young members of the Myhrman family, seven
in all, who frequently would storm into his room and carry him off by
sheer force to their boisterous frolics. To one of these playmates, Anna
Myhrman, the youngest daughter of the family, he soon became attached by
the tender ties of love.

In 1799 Tegnér was enabled, through the generosity of Branting and
Myhrman, to repair to Lund and enter the university of that place. Here
he made a brilliant record as a student, particularly in the classics,
and after three years he was awarded the master's degree. In recognition
of his remarkable scholarship he was soon after made instructor in
aesthetics, secretary to the faculty of philosophy and assistant
librarian. In 1806 he claimed Anna Myhrman as his bride.

We have the testimony of Tegnér himself that already as a child he began
to write poetry, in fact these efforts began so early in his life that he
could not remember when he for the first time exercised the power that
later was to win him an abiding fame. As early as his clerkship days in
the office of Branting he wrote a poem in Alexandrine verse with the
subject taken from the Old Norse sagas. His numerous productions before
1808 attracted little attention and failed to get any prize for the
young author. But in the above mentioned year he sprang into immediate
popularity by the stirring "War Song of the Scanian Reserves" (Krigssång
för skånska lantvärnet), the Marseillaise of the Swedish nation. Sweden
had just suffered great reverses in war, her very existence as an
independent power seemed to hang in the balance, and confusion and
discouragement were evident on every hand. Then came Tegnér's patriotic
bugle blast, stirring the nation to renewed hope and courage. Speaking
of this poem Professor Boyesen says: "As long as we have wars we must
have martial bards and with the exception of the German Theodore Körner
I know none who can bear comparison with Tegnér. English literature can
certainly boast no war poem which would not be drowned in the mighty
music of Tegnér's 'Svea', 'The Scanian Reserves', and that magnificent
dithyrambic declamation, 'King Charles, the Young Hero'. Tennyson's
'Charge of the Light Brigade' is technically a finer poem than anything
Tegnér has written, but it lacks the deep, virile bass, the tremendous
volume of breath and voice, and the captivating martial lilt which makes
the heart beat willy nilly to the rhythm of the verse" (Essays on
Scandinavian Literature, 233).

The ability evinced by Tegnér as an instructor, but principally the
enthusiasm aroused by his "Song to the Scanian Reserves", gave him in
1810 a call to the Greek professorship at Lund. He did not, however,
enter into this position until 1812.

In the meantime Tegnér had given to his native land the solemn didactic
poem "Svea". In stately Alexandrine verse he scathingly rebukes his
countrymen for their foolish aping after foreign manners and depending
on foreign goods to satisfy their desires. The people, says the poet, can
become strong again only by a return to the simple life and homely
virtues of the great past. Not on the arena of war but through faithful
endeavor in industry, science and art may the Swedish people restore to
their fatherland its former power and glory. As though transported by
this noble thought into a state of ecstasy, the bard then, in the
concluding portion of the poem, pictures in magnificent dithyrambic song
the titanic struggle that ensues and enthrones Peace as the beneficent
ruler of the land. "Svea" won the prize of the Swedish Academy and firmly
established Tegnér in the affection of his countrymen.

The most productive and brilliant period of Tegnér's literary activity is
contemporaneous with his incumbency of the Greek professorship at Lund
(1812-1824). In this period he enriches Swedish literature with a series
of lyrics which still rank among the best both in point of lucidity of
thought and brilliance of diction. Only a few that stand out most
prominently in a list of about one hundred poems from this period can
receive mention here.

The intolerance and bitterness of the reaction that followed close upon
the downfall of Napoleon and found its cruel instrument of oppression in
the Holy Alliance aroused the bitter opposition of Tegnér. His vision was
not obscured, a fate that befell so many in that day, but he saw clearly
the nobility and necessity of tolerance, freedom and democracy. It is to
the great glory of Tegnér that he consistently used his brilliant powers
in battling against the advancing forces of obscurantism and tyranny. His
enlightened and humanitarian ideas find a beautiful utterance in the
poem "Tolerance" (Fördragsamhet) which dates from 1808, but later was
rewritten and appeared under the title "Voices of Peace" (Fridsröster).
In "The Awakened Eagle" (Den vaknade örnen), 1815, he celebrates the
return of Napoleon from Elba, The Union of Norway and Sweden stirs
Tegnér to write a poem "Nore", a high-minded protest against politics of
aggression and a plea for justice and a spirit of fraternity.

In "The New Year 1816" (Nyåret 1816) he scores the Holy Alliance in
bitter and sarcastic terms. The liberal ideas of Tegnér are further
elucidated in a famous address, delivered in 1817 at the celebration of
the three hundredth anniversary of the Lutheran Reformation. In this
event the poet saw the unfolding of the great forces that led to the
spiritual and intellectual emancipation of man, and ushered in a new era
of freedom and progress. The reactionaries in the realm of literature
become the object of his attack in "Epilogue at the Master's
Presentation" (Epilog vid magisterpromotionen). Other poems of this
period, as "The Children of the Lord's Supper" (Nattvardsbarnen),
admirably translated by Longfellow, "Axel", the tragic tale of one of the
warriors of Charles XII., and his fair Russian bride, "Karl XII", which
breathes the defiant spirit not only of the hero king but of the nation,
"Address to the Sun" (Sång till solen), an eloquent eulogy to the
marvelous beauty of the King of Day, merely served to establish Tegnér
more firmly in the affection of the people. But his fame was to be placed
on a still firmer foundation when the greatest creation of his fertile
mind, Fritiofs Saga, appeared.


II.

The genesis of Fritiofs Saga is to be found partly in the renascence of a
strong national sentiment in Sweden after the disastrous wars and loss of
Finland, early in the nineteenth century, partly in Tegnér's personality
and in his profound knowledge and warm admiration of the Old Norse sagas.
We have seen how already as a boy he had read the sagas with keen zest
and even tried his hand at a heroic poem in stately Alexandrine verse.

To the thoughtful minds of that day it seemed clear that the cause of
Sweden's misfortunes was to be found in her loss of a strong manhood, due
to a senseless readiness in adopting enervating foreign customs and to a
fatal relaxation in morals. In 1811 a handful of enthusiastic students,
mostly from Tegnér's native province of Värmland, formed the Gothic Union
(Götiska förbundet) for the purpose of working with united efforts for
the regeneration of the nation. This, they believed, could best be
achieved by reviving the memories of the old Goths, merely another name
for the people of the Saga period, which in turn would help to bring back
the vigorous integrity and dauntless courage of the past. The ancient
sagas must therefore be popularized.

Tegnér, who already in his "Svea" had bewailed the loss of national power
and urged his people to become independent and strong again, joined the
Gothic Union, at the same time expressing his disapproval of a too
pronounced and narrow-minded imitation of old Gothic life and thought.
Erik Gustaf Geijer, the great historian and poet, also a native of
Värmland and in power of mind and loftiness of ideals almost the peer of
Tegnér, published in Iduna, the organ of the Gothic Union, a few poems
that faithfully reproduce the old Northern spirit and in strength and
simplicity stand almost unsurpassed. An extremist in the camp was Per
Henrik Ling, an ardent patriot, who, inspired by Danish and German
Romanticism, would rehabilitate the nation by setting before it in a
series of epics the strong virtues of the past, albeit that these often
appeared in uncouth and brutal forms. For the physical improvement of
his countrymen Ling worked out a scientific system of exercise, and
though his epics were failures, largely because they set up coarse models
for an age that aesthetically had risen superior to them, his system of
physical training entitles him to an honored place among the great men of
Scandinavia.

Tegner had been greatly grieved at Ling's literary mistakes. It seemed
to him deplorable that a worthy cause should be doomed to ignominious
failure just because unskilled hands had undertaken to do the work. This
feeling prompted him to undertake the writing of a great epic based on
the old sagas, but excluding their crudities. But it would be a mistake
to think that this was the only force that impelled him to write. Tegnér
has now reached the heyday of his wonderful poetic powers and he must
give expression to the great ideas that stir his soul. And so he proceeds
to paint a picture of Fritiof the Bold and his times. The great Danish
poet Oehlenschläger had already published "Helge", an Old Norse cycle of
poems which Tegnér warmly admired. This poem revealed to him the
possibilities of the old saga themes in the hands of a master.

Fritiofs Saga did not appear as a completed work at first, but merely in
installments of a certain number of cantos at a time and these not in
consecutive order. In the summer of 1820, cantos 16-19, being the first
installments or "fragments," as Tegnér himself called them, appeared in
Iduna; the five concluding cantos were completed and published two years
later, and not until then did the poet proceed to write the first part.
The work was finally completed in 1825.

Although the first cantos published had received a most enthusiastic
reception on the part of the people and won unstinted praise from most of
the great literary men, even from many who belonged to opposing literary
schools, an enthusiasm that grew in volume and sincerity as the
subsequent portions appeared, Tegnér became increasingly dissatisfied and
discouraged because of the task that confronted him and the serious
defects that he saw in his creation. Tegnér was at all times his own
severest critic and there is found in him an utter absence of vanity or
illusion. "Speaking seriously", he wrote in 1824, "I have never regarded
myself as a poet in the higher significance of the word. -- -- -- I am at
best a John the Baptist who is preparing the way for him who is to come."
[Tegnér, Samlade Skrifter, II, 436.]


III.

As the basis for Tegnér's epic lies the ancient story of Fritiof the
Bold, which was probably put in writing in the thirteenth century,
although the events are supposed to have transpired in the eighth
century. But Tegnér has freely drawn material from other Old Norse sagas
and songs, and this, and not a little of his own personal experience, he
has woven into the story with the consummate skill of a master. He made
full use of his poetic license and eliminated and added, reconstructed
and embellished just as was convenient for his plan. "My object", he
says, "was to represent a poetical image of the old Northern hero age. It
was not Fritiof as an individual whom I would paint; it was the epoch of
which he was chosen as the representative." [Tegnér, Samlade Skrifter,
II, 393.]

It was Tegnér's firm conviction that the poet writes primarily for the
age in which he himself lives, and since he wrote for a civilized
audience he must divest Fritiof of his raw and barbarous attributes,
though still retaining a type of true Northern manhood. On this point
Tegnér says: "It was important not to sacrifice the national, the lively,
the vigorous and the natural. There could, and ought to, blow through the
song that cold winter air, that fresh Northern wind which characterizes
so much both the climate and the temperament of the North. But neither
should the storm howl till the very quicksilver froze and all the more
tender emotions of the breast were extinguished."

"It is properly in the bearing of Fritiof's character that I have sought
the solution of this problem. The noble, the high-minded, the bold--which
is the great feature of all heroism--ought not of course to be missing
there, and sufficient material abounded both in this and many other
sagas. But together with this more general heroism, I have endeavored to
invest the character of Fritiof with something individually Northern--
that fresh-living, insolent, daring rashness which belongs, or at least
formerly belonged to the national temperament. Ingeborg says of Fritiof
(Canto 7):

  'How glad, how daring, how inspired with hope,
  Against the breast of norn he sets the point
  Of his good sword, commanding:
  "Thou shalt yield!"'

These lines contain the key to Fritiof's character and in fact to the
whole poem." [Tegnér, Samlade Skrifter, II, p. 393. The entire treatise
is found in English translation in Andersen's Viking Tales.]

In what manner Tegnér modernizes his story by divesting the original saga
of its grotesque and repugnant features can most readily be illustrated
in a comparison between his account of Fritiof's encounter with king
Helge in Balder's temple (Canto 13) and the original story. The latter
tells how Fritiof unceremoniously enters the temple, having first given
orders that all the king's ships should be broken to pieces, and threw
the tribute purse so violently at the king's nose that two teeth were
broken out of his mouth and he fell into a swoon in his high seat. But as
Fritiof was passing out of the temple, he saw the ring on the hand of
Helge's wife, who was warming an image of Balder by the fire. He seized
the ring on her hand, but it stuck fast and so he dragged her along the
floor toward the door and then the image fell into the fire. The wife of
Halfdan tried to come to her assistance, only to let the image she was
warming by the fire fall into the flames. As the image had previously
been anointed, the flames shot up at once and soon the whole house was
wrapped in fire. Fritiof, however, got the ring before he went away. But
as he walked out of the temple, said the people, he flung a firebrand at
the roof, so that all the house was wrapped in flames. Of the violent
feeling that, according to Tegnér, racked Fritiof's soul as he went into
exile or of the deep sense of guilt that latter hung as a pall over his
life there is no mention in the original. Here we touch upon the most
thoroughgoing change that Tegnér made in the character of his hero. He
invested him with a sentimentality, a disposition towards melancholy, an
accusing voice of conscience that torments his soul until full atonement
has been won, that are modern and Christian in essence and entirely
foreign to the pagan story. On this point Tegnér: "Another peculiarity
common to the people of the North is a certain disposition for melancholy
and heaviness of spirit common to all deeper characters. Like some
elegiac key-note, its sound pervades all our old national melodies, and
generally whatever is expressive in our annals, for it is found in the
depths of the nation's heart. I have somewhere or other said of Bellman,
the most national of our poets:

  'And work the touch of gloom his brow o'shading,
  A Northern minstrel-look, a grief in rosy red!'

For this melancholy, so far from opposing the fresh liveliness and
cheering vigor common to the nation, only gives them yet more strength
and elasticity. There is a certain kind of life-enjoying gladness (and of
this, public opinion has accused the French) which finally reposes on
frivolity; that of the North is built on seriousness. And therefore I
have also endeavored to develop in Fritiof somewhat of this meditative
gloom. His repentant regret at the unwilling temple fire, his scrupulous
fear of Balder (Canto 15) who--

  'Sits in the sky, cloudy thoughts sending down,
  Ever veiling my spirit in gloom',

and his longing for the final reconciliation and for calm within
him, are proofs not only of a religious craving, but also and still more
of a national tendency to sorrowfulness common to every serious mind, at
least in the North of Europe." [Tegnér, Samlade Skrifter, II, p. 394.]

Tegnér thus found it easy to justify the sentimentality that
characterizes Fritiof's love for Ingeborg, an element in Fritiofs Saga
that has been most severely condemned by the critics. To the criticism
that this love is too modern and Platonic, Tegnér correctly answers that
reverence for the sex was from the earliest times a characteristic of the
German people so that the light and coarse view that prevailed among the
most cultivated nations of antiquity was a thing quite foreign to the
habits of the North.

Ingeborg like Fritiof is idealized by the poet although here the
departure from the original is not as wide. That delicacy of sentiment
which is inseparable from Ingeborg and guides her right in the great
crisis is not, he maintains, a trait merely of the woman of ancient
Scandinavia but is inherent in each noble female, no matter when or where
she lives. And Tegnér, who surely was no realist after the fashion of
Strindberg, chooses to picture woman as she appears in her loveliest
forms.

The brooding and melancholy spirit that Tegnér had infused into the soul
of Fritiof had in a large measure come from his own life. The depression
of mind that had cast its shadows over him in the years that saw the
creation of Fritiofs Saga grew steadily worse. The period that followed
immediately upon the completion of this work was filled with doubt and
despair. The explanation for this must be found partly in the insidious
progress of a physical disease, partly to a change of place and
environment. Certain hereditary tendencies, which caused him to fear that
the light of reason would desert him, also played a part in this.

In 1824 he gave up the Greek professorship at Lund to become bishop of
the diocese of Växiö in the province of Småland, but the duties of the
new position were not congenial to him. The spiritual and intellectual
life of the diocese was on a low plane and Tegnér threw himself with
tremendous earnestness into the work of reform, but the prejudice and
inertia of clergy and people stood constantly in the way. In his efforts
to purge the church of some unworthy ecclesiastics he encountered bitter
opposition and suffered some humiliations. He took a special interest in
the schools of his diocese and his many pedagogical addresses are models
in point of clearness and practical good sense.

The many and varied duties imposed on him by the episcopal office,
particularly official inspection trips, attendance upon the sessions of
the Riksdag, and serving on numerous important committees made it
impossible for Tegnér to continue his literary activities in the manner
of his university days, but occasionally he would give to his countrymen
a literary masterpiece that showed that the brilliant mind had not been
dimmed.

His mental and physical ailments grew steadily worse and after 1840 there
came periods of insanity which expressed itself in the most chimerical
plans for travel, literary activities, and great national enterprises.
Light came to his reason again, but his strength had been permanently
broken. He died on November 2, 1846, and his body was laid to rest in the
cemetery at Växiö, where a simple monument of marble and Swedish granite
marks his final resting place.




FRITIOFS SAGA


I.

FRITIOF OCH INGEBORG.

Där växte uti Hildings gård          1
två plantor under fostrarns vård.
Ej Norden förr sett två så sköna,
de växte härligt i det gröna.

Den ena som en ek sköt fram,         2
och som en lans är hennes stam;
men kronan, som i vinden skälver,
liksom en hjälm sin rundel välver.

Den andra växte som en ros,          3
när vintern nyss har flytt sin kos;
men våren, som den rosen gömmer,
i knoppen ligger än och drömmer.

Men stormen skall kring jorden gå,   4
med honom brottas eken då,
och vårsol skall på himmeln glöda,
då öppnar rosen läppar röda.

Så växte de i fröjd och lek,         5
och Fritiof var den unga ek;
men rosen uti dalar gröna
hon hette Ingeborg den sköna.

Såg du de två i dagens ljus,         6
du tänkte dig i Frejas hus,
där månget litet brudpar svingar
med gula hår och rosenvingar.

Men såg du dem i månens sken         7
kringdansa under lummig gren,
du tänkte: Under lundens kransar
älvkungen med sin drottning dansar.

Det var så glatt, det var så kärt,   8
när han sin första runa lärt.
En kung var ej som han i ära;
den runan fick han Ingborg lära.

Hur glättigt sam han i sin slup      9
med henne över mörkblå djup!
Hur hjärtligt, när han seglen vänder,
hon klappar i små vita händer!

Det fanns ej fågelbo så högt,        10
som han för henne ej besökt.
Själv örnen, som i molnen gungar,
blev plundrad båd' på ägg och ungar.

Det fanns ej bäck, hur strid han var, 11
varöver han ej Ingborg bar.
Det är så skönt, när forsen larmar,
att tryckas av små vita armar.

Den första blomma, våren fött,        12
det första smultron, som blev rött,
det första ax, vars guld blev moget,
dem bjöd han henne glatt och troget.--

Men barnets dagar flyga bort,         13
där står en yngling innan kort
med eldig blick, som ber och hoppas,
där står en mö med barm, som knoppas.

Ung Fritiof drog på jakt alltjämt;    14
den jakten skulle mången skrämt,
ty utan spjut och utan klinga
den djärve ville björnen tvinga.

Då kämpade de, bröst mot bröst,       15
och jägarn, segrande, fast klöst,
med ludet byte kom tillbaka;
hur skulle jungfrun det försaka?

Ty mannens mod är kvinnan kärt,       16
det starka är det sköna värt:
de bägge passa för varannan,
som hjälmen passar sig för pannan.

Men läste han i vinterkväll           17
vid eldsken ifrån spiselna häll
en sång om strålande Valhalla,
om gudar och gudinnor alla,

han tänkte: Gult är Frejas hår,       18
ett kornland, som för vinden går.
Från det kan jag ej Ingborgs skilja,
ett nät av guld kring ros och lilja.

Idunas barm är rik, och skönt         19
han hoppar under silke grönt;
jag vet ett silke, där det hoppar
ljusalfer två med rosenknoppar.

Och Friggas ögon äro blå              20
som himmeln till att se uppå;
jag känner ögon: mot de båda
är ljusblå vårdag mörk att skåda.

Vi prisas Gerdas kinder så,           21
en nyfälld snö med norrsken på?
Jag kinder sett: en dag, som tänder
två morgonrodnader i sänder.

Jag vet ett hjärta, lika ömt          22
som Nannas, fast ej så berömt.
Med rätta prisas du av skalder,
du Nannas lyckelige Balder!

O! att som du jag finge dö,           23
begråten av en trogen mö,
Så öm, så trogen som din Nanna;
hos Hel jag ville gärna stanna.--

Men kungadottern satt och kvad        24
en hjältesång och vävde glad
i duken in den hjältens under
och vågor blå och gröna lunder.

Där växte in i snövit ull             25
de sköldar utav spolat gull,
och röda flögo stridens lansar,
men styvt av silver var vart pansar.

Dock, hur hon väver, dag från dag,    26
får hjälten Fritiofs anletsdag,
och som de blicka fram ur väven,
då rodnar hon men glädes även.

Men Fritiof skär, var han går fram,   27
ett I, ett F i björkens stam.
De runor gro med fröjd och gamman,
liksom de ungas hjärtan, samman.

När dagen uppå fästet står,           28
världskungen med de gyllne hår,
och livet rörs och mänskor vandra,
då tänka de blott på varandra.

När natten uppå fästet står,          29
världsmodern med de mörka hår,
och tystnad rår och stjärnor vandra,
då drömma de blott om varandra.

"Du jord, som smyckar dig var vår     30
med blommor i ditt gröna hår,
giv mig de skönsta! Jag vill vira
en krans av dem att Fritiof sira."

"Du hav, som satt din dunkla sal      31
med pärlor full i tusental,
giv mig de skönaste, de bästa!
Kring Ingborgs hals vill jag dem fästa."

"Du knapp på Odens kungastol,         32
du världens öga, gyllne sol!
Var du blott min, din blanka skiva
till sköld jag ville Fritiof giva."

"Du lykta i Allfaders hus,            33
du måne med ditt bleka ljus!
Var du blott min, jag gav dig gärna
till smycke åt min sköna tärna."--

Men Hilding sade: "Fosterson,         34
den älskog vänd din håg ifrån!
Ej lika falla ödets lotter,
den tärnan är kung Beles dotter.

Till Oden själv i stjärnklar sal      35
uppstiger hennes ättartal;
du är blott Torstens son; giv vika!
ty lika trives bäst med lika."

Men Fritiof log: "Mitt ättartal       36
går nedåt i de dödas dal.
Nyss slog jag skogens kung så luden,
hans anor ärvde jag med huden.

Friboren man ej vika vill,            37
ty världen hör den frie till.
Vad lyckan bröt, kan hon försona,
och hoppet bär en konungs krona.

Högättad är all kraft, ty Tor,        38
dess ättefar, i Trudvang bor.
Han väger börden ej men värdet:
en väldig friare är svärdet.

Jag kämpar om min unga brud,          39
om ock det var med dundrets gud.
Väx trygg, väx glad, min vita lilja,
ve den, som dig och mig vill skilja!"


II.

KUNG BELE OCH TORSTEN VIKINGSSON.

Kung Bele, stödd på svärdet, i kungssal stod,   1
hos honom Torsten Vikingsson, den bonde god,
hans gamle vapenbroder, snart hundraårig,
och ärrig som en runsten och silverhårig.

De stodo, som bland bergen två offerhus,        2
åt hedna gudar vigda, nu halvt i grus;
men visdomsrunor många på muren täljas,
och höga forntidsminnen i valven dväljas.

"Det lider emot kvällen", sad' Bele kung,       3
"ej mjödet vill mig smaka, och hjälm känns tung,
inför mitt öga mörkna de mänskoöden,
men Valhall skiner närmre, jag anar döden.

Jag kallat mina söner och din också,            4
ty de tillsammans höra, liksom vi två.
En varning vill jag giva de örnar unga,
förrn orden somnat alla på död mans tunga."--

Då trädde de i salen, som kung befallt,         5
och främst bland dem gick Helge, en mörk gestalt.
Han dvaldes helst bland spåmän kring altarrunden
och kom med blod på händren ur offerlunden.

Därefter syntes Halvdan, ljuslockig sven;       6
vart anletsdrag var ädelt men vekligt än.
Till lek han tycktes bära ett svärd vid bälte
och liknade en jungfru, förklädd till hjälte.

Men efter dem kom Fritiof i mantel blå,         7
ett huvud var han högre än bägge två.
Han stod emellan brödren, som dag står mogen
emellan rosig morgon och natt i skogen.

"I söner", sade kungen, "min sol går ned.       8
I endräkt styren riket, i brödrafred!
Ty endräkt håller samman: hon är som ringen
på lansen; den förutan hans kraft är ingen.

Låt styrkan stå som dörrsven vid landets port   9
och friden blomstra inom å hägnad ort!
Till skygd blev svärdet givet men ej till skada,
och sköld är smidd till hänglås för bondens lada.

Sitt eget land förtrycker dåraktig man,         10
ty kungen kan allenast vad folket kan.
Grönlummig krona vissnar, så snart som märgen
i stammen är förtorkad på nakna bergen.

På pelarstoder fyra står himlens rund,          11
men tronen vilar endast på lagens grund.
När våld på tinget dömer, står ofärd nära;
men rätt är landets fromma och kungens ära.

Väl dväljas gudar, Helge, i disarsal,           12
men ej som snäckan dväljes i slutet skal.
Så långt som dagsljus skiner, som stämma ljudar,
så långt som tanke flyger, bo höge gudar.

Nog svika lungans tecken i offrad falk,         13
och flärd är mången runa, som skärs på balk;
men redligt hjärta, Helge, och friskt tillika,
skrev Oden fullt med runor, som aldrig svika.

Var icke hård, kung Helge, men endast fast!     14
Det svärd, som bitar skarpast, är böjligast.
Milt sinne pryder kungen, som blommor skölden,
och vårdag bringar mera än vinterkölden.

En man förutan vänner, om än så stark,          15
dör hän, som stam i öken med skalad bark.
Men vänsäll man han trives som träd i lunden,
där bäcken vattnar roten och storm är bunden.

Yvs ej af fädrens ära! envar har dock blott sin; 16
kan du ej spänna bågen, är han ej din.
Vad vill du med det värde, som är begravet?
Stark ström med egna vågor går genom havet.

Du Halvdan, glättigt sinne är vis mans vinst;   17
men joller höves ingen, och kungen minst.
Med humle brygges mjödet, ej blott med honung;
lägg stål i svärd och allvar i leken, konung!

För mycket vett fick ingen, hur vis han het,    18
men litet nog vet mången, som intet vet.
Fåkunnig gäst i högbänk försmås, men vitter
har ständigt lagets öra, hur lågt han sitter.

Till trofast vän, o Halvdan, till fosterbror    19
är vägen gen, om också han fjärran bor;
men däremot avsides, långt hän belägen
är oväns gård, om även han står vid vägen.

Välj icke till förtrogen vemhelst som vill!     20
Tomt hus står gärna öppet, men rikt stängs till.
Välj _en_, onödigt är det den andra leta,
och världen vet, o Halvdan, vad trenne veta."--

Därefter uppstod Torsten och talte så:          21
"Ej höves kung att ensam till Oden gå.
Vi delat livets skiften ihop, kung Bele,
och döden, vill jag hoppas, vi också dele.

Son Fritiof, ålderdomen har viskat mig          22
i örat mången varning, den ger jag dig.
På ätthög Odens fåglar slå ned i Norden,
men på den gamles läppar mångvisa orden.

Främst vörda höga gudar! ty ont och gott,       23
som storm och solsken, komma från himlen blott.
De se i hjärtats lönvalv fast det är slutet,
och långa år få gälda, vad stunden brutit.

Lyd kungen! _En_ skall styra med kraft och vett: 24
skum natt har många ögon, men dagen ett.
Helt lätt den bättre, Fritiof, fördrar den bäste,
och egg har svärdet nödig men även fäste.

Hög kraft är gudars gåva; men, Fritiof, minns,   25
att styrka båtar föga, där vett ej finns.
Tolvmannakraft har björnen, av _en_ man slagen;
mot svärdshugg hålles skölden, mot våldet lagen.

Av få den stolte fruktas men hatas av envar,     26
och övermod, o Fritiof, är fallets far.
Högt såg jag mången flyga, nu stödd på krycka,
ty vädret rår för årsväxt, och vind för lycka.

Dag skall du prisa, Fritiof, sen bärgad sol sig döljt, 27
och öl, när det är drucket, och råd, när följt.
På mången sak förlitar sig ungersvennen,
men striden prövar klingan, och nöden vännen.

Nattgammal is tro icke, ej vårdags snö,          28
ej somnad orm, ej talet av knäsatt mö;
ty kvinnans bröst är svarvat på hjul, som rullar,
och vankelmod bor under de liljekullar.

Du själv dör hän, och hän dör vad dig tillhör;   29
men en ting vet jag, Fritiof, som aldrig dör,
och det är domen över död man: därföre
vad ädelt är, du vilje, vad rätt, du göre"--

Så varnade de gamle i kungasal,                  30
som skalden varnat sedan i Havamal.
Från släkt till släkte gingo kärnfulla orden,
och djupt ur kumlen viska de än i Norden.

Därefter talte bägge mång' hjärtligt ord         31
allt om sin trogna vänskap, berömd i Nord;
hur trofast intill döden, i nöd och gamman,
två knäppta händer lika, de hållit samman.

"Med rygg mot rygg vi stodo, och varifrån        32
som nornan kom, hon stötte på sköld, min son!
Nu före er till Valhall vi gamle ile;
men edra fäders ande på eder vile!"--

Och mycket talte kungen om Fritiofs mod,         33
om hjältekraft, som mer är än kungablod.
Och mycket talte Torsten om glans, som kröner
de höga Nordlands kungar, de asasöner.

"Och hållen I tillhopa, I söner tre,             34
er överman--det vet jag--skall Nord ej se;
ty kraft, till kungahöghet osvikligt sluten,
hon är som mörkblå stålrand, kring guldsköld gjuten.

Och halsen till min dotter, den rosenknopp!      35
I lugn, som det sig hövdes, har hon växt opp;
omhägnen henne, låten ej stormen komma
och fästa i sin hjälmhatt min späda blomma!

På dig, o Helge, lägger jag faderns sorg,        36
o, älska som en dotter min Ingeborg !
Tvång retar ädelt sinne, men saktmod leder
båd' man och kvinna, Helge, till rätt och heder.--

Men läggen oss, I söner, i högar två             37
på var sin sida fjärden vid bölja blå;
ty hennes sång är ljuvlig ännu för anden,
och som ett drapa klinga dess slag vid stranden.

När månen strör kring bergen sitt bleka sken     38
och midnattsdaggen faller på bautasten,
då sitta vi, o Torsten, på högar runda
och spraka över vattnet om ting, som stunda.

Och nu farväl, I söner! Gån mer ej hit!          39
Vår gång är till Allfader; vi längta dit,
liksom till havet längtar den trötta floden;
men Frej välsigne eder, och Tor och Oden!"


III.

FRITIOF TAGER ARV EFTER SIN FADER.

Voro nu satta i hög kung Bele och Torsten den gamle,
där de själva befallt: på var sin sida om fjärden
högarna lyfte sin rund, två bröst, dem döden har åtskilt.
Helge och Halvdan, på folkets beslut, nu togo i sam-arv
riket efter sin far; men Fritiof, som endaste sonen,       5
delte med ingen och fäste i lugn sin boning på Framnäs,
Tre mil sträckte sig kring den gårdens ägor: på tre håll
dalar och kullar och berg, men på fjärde sidan var havet.
Björkskog krönte de kullarnas topp, men på sluttande sidor
frodades gyllene korn, och manshög vaggade rågen.          10
Sjöar, många i tal, sin spegel höllo för bergen,
höllo för skogarna opp, i vars djup höghornade älgar
hade sin kungliga gång och drucko av hundrade bäckar.
Men i dalarna vida omkring där bette i grönskan
hjordar med glänsande hull och med juver, som längta till stävan.  15
Mellan dem spriddes än hit och än dit en oräknelig skara
av vitulliga får, som du ser vitaktiga strömoln
flockvis spridda på himmelens valv, när det blåser om våren.
Springare två gånger tolv, bångstyriga, fjättrade vindar,
stampande stodo i spiltornas rad och tuggade vallhö,       20
manarna knutna med rött och hovarna blanka av järnskor.
Dryckessalen, ett hus för sig själv, var timrad av kärnfur.
Ej fem hundrade män--till tio tolfter på hundrat--
fyllde den rymliga sal, när de samlats att dricka om julen.
Genom salen, så lång som han var, gick bordet av stenek,   25
bonat och blankt som av stål; högsätes-pelarna båda
stodo för ändan därav, två gudar, skurna av almträd:
Oden med härskareblick och Frej med solen på hatten.
Nyss emellan de två på sin björnhud--huden var kolsvart,
gapet scharlakansrött, men klorna skodda med silver--      30
Torsten bland vännerna satt, som gästfriheten bland glädjen.
Ofta, när månen bland skyarna flög, förtalde den gamle
under från främmande land, dem han sett, och vikingafärder
fjärran i Östervåg och i Västersaltet och Gandvik.
Tyst satt lyssnande lag, och dess blickar hängde vid gubbens  35
läppar, som bi't vid sin ros; men skalden tänkte på Brage,
när med sitt silfverskägg och med runor på tungan han sitter
under den lumimiga bok och förtäljer en saga vid Mimers
evigt sorlande våg, han själv en levande saga.

Mitt på golvet--med halm var det strött--brann lågan beständigt  40
glatt på sin murade häll, och igenom det luftiga rökfång
blickade stjärnorna in, de himmelska vänner, i salen.
Men kring väggen, på naglar av stål, där hängde det radvis
brynja och hjälm vid varann, och här och där dem emellan
blixtrade neder ett svärd, som i vinterkvällen ett stjärnskott.  45
Mera än hjälmar och svärd dock sköldarna lyste i salen,
blanka som solens rund eller månens skiva av silver.
Gick där stundom en mö kring bordet och fyllde i hornen,
slog hon ögonen ned och rodnade: bilden i skölden
rodnade även som hon; det gladde de drickande kämpar.--     50

Rikt var huset: varhelst som du skådade, mötte ditt öga
fyllda källrar och proppade skåp och rågade visthus.
Många klenoder jämväl där gömdes, byten av segern,
guld med runor uppå och det konstarbetade silver.
Tre ting skattades dock av all den rikedom ypperst:         55
_svärdet_, som ärvdes från fader till son, var främst av de trenne,
Angurvadel, så kallades det, och broder till blixten.
Fjärran i Österland var det smitt--som sagan förtäljer--,
härdat i dvärgarnas eld: Björn Blåtand bar det från början.
Björn förlorade dock på en gång båd' svärdet och livet      60
söder i Gröningasund, där han stridde mot väldige Vifell.
Vifell hade en son, het Viking. Men gammal och bräcklig,
bodde på Ulleråker en kung med sin blomstrande dotter.
Se, då kom det ur skogarnas djup en oskapelig jätte,
högre till växten än människors ätt och luden och vildsint, 65
fordrade envigeskamp eller kungadottern och riket.
Ingen vågade kampen likväl, ty det fanns ej ett stål, som
bet på hans skalle av järn, och därför nämndes han Järnhös.
Viking allena, som nyss fyllt femton vintrar, emottog
striden, i hopp på sin arm och på Ångurvadel. I ett hugg    70
klöv han till midjan det rytande troll och frälste den sköna.
Viking lämnade svärdet till Torsten, sin son, och från Torsten
gick det till Fritiof i arv: när han drog det, sken det i salen,
liksom flöge en blixt därigenom eller ett norrsken.
Hjaltet var hamrat av guld, men runor syntes på klingan,     75
underbara, ej kända i Nord, men de kändes vid solens
portar, där fäderna bott, förrn åsarna förde dem hit upp.
Matta lyste de runor alltjämt, när fred var i landet,
men när Hildur begynte sin lek, då brunno de alla
röda som hanens kam, när han kämpar: förlorad var den, som   80
mötte i slaktningens natt den klingan med lågande runor.
Svärdet var vida berömt, och av svärd var det ypperst i Norden.
Därnäst ypperst i pris var en _armring_, vida beryktad,
smidd av nordiska sagans Vulkan, av den haltande Vaulund.
Tre mark höll han i vikt, och arbetad var han av rent guld.  85
Himlen var tecknad därpå med de tolv odödligas borgar,
växlande månaders bild, men av skalderna nämndes de solhus.
Alfhem skådades där, Frejs borg: det är solen, som nyfödd
börjar att klättra igen för himmelens branter vid julen.
Sökvabäck var där också: i dess sal satt Oden hos Saga,      90
drack sitt vin ur det gyllene kärl; det kärlet är havet,
färgat med guld av morgonens glöd, och Sagan är våren,
skriven på grönskande fält med blommor i stället för runor.
Balder syntes jämväl på sin tron, midsommarens sol, som
gjuter från fästet sin rikedom ner, en bild av det goda;     95
ty det goda är strålande ljus, men det onda är mörker.
Solen tröttnar att stiga alltjämt, och det goda desslikes
svindlar på höjdernas brant: med en suck försjunka de båda
neder till skuggornas land, till Hel: det är Balder på bålet.
Glitner, den fredliga borg, sågs även: förlikande alla,      100
satt där med vågen i hand Forsete, domarn på höstting.
Dessa bilder och många ännu, som betecknade ljusets
strider på himmelens valv och i människans sinne, de voro
skurna av mästarens hand i den ringen. En präktig rubinknapp
krönte dess buktiga rund, som solen kröner sin himmel.       105
Ringen var länge i släkten ett arv, ty hon ledde sin ättlängd,
endast på mödernet dock, till Vaulund, räknad för stamfar.
En gång stals den klenoden dock bort av rövaren Söte,
svärmande kring på de nordiska hav; sen fanns han ej åter.
Slutligen taltes det om, att Sote på kusten av Bretland      110
levande satt sig med skepp och med gods i sin murade gravhög;
men, där fann han ej ro, och det spökade ständigt i högen.
Torsten förnam det ryktet också, och med Bele besteg han
draken och klöv den skummande våg och styrde till stället.
Vid som ett tempelvalv, som en kungsgård, vore den bäddad     115
in i grus och grönskande torv, så välvde sig högen.
Ljus ock lyste därur. Igenom en springa på porten
tittade kämparna in, och det beckade vikingaskeppet
stod där med ankar och master och rår; men hög i dess bakstam
satt en förfärlig gestalt: han var klädd i en mantel av lågor. 120
Bister satt han och skurade där blodfläckade klingan,
kunde ej skura de fläckarna bort: allt guld, som han rånat,
låg i högar omkring, och ringen bar han på armen.
"Stiga vi", viskade Bele, "dit ner och kämpa mot trollet,
två mot en ande av eld?" Men halvvred svarade Torsten:        125
"En mot en var fädernas sed, jag kämpar väl ensam."
Länge tvistades nu, vem först av de tvenne det tillkom
pröva den vådliga färd; men till slut tog Bele sin stålhjälm,
skakade om två lotter däri, och vid stjärnornas skimmer
kände Torsten igen sin lott. För en stöt av hans järnlans     130
sprungo riglar och lås, och han nedsteg.--Frågade någon,
vad han förnam i det nattliga djup, då teg han och ryste.
Bele hörde dock först en sång, den lät som en trollsång;
sedan förnam han ett rasslande ljud, som av klingor som korsas,
sist ett gräseligt skri; då blev tyst. Ut störtade Torsten,   135
blek, förvirrad, förstörd; ty med döden hade han kämpat.
Ringen bar han likväl. "Den är dyrköpt", sade han ofta,
"ty jag har darrat en gång i mitt liv, och det var, när jag tog den."
Smycket var vida berömt och av smycken ypperst i Norden.

_Skeppet Ellida_ till slut var en av släktens klenoder.       140
Viking--sägs det--en gång, när han vände tillbaka från härtåg,
seglade längs med sin strand; då såg han en man på ett skeppsvrak
sorglöst gungande hän; det var, som han lekte med vågen.
Mannen var hög och av ädel gestalt och hans anlete öppet,
glatt, men föränderligt dock, likt havet, som leker i solsken. 145
Manteln var blå och bältet av guld, besatt med koraller,
skägget vitt som vågornas skum, men håret var sjögrönt.
Viking styrde sin snäcka däråt för att bärga den arme,
tog den förfrusne hem till sin gård och förplägade gästen.
Dock, när han bjöds av värden till sängs, då log han och sade: 150
"Vinden är god, och mitt skepp, som du sett, är ej att förakta;
hundrade mil, det hoppas jag visst, jag seglar i afton.
Tack för din bjudning ändå! den är välment; kunde jag endast
ge dig ett minne av mig! men min rikedom ligger i havet;
kanske finner du dock i morgon en gåva på stranden."           155
Dagen därpå stod Viking vid sjön, och si! som en havsörn,
när han förföljer sitt rov, flög in i viken ett drakskepp.
Ingen syntes därpå, ej en gång man märkte en styrman,
rodret dock lette sin buktiga väg bland klippor och blindskär,
liksom bodde en ande däri: när det nalkades stranden,          160
revade seglet sig självt, och, ej rört av människohänder,
ankaret sänkte sig ned och bet med sin hulling i djupet.
Stum stod Viking och såg, men då sjöngo de lekande vågor:
"Bärgade Ägir ej glömmer sin skuld, han skänker dig draken."
Gåvan var kunglig att se, ty de buktiga plankor av eke         165
voro ej fogade hop som annars men vuxna tillsammans.
Sträckningen var som en drakes i sjön: i stammen där framme
lyfte han huvudet högt, och av rött guld lågade svalget.
Buken var spräcklig med blått och med gult, men baktill vid rodret
slog han sin väldiga stjärt i en ringel, fjällig av silver;     170
vingarna svarta med kanter av rött; när han spände dem alla,
flög han i kapp med den susande storm, men örnen blev efter.
Fylldes det skeppet med väpnade män, då skulle du trott dig
skåda en flytande konungastad, en simmande fästning.
Skeppet var vida berömt, och av skepp var det ypperst i Norden.  175

Detta och mera därtill tog Fritiof i arv av sin fader.
Knappast fanns i de nordiska land en rikare arving,
om ej en konungason; ty kungars välde är ypperst.
Var han ej konungason, likväl hans sinne var kungligt,
vänsällt, ädelt och milt, och med var dag växte hans rykte.       180
Kämpar hade han tolv, gråhåriga furstar i idrott,
faderns kamrater, med bröst av stål och med ärriga pannor.
Nederst på kämparnas bänk, jämnårig med Fritiof, en yngling
satt som en ros bland vissnade löv: Björn hette den unge,
glad som ett barn men fast som en man och vis som en gubbe.       185
Upp med Fritiof han växt, och de blandat blod med varandra,
fosterbröder på nordmannasätt, och svurit att leva
samman i lust och i nöd och att hämna varandra i döden.
Mitt bland kämpar och gästernas mängd, som kommit till gravöl,
Fritiof, en sörjande värd, med ögon fyllda av tårar,              190
drack på fädernas vis sin faders minne och hörde
skaldernas sång till hans lov, ett dundrande dräpa; men sedan
steg han i faderns säte, nu hans, och satte sig neder
mellan dess Oden och Frej: det är Tors plats uppe i Valhall.


IV.

FRITIOFS FRIERI.

Väl klingar sången i Fritiofs sal,            1
och skalderna prisa hans ättartal.
Men sången gläder
ej Fritiof, han hör ej, vad skalden kväder.

Och jorden har åter klätt sig grön,           2
och drakarna simma igen på sjön.
Men hjältesonen
han vandrar i skogen och ser på månen.

Nyss var han likväl så lycklig, så glad,      3
ty muntre kung Halvdan till gäst han bad
och Helge dyster,
och de hade med sig sin sköna syster.

Han satt vid dess sida, han tryckte dess hand 4
och kände tillbaka en tryckning ibland
och såg betagen
alltjämt på de kära, de ädla dragen.

De taltes vid om de glada dar,                5
då morgonens dagg låg på livet kvar,
om barndomsminnen,
de rosengårdar i ädla sinnen.

Hon hälsade honom från dal och park,          6
från namnen, som grodde i björkens bark,
och från den kullen,
där ekarna frodas i hjältemullen.

"Det var ej så trevligt i kungens gård,       7
ty Halvdan var barnslig och Helge hård.
De kungasöner
de höra ej annat än lov och böner.

Och ingen--här rodnade hon som en ros--,      8
åt vilken en klagan kunde förtros!
I kungasalar
hur kvavt var det där mot i Hildings dalar!

Och duvorna, som de matat och tämt,           9
nu voro de flugna, ty höken dem skrämt.
Ett par allena
var kvar; av de tvenne tag du den ena!

Den duvan hon flyger väl hem igen,            10
hon längtar, som andra, väl till sin vän.
Bind under vingen
en vänlig runa! det märker ingen."

Så sutto de viskande dagen om,                11
de hviskade ännu, när kvällen kom,
som aftonvindar
om våren viska i gröna lindar.

Men nu är hon borta, och Fritiofs mod         12
är borta med henne. Det unga blod
i kinden stiger,
han lågar och suckar alltjämt och tiger.

Sin sorg, sin klagan med duvan han skrev,     13
och glad for hon av med sitt kärleksbrev;
men ack, tillbaka
hon vände ej mer, hon blev hos sin maka.

Det väsen behagade icke Björn.                14
Han sade: "Vad fattas vår unga örn,
så tyst, så sluten?
Är bröstet träffat, är vingen skjuten?

Vad vill du? Ha vi ej i överflöd              15
det gula fläsk och det bruna mjöd
och skalder många?
Det tar aldrig slut på de visor långa.

Sant nog, att gångaren stampar i spilt;       16
på rov, på rov skriker falken vilt.
Men Fritiof jagar
i molnen allena, och tärs och klagar.

Ellida hon har ingen ro på våg,               17
hon rycker alltjämt på sitt ankartåg.
Ligg still, Ellida!
ty Fritiof är fredlig, han vill ej strida.

Den strådöd är också en död: till slut        18
jag rister, som Oden, mig själv med spjut.
Det kan ej fela,
vi bliva välkomna hos blåvit Hela."

Då släppte Fritiof sin drake lös,             19
och seglet svällde, och vågen fnös.
Rakt över fjärden
till kungens söner han styrde färden.

De sutto på Beles hög den dag                 20
och hörde folket och skipade lag;
men Fritiof talar:
den stämman förnimmes kring berg och dalar.

"I kungar, skön Ingeborg är mig kär;          21
av eder jag henne till brud begär,
och den förening
hon var väl även kung Beles mening.

Han lät oss växa hos Hilding opp,             22
likt ungträn, som växa tillsammans i topp.
Där ovanföre
band Freja de toppar med gyllne snöre.

Min far var ej konung, ej jarl en gång,       23
dock lever hans minne i skaldens sång.
Högvälvda grifter
förtälja på runsten min ätts bedrifter.

Lätt kunde jag vinna mig rike och land,       24
men hellre jag blir på min fädernestrand.
Där vill jag skydda
så kungens gård som den ringes hydda.

Vi äro på Beles hög; han hör                  25
vart ord i djupet här nedanför.
Med Fritiof beder
den gamle i högen: betänken eder!"--

Då reste sig Helge och talte med hån:        26
"Vår syster är ej för en bondeson.
Nordlandens drotter
må tävla, ej du, om den Valhallsdotter.

Yvs gärna att hälsas för ypperst i Nord,     27
vinn männer med handkraft och kvinnor med ord!
Men Odensblodet
till pris ger jag icke åt övermodet.

Mitt rike behöfver du ej ta dig an,          28
jag skyddar det själv; vill du bli min man,
en plats är ledig
ibland mitt husfolk, den kan jag ge dig."--

"Din man blir jag knappast", var Fritiofs svar, 29
"är man för mig själv, som min fader var.
Ur silverskida
flyg, Angurvadel, du får ej bida!"

I solen glänste den klinga blå,             30
och runorna lågade röda därpå.
"Du Angurvadel,
du är dock", sad' Fritiof, "av gammal adel.

Och vore det ej för högens fred,           31
på stället jag högge dig, svartekung, ned.
Vill dock dig lära
en ann' gång ej komma mitt svärd för nära."--

Så sagt, han klöv i ett hugg allen        32
kung Helges guldsköld, som hängde på gren.
I två halvrundor
han klang emot högen, det klang inunder.

"Väl träffat, min klinga! Ligg nu och dröm 33
om högre bedrifter; till dess förgöm
de runolågor.
Nu segla vi hem över mörkblå vågor."


V.

KUNG RING.

Och kung Ring sköt tillbaka sin guldstol från bord, och kämpar   1
  och skalder
uppstego att lyssna till kungens ord, berömd i Nord;
han var vis som gud Mimer och from som Balder.

Hans land var som lunden, där gudar bo, och vapnen komma        2
ej inom dess gröna, dess skuggiga ro, och gräsen gro
fridlysta därstädes, och rosorna blomma.

Rättvisan satt ensam, båd' sträng och huld, på domarstolen,    3
och friden betalte vart år sin skuld, och kornets guld
låg strött över landet och sken i solen.

Och snäckorna kommo med bringa svart, med vita vingar,        4
från hundrade land och förde från vart mångfaldig art
av rikdom, som rikdomen tingar.

Men frihet bodde hos friden kvar i glad förening,            5
och alla älskade landets far, fast en och var
fritt sade på tinget sin mening.

I tretti vintrar han fredlig och säll styrt Nordlands söner, 6
och ingen gått missnöjd hem till sitt tjäll, och varje kväll
hans namn gick till Oden med folkets böner.

Och kung Ring sköt tillbaka sin guldstol från bord, och alla glade 7
uppstego att lyssna till kungens ord, berömd i Nord;
men han suckade djupt och talte och sade:

"Min drottning sitter i Folkvangs loft på purpurtäcken,     8
men här är det gräs över hennes stoft, och blomsterdoft
kringånga dess gravhög vid bäcken.

Ej får jag drottning så god, så skön, mitt rikes ära.      9
Till gudarna gick hon, till Valhalls lön; men landets bön,
och barnens, en moder begära.

Kung Bele, som ofta kom till min sal med sommarvinden,    10
har lämnat en dotter; hon är mitt val, den lilja smal
med morgonrodnad på kinden.

Jag vet, hon är ung, och den unga mö helst blomman plockar; 11
men jag gått i frö, och vintrarna strö alltren sin snö
i kungens de glesnade lockar.

Men kan hon älska en redlig man med vitt i håren,         12
och vill hon ta sig de späda an,
vars mor försvann,
så bjuder Hösten sin tron åt Våren.

Ta'n guld ur valven, ta'n smycken åt brud ur skåp af eke; 13
och följen, I skalder, med harpoljud, ty sångens gud
är med då vi frie, är med då vi leke!"--

Och ut drogo svenner med buller och bång,                14
med guld och böner, och skalderna följde, en rad så lång, med hjältesång,
och ställde sig fram för kung Beles söner.

De drucko i dagar, de drucko i tre, men på den fjärde,  15
vad svar kung Helge dem månde ge, åtsporde de,
ty nu de ville å färde.

Kung Helge han offrar båd' falk och häst i lunden gröna, 16
han spörjer båd' vala och offerpräst, vad som var bäst
allt för hans syster, den sköna.

Men lungorna nekade bifall alltjämt, som präst och vala, 17
och då gav kung Helge, den tecknen skrämt, sitt nej bestämt,
ty mänskan bör lyda, då gudar tala.

Men muntre kung Halvdan han log och sad': "Farväl med festen! 18
Kung Gråskägg själv bort rida åstad,
jag hulpit glad
den hedersgubben på hästen."

Förbittrade draga de sändmän bort och budskap bära      19
om kungens skymf; men han svarar dem torrt, att inom kort
kung Gråskägg skall hämna sin ära.

Han slog sin härsköld, som hängde å stam i höga linden. 20
Då simma drakar på vågen fram med blodröd kam,
och hjälmarna nicka i vinden.

Och härbud flögo till Helges gård, som sade dyster:    21
"Kung Ring är mäktig, den strid blir hård; i Balders vård,
i templet jag sätter min syster."

Där sitter den älskande vemodsfull å fridlyst tilja.   22
Hon sömmar i silke, hon sömmar i gull och gråter full
sin barm: det är dagg över lilja.


VI.

FRITIOF SPELAR SCHACK.

Björn och Fritiof sutto båda            1
vid ett schackbord, skönt att skåda.
Silver var varannan ruta,
och varannan var av guld.

Då steg Hilding in. "Sitt neder!       2
Upp i högbänk jag dig leder,
töm ditt horn, och låt mig sluta
spelet, fosterfader huld!"

Hilding kvad: "Från Beles söner       3
kommer jag till dig med böner.
Tidningarna äro onde,
och till dig står landets hopp."

Fritiof kvad: "Tag dig till vara,     4
Björn, ty nu är kung i fara.
Frälsas kan han med en bonde:
den är gjord att offras opp."

"Fritiof, reta icke kungar!          5
Starka växa örnens ungar:
fast mot Ring de aktas svaga,
stor är deras makt mot din."

"Björn, jag ser, du tornet hotar,   6
men ditt anfall lätt jag motar.
Tornet blir dig svårt att taga,
drar sig i sin sköldborg in."

"Ingeborg i Baldershagen           7
sitter och förgråter dagen.
Kan _hon_ dig till strids ej locka,
gråterskan med ögon blå?"

"Drottning, Björn, du fåfängt jagar, 8
var mig kär från barndomsdagar;
hon är spelets bästa docka,
hur det går, _hon_ räddas må."

"Fritiof, vill du icke svara?     9
Skall din fosterfader fara
ohörd från din gård, emedan
ej ett dockspel vill ta slut?"

Då steg Fritiof upp och lade     10
Hildings hand i sin och sade:
"Fader, jag har svarat redan,
du har hört min själs beslut.

Rid att Beles söner lära,        11
vad jag sagt! De kränkt min ära,
inga band vid dem mig fästa,
aldrig blir jag deras man."

"Väl, din egen bana vandra!      12
Ej kan jag din vrede klandra;
Oden styre till det bästa!"
sade Hilding och försvann.


VII.

FRITIOFS LYCKA.

Kung Beles söner gärna dragé           1
från dal till dal att be om svärd!
Mitt få de ej; i Balders hage
där är min valplats, är min värld.
Där vill jag ej tillbaka blicka
på kungars hämnd, på jordens sorg,
men endast gudars glädje dricka
tvemännings med min Ingeborg.

Så länge ännu solen tömmer            2
sin purpurglans på blomstren varm,
likt rosenfärgat skir, som gömmer
en blomstervärld, min Ingborgs barm;
så länge irrar jag på stranden,
av längtan, evig längtan tärd,
och ritar suckande i sanden
det kära namnet med mitt svärd.

Hur långsamt gå de tröga stunder!    3
Du Dellings son, vi dröjer du?
Har du ej skådat berg och lunder
och sund och öar förrän nu?
Bor ingen mö i västersalar,
som väntar dig för länge sen
och flyger till ditt bröst och talar
om kärlek först, om kärlek sen?

Dock äntligt trött av vägens möda,   4
du sjunker ned ifrån din höjd,
och kvällen drar det rosenröda
sparlakanet för gudars fröjd.
Om kärlek viska jordens floder,
om kärlek viskar himlens fläkt.
Välkommen, natt, du gudars moder,
med pärlor på din bröllopsdräkt!

Hur tyst de höga stjärnor skrida,    5
likt älskarn till en mö på tå!
Flyg över fjärden, min Ellida!
Skjut på, skjut på, du bölja blå!
Där borta ligga gudens lunder,
till goda gudar styra vi,
och Balderstemplet står därunder,
med kärlekens gudinna i.

Hur lycklig träder jag på stranden!  6
Du jord, jag ville kyssa dig,
och er, I blommor små, som randen
med vitt och rött den krökta stig!
Du måne, somj ditt skimmer tömmer
kring lund och tempel, hög och vård,
hur skön du sitter där och drömmer,
lik Saga i en bröllopsgård!

Vem lärde dig, du bäck, som talar   7
med blommorna, min känslas röst?
Vem gav er, Nordens näktergalar,
den klagan, stulen ur mitt bröst?
Med kvällens rodnad alfer måla
min Ingborgs bild på mörkblå duk;
den bilden kan ej Freja tåla,
hon blåser bort den, avundsjuk.

Dock, gärna hennes bild försvinne!  8
Där är hon själv, som hoppet skön
och trogen som ett barndomsminne;
hon kommer med min kärleks lön.
Kom, älskade, och låt mig trycka
dig till det hjärta, du är kär!
Min själs begär, min levnads lycka,
kom i min famn och vila där!

Så smärt som stjälken av en lilja,  9
så fyllig som en mognad ros!
Du är så ren som gudars vilja
och dock så varm, som Freja tros.
Kyss mig, min sköna! Låt min låga
få genomströmma även dig!
Ack! jordens rund och himmelns båga
försvinna, när du kysser mig.

Var icke rädd, här finns ej fara;  10
Björn står där nere med sitt svärd,
med kämpar nog att oss försvara,
om det behövdes, mot en värld.
Jag själv, o att jag strida finge
för dig, som jag dig håller nu!
Hur lycklig jag till Valhall ginge,
om min valkyria vore du!

Vad viskar du om Balders vrede?   11
Han vredgas ej, den fromme gud,
den älskande, som vi tillbede,
vårt hjärtas kärlek är hans bud:
den gud med solsken på sin panna,
med evig trohet i sin barm:
var ej hans kärlek till sin Nanna,
som min till dig, så ren, så varm?

Där står hans bild, han själv är nära,  12
hur milt han ser på mig, hur hult!
Till offer vill jag honom bära
ett hjärta varmt och kärleksfullt.
Böj knä med mig! Ej bättre gåva,
ej skönare för Balder fanns
än tvenne hjärtan, vilka lova
varann en trohet, fast som hans.

Till himmeln mera än till jorden   13
min kärlek hör, försmå ej den!
I himmeln är han ammad vorden
och längtar till sitt hem igen.
O den som ren däruppe vore!
O den som nu med dig fick dö
och segrande till gudar före
i famnen på sin bleka mö!

När då de andra kämpar rida       14
ur silverportarna till krig,
jag skulle sitta vid din sida,
en trogen vän, och se på dig.
När Valhalls mor kring bordet bringa
de mjödhorn med sitt skum av gull,
med dig jag ensamt skulle klinga
och viska öm och kärleksfull.

En lövsal ville jag oss bygga          15
på näset vid en mörkblå bukt.
Där låge vi i skuggan trygga
av lunden med den gyllne frukt.
När Valhalls sol sig återtände
--hur klart, hur härligt är dess bloss!--
till gudarna vi återvände,
och längtade dock hem till oss.

Med stjärnor skulle jag bekransa      16
din panna, dina lockars glöd;
i Vingolvs sal jag skulle dansa
min bleka lilja rosenröd;
till dess jag dig ur dansen droge
till kärlekens, till fridens tjäll,
där silverskäggig Brage sloge
din brudsång ny för varje kväll.

Hur vakan sjunger genom lunden!       17
Den sången är från Valhalls strand.
Hur månen skiner över sunden!
Han lyser ur de dödas land.
Den sången och det ljuset båda
en värld av kärlek utan sorg;
den världen ville jag väl skåda
med dig, med dig, min Ingeborg!

Gråt icke! Ännu livet strömmar        18
i mina ådror, gråt ej så!
Men kärlekens och mannens drömmar
kringsvärma gärna i det blå.
Ack, blott din famn mot mig du breder,
blott dina ögon se på mig,
hur lätt du lockar svärmarn neder
från gudars salighet till dig!--

"Tyst, det är lärkan." Nej, en duva   19
i skogen kuttrar om sin tro;
men lärkan slumrar än på tuva
hos maken i sitt varma bo.
De lyckliga! dem skiljer ingen,
när dagen kommer eller far,
men deras liv är fritt som vingen,
som bär i skyn det glada par.

"Se, dagen gryr." Nej, det är flamman   20
av någon vårdkas öster ut.
Ännu vi kunna språka samman,
än har den kära natt ej slut.
Försov dig, dagens gyllne stjärna,
och morgna sen dig långsamt till!
För Fritiof må du sova gärna
till Ragnarök, om du så vill.

Dock, det är fåfängt till att hoppas;   21
där blåser ren en morgonvind,
och redan österns rosor knoppas
så friska som på Ingborgs kind.
En vingad sångarskara kvittrar
--en tanklös hop--i klarnad sky,
och livet rörs, och vågen glittrar,
och skuggorna och älskarn fly.

Där kommer hon i all sin ära!         22
Förlåt mig, gyllne sol, min bön!
Jag känner det, en gud är nära,
hur präktig är hon dock, hur skön!
O, den som fram i banan trädde
så väldig, som du träder nu,
Och stolt och glad sin levnad klädde
i ljus och seger liksom du!

Här ställer jag inför ditt öga       23
det skönaste, du sett i Nord.
Tag henne i din vård, du höga!
Hon är din bild på grönklädd jord.
Dess själ är ren som dina strålar,
dess öga som din himmel blått,
och samma guld, din hjässa målar,
har hon i sina lockar fått.

Farväl, min älskade! En annan,      24
en längre natt vi ses igen.
Farväl! Ännu en kyss på pannan
och en på dina läppar än!
Sov nu, och dröm om mig och vakna
vid middag; och med trogen själ
tälj timmarna som jag, och sakna
och brinn som jag! Farväl, farväl!


VIII.

AVSKEDET.

_Ingeborg_.
Det dagas ren, och Fritiof kommer icke!
I går likväl var redan tinget utlyst
på Beles hög: den platsen valdes rätt;
hans dotters öde skulle där bestämmas.
Hur många böner har det kostat mig,          5
hur många tårar, räknade av Freja,
att smälta hatets is kring Fritiofs hjärta
och locka löftet från den stoltes mun
att åter bjuda handen till försoning!
Ack! mannen är dock hård, och för sin ära    10
--så kallar han sin stolthet--räknar han
ej just så noga, om han skulle krossa
ett troget hjärta mera eller mindre.
Den arma kvinnan, sluten till hans bröst,
är som en mossväxt, blommande på klippan     15
med bleka färger: blott med möda håller
den obemärkta sig vid hällen fast,
och hennes näring äro nattens tårar.

I går alltså blev då mitt öde avgjort,
och aftonsolen har gått ner däröver.         20
Men Fritiof kommer ej! De bleka stjärnor.
en efter annan, slockna och försvinna,
och med varenda utav dem, som släcks,
går en förhoppning i mitt bröst till graven.
Dock, varför också hoppas? Valhalls gudar    25
ej älska mig, jag har förtörnat dem.
Den höge Balder, i vars skygd jag vistas,
är förolämpad, ty en mänsklig kärlek
är icke helig nog för gudars blickar;
och jordens glädje får ej våga sig          30
inunder valven, där de allvarsamma,
de höga makter ha sin boning fäst.
--Och likafullt, vad är mitt fel, vi vredgas
den fromme guden öfver jungfruns kärlek?
Är han ej ren som Urdas blanka våg,         35
ej oskuldsfull som Geflons morgondrömmar?
Den höga solen vänder icke bort
från tvenne älskande sitt rena öga;
och dagens änka, stjärnenatten, hör
mitt i sin sorg med glädje deras eder.      40
Vad som är lovligt under himmelns valv,
hur blev det brottsligt under tempelvalvet?
Jag älskar Fritiof. Ack, så långt tillbaka,
som jag kan minnas, har jag älskat honom;
den känslan är ett årsbarn med mig själv;   45
jag vet ej, när hon börjat, kan ej ens
den tanken fatta, att hon varit borta.
Som frukten sätter sig omkring sin kärna
och växer ut och rundar omkring henne
i sommarsolens sken sitt klot av guld:      50
så har jag även vuxit ut och mognat
omkring den kärnan, och mitt väsen är
det yttre skalet endast av min kärlek.
Förlåt mig, Balder! Med ett troget hjärta
jag trädde i din sal, och med ett troget    55
vill jag gå därifrån: jag tar det med mig
utöver Bifrosts bro och ställer mig
med all min kärlek fram för Valhalls gudar.
Där skall han stå, en asason som de,
och spegla sig i sköldarna och flyga        60
med lösta duvovingar genom blå,
oändlig rymd uti Allfaders sköte,
varfrån han kommit.--Varför rynkar du
i morgongryningen din ljusa panna?
I mina ådror flyter, som i dina,           65
den gamle Odens blod. Vad vill du, frände?
Min kärlek kan jag icke offra dig,
vill det ej ens; han är din himmel värdig.
Men väl jag offra kan min levnads lycka,
kan kasta bort den, som en drottning kastar  70
sin mantel från sig och är likafullt
densamma, som hon var.--Det är beslutat!
Det höga Valhall skall ej blygas för
sin fränka: jag vill gå emot mitt öde,
som hjälten går mot sitt.--Där kommer Fritiof.  75
Hur vild, hur blek! Det är förbi, förbi!
Min vreda norna kommer jämte honom.
Var stark, min själ!--Välkommen, sent omsider!
Vårt öde är bestämt, det står att läsa
uppå din panna.     80

_Fritiof_.
Stå där icke även
blodröda runor, talande om skymf
och hån och landsflykt?

_Ingeborg_.
Fritiof, sansa dig,
berätta vad som hänt! Det värsta anar       85
jag länge sen, jag är beredd på allt.

_Fritiof_.
Jag kom till tinget uppå ättehögen,
och kring dess gröna sidor, sköld vid sköld
och svärd i handen, stodo Nordens män,
den ena ringen innanför den andra,          90
upp emot toppen; men på domarstenen,
mörk som ett åskmoln, satt din broder Helge,
den bleke blodman med de skumma blickar;
och jämte honom, ett fullvuxet barn,
satt Halvdan, tanklöst lekande med svärdet.  95
Då steg jag fram och talte: "Kriget står
och slår på härsköld invid landets gränser;
ditt rike, konung Helge, är i fara:
giv mig din syster, och jag lånar dig
min arm i striden, den kan bli dig nyttig.   100
Låt grollet vara glömt emellan oss!
Ej gärna när jag det mot Ingborgs broder.
Var billig, konung, rädda på en gång
din gyllne krona och din systers hjärta!
Här är min hand. Vid Asa-Tor, det är         105
den sista gång hon bjuds dig till försoning."--
Då blev ett gny på tinget. Tusen svärd
sitt bifall hamrade på tusen sköldar,
och vapenklangen flög mot skyn, som glad
drack fria männers bifall till det rätta.    110
"Giv honom Ingeborg, den smärta liljan,
den skönaste, som växt i våra dalar;
han är den bästa klingan i vårt land,
giv honom Ingeborg!"--Min fosterfader,
den gamle Hilding, med sitt silverskägg,     115
steg fram och höll ett tal, av vishet fullt,
med korta kärnspråk, klingande som svärdshugg;
och Halvdan själv ifrån sitt kungasäte
sig reste, bedjande med ord och blickar.
Det var förgäves; varje bön var spilld,      120
liksom ett solsken, slösat bort på klippan,
det lockar ingen växt från hennes hjärta;
och konung Helges anlet blev sig likt:
ett bleklagt nej på mänsklighetens böner.
"Åt bondesonen--sade han föraktligt--        125
jag kunnat Ingborg ge, men tempelskändarn
syns mig ej passa för Valhalladottern.
Har du ej, Fritiof, brutit Balders fred?
Har du ej sett min syster i hans tempel,
när dagen gömde sig för edert möte?          130
Ja eller nej!" Då skallade ett rop
ur mannaringen: "Säg blott nej, säg nej!
Vi tro dig på ditt ord, vi fria för dig,
du Torstens son, så god som kungasonen;
säg nej, säg nej, och Ingeborg är din!"--    135
"Min levnads lycka hänger på ett ord
--sad' jag--, men frukta ej för det, kung Helge!
Jag vill ej ljuga mig till Valhalls glädje,
och ej till jordens. Jag har sett din syster,
har talt med henne uti templets natt,        140
men Balders fred har jag ej därför brutit."--
Jag fick ej tala mer. Ett sorl av fasa
flög tinget genom: de, som stodo närmast,
sig drogo undan, liksom för en pestsjuk;
och när jag såg mig om, den dumma vantron    145
förlamat varje tunga, kalkat vit
var kind, nyss blossande av glad förhoppning.
Då segrade kung Helge. Med en röst
så hemsk, så dyster som den döda valans
i Vegtamskvida, när hon sjöng för Oden       150
om åsars ofärd och om Helas seger,
så hemskt han talte: "Landsflykt eller död
jag kunde sätta, efter fädrens lagar,
uppå ditt brott; men jag vill vara mild,
som Balder är, vars helgedom du skymfat.     155
I Västerhavet ligger det en krans
av öar, dem jarl Angantyr behärskar.
Så länge Bele levde, jarlen gav
vart år sin skatt; sen har den uteblivit.
Drag öfver böljan hän och indriv skatten!    160
det är den bot, jag fordrar för din djärvhet.
Det sägs--tillade han med nedrigt hån--,
att Angantyr är hårdhänt, att han ruvar
som draken Fafner på sitt guld, men vem
står mot vår nye Sigurd Fafnesbane?          165
En mera manlig bragd försöke du
än dåra jungfrur uti Balders hage!
Till nästa sommar vänta vi dig här
med all din ära, framför allt med skatten.
Om icke, Fritiof, är du var mans niding      170
och för din livstid fridlös i vårt land."--
Så var hans dom, och härmed löstes tinget.

_Ingeborg_.
Och ditt beslut?

_Fritiof_.
                 Har jag väl mer ett val?   175
Är ej min ära bunden vid hans fordran?
Den skall jag lösa, om ock Angantyr
förgömt sitt lumpna guld i Nastrands floder.
I dag ännu far jag.

_Ingeborg_.
                    Och lämnar mig?

_Fritiof_.
Nej, icke lämnar dig, du följer med.       180

_Ingeborg_.
Omöjligt!

_Fritiof_.
          Hör mig, hör mig, förrn du svarar!
Din vise broder Helge tycks ha glömt,
att Angantyr var vän utav min fader,
liksom av Bele; kanske giver han          185
med godo vad jag fordrar; men om icke,
en väldig övertalare, en skarp,
har jag, han hänger vid min vänstra sida.
Det kära guldet skickar jag till Helge,
och därmed löser jag oss bägge från       190
den krönte hycklarns offerkniv för alltid.
Men själva, sköna Ingborg, hissa vi
Ellidas segel över okänd våg;
hon gungar oss till någon vänlig strand,
som skänker fristad åt en bil tog kärlek. 195
Vad är mig Norden, vad är mig ett folk,
som bleknar för ett ord av sina diar
och vill med fräcka händer gripa i
mitt hjärtas helgedom, mitt väsens blomkalk?
Vid Freja, det skall icke lyckas dem.     200
En usel träl är bunden vid den torva,
där han blef född, men jag vill vara fri,
så fri som bergens vind. En handfull stoft
utav min faders hög och en av Beles
få ännu rum om skeppsbord; det är allt    205
vad vi behöva utav fosterjorden.
Du älskade, det finns en annan sol
än den, som bleknar över dessa snöberg;
det finns en himmel, skönare än här,
och milda stjärnor med gudomlig glans     210
se ner därfrån i varma sommarnätter,
i lagerlundar på ett troget par.
Min fader, Torsten Vikingsson, for vida
omkring i härnad och förtalte ofta
vid brasans sken i långa vinterkvällar    215
om Greklands hav och öarna däri,
de gröna lunder i den blanka böljan.
Ett mäktigt släkte bodde fordom där
och höga gudar uti marmortempel.
Nu stå de övergifna, gräset frodas        220
å öde stigar, och en blomma växer
ur runorna, som tala forntids vishet;
och smärta pelarstammar grönska där,
omlindade av Söderns rika rankor.
Men runtomkring bär jorden av sig själv   225
en osådd skörd, vad människan behöfver,
och gyllne äpplen glöda mellan löven,
och röda druvor hänga på var gren
och svälla yppiga som dina läppar.
Där, Ingeborg, där bygga vi i vågen       230
ett litet Norden, skönare än här;
och med vår trogna kärlek fylla vi
de lätta tempelvalven, fägna än
med mänsklig lycka de förgätna gudar.
När seglarn då med slappa dukar gungar    235
--ty stormen trivs ej där--förbi vår ö
i aftonrodnans sken och blickar glad
från rosenfärgad bölja upp mot stranden,
då skall han skåda uppå templets tröskel
den nya Freja--Afrodite, tror jag,        240
hon nämns i deras språk--och undra på
de gula lockar, flygande i vinden,
och ögon, ljusare än Söderns himmel.
Och efter hand kring henne växer opp
ett litet tempelsläkte utav alfer         245
med kinder, där du tror att Södern satt
i Nordens drivor alla sina rosor.--
Ack, Ingeborg, hur skön, hur nära står
all jordisk lycka för två trogna hjärtan!
Blott de ha mod att gripa henne fatt,     250
hon följer villigt med och bygger dem
ett Vingolv redan här inunder molnen.
Kom, skynda! varje ord, som talas än,
tar bort ett ögonblick ifrån vår sällhet.
Allt är berett, Ellida spänner redan      255
de mörka örnevingarna till flykt,
och friska vindar visa vägen från,
för evigt från den vantrofyllda stranden.
Vi dröjer du?

_Ingeborg_.
              Jag kan ej följa dig.       270

_Fritiof_.
Ej följa mig?

_Ingeborg_.
              Ack, Fritiof, du är lycklig!
Du följer ingen, du går själv förut,
som stammen på ditt drakskepp, men vid rodret
din egen vilja står och styr din fart     265
med stadig hand utöver vreda vågor.
Hur annorlunda är det ej med mig!
Mitt öde vilar uti andras händer,
de släppa ej sitt rov, fastän det blöder;
och offra sig och klaga och förtyna       270
i långsam sorg är kungadotterns frihet.

_Fritiof_.
Är du ej fri, så snart du vill?--I högen
din fader sitter.

_Ingeborg_.
                  Helge är min fader,
är i min faders ställe; av hans bifall   275
beror min hand, och Beles dotter stjäl
sin lycka ej, hur nära ock den ligger.
Vad vore kvinnan, om hon slet sig lös
ifrån de band, varmed Allfader fäst
invid den starke hennes svaga väsen?     280
Den bleka vattenliljan liknar hon:
med vågen stiger hon, med vågen faller,
och seglarns köl går över henne fram
och märker icke, att han skär dess stängel.
Det är nu hennes öde; men likväl,        285
så länge roten hänger fast i sanden,
har växten än sitt värde, lånar färgen
av bleka syskonstjärnor ovanfrån,
en stjärna själv uppå de blåa djupen.
Men rycker hon sig lös, då driver hon,   290
ett vissnat blad, omkring den öde böljan.
Förliden natt--den natten var förfärlig,
jag väntade dig ständigt, och du kom ej,
och nattens barn, de allvarsamma tankar
med svarta lockar, gingo jämt förbi      295
mitt vakna öga, brinnande och tårlöst;
och Balder själv, blodlöse guden, såg
med blickar fulla utav hot uppå mig--
förliden natt har jag betänkt mitt öde,
och mitt beslut är fattat: jag blir kvar,  300
ett lydigt offer vid min broders altar.
Dock var det väl, att jag ej hört dig då
med dina öar, diktade i molnen,
där aftonrodnan ligger ständigt kring
en enslig blomstervärld av frid och kärlek.  305
Vem vet, hur svag man är? Min barndoms drömmar,
de länge tystade, stå upp igen
och viska i mitt öra med en röst
så välbekant, som vore det en systers,
så öm, som vore det en älskares.          310
Jag hör er icke, nej, jag hör er icke,
I lockande, I fordom kära stämmor!
Vad skulle jag, ett Nordens barn, i Södern?
Jag är för blek för rosorna däri,
för färglöst är mitt sinne för dess glöd,  315
det skulle brännas av den heta solen,
och längtansfullt mitt öga skulle se
mot Nordens stjärna, vilken står alltjämt,
en himmelsk skiltvakt, över fädrens gravar.
Min ädle Fritiof skall ej flykta från     320
det kära land han föddes att försvara,
skall icke kasta bort sitt rykte för
en sak så ringa som en flickas kärlek.
Ett liv, där solen spinner, år från år,
den ena dagen alltid lik den andra,       325
ett skönt men evigt enahanda är
för kvinnan endast; men för mannens själ,
och helst för din, blev livets stiltje tröttsam.
Du trives bäst, där stormen tumlar kring
på skummig gångare utöver djupen          330
och på din planka, uppå liv och död,
du kämpa får med faran om din ära.
Den sköna öknen, som du målar, bleve
en grav för bragder, icke födda än,
och med din sköld förrostades jämväl      335
ditt fria sinne. Så skall det ej vara!
Ej skall jag stjäla bort min Fritiofs namn
ur skaldens sånger, icke jag skall släcka
min hjältes ära i dess morgonrodnad.
Var vis, min Fritiof, låt oss vika för    340
de höga nornor, låt oss rädda ur
vårt ödes skeppsbrott dock ännu vår ära,
vår levnads lycka kan ej räddas mer:
vi _måste_ skiljas.

_Fritiof_.
                    Varför måste vi?     345
För det en sömnlös natt förstämt ditt sinne!

_Ingeborg_.
För det mitt värde räddas bör och ditt.
_Fritiof_.
På mannens kärlek vilar kvinnans värde.

_Ingeborg_.
Ej länge älskar han den, han ej aktar.

_Fritiof_.
Med lösa nycker vinns hans aktning ej.   350

_Ingeborg_.
En ädel nyck är känslan av det rätta.

_Fritiof_.
Vår kärlek stridde ej mot den i går.

_Ingeborg_.
I dag ej heller, men vår flykt dess mera.

_Fritiof_.
Nödvändigheten bjuder henne, kom!

_Ingeborg_.
Vad som är rätt och ädelt, är nödvändigt.  355

_Fritiof_.
Högt rider solen, tiden går förbi.

_Ingeborg_.
Ve mig, han är förbi, förbi för alltid!

_Fritiof_.
Besinna dig, är det ditt sista ord?

_Ingeborg_.
Jag har besinnat allt, det är mitt sista.

_Fritiof_.
Välan, farväl, farväl, kung Helges syster!  360

_Ingeborg_.
O Fritiof, Fritiof, skola _så_ vi skiljas?
Har du ej någon vänlig blick att ge
åt barndomsvännen, ingen hand att räcka
åt den olyckliga, du älskat förr?
Tror du, jag står på rosor här och visar   365
min levnads lycka leende ifrån mig
och sliter utan smärta ur mitt bröst
ett hopp, som växt tillhopa med mitt väsen?
Var icke du mitt hjärtas morgondröm?
Var glädje, som jag kände, hette Fritiof,  370
och allt, vad livet stort och ädelt har,
tog dina anletsdrag inför mitt öga.
Fördunkla ej den bilden för mig, möt
med hårdhet ej den svaga, när hon offrar,
vad henne kärast var på jordens rund,     375
vad henne kärast blir i Valhalls salar!
Det offret, Fritiof, är nog tungt ändå;
ett ord till tröst det kunde väl förtjäna.
Jag vet, du älskar mig, har vetat det,
alltsen mitt väsen började att dagas,     380
och säkert följer dig din Ingborgs minne
i många år ännu, varthelst du far.
Men vapenklangen dövar sorgen dock,
hon blåser bort uppå de vilda vågor
och törs ej sätta sig på kämpens bänk,    385
vid dryckeshornet firande sin seger.
Blott då och då, när uti nattens frid
du mönstrar än en gång förflutna dagar,
då skymtar fram bland dem en bleknad bild:
du känner honom väl, han hälsar dig       390
från kära trakter, det är bilden av
den bleka jungfrun uti Balders hage.
Du må ej visa honom bort, fastän
han blickar sorgligt, du må viska honom
ett vänligt ord i örat: nattens vindar    395
på trogna vingar föra det till mig,
_en_ tröst likväl, jag har ej någon annan!--
För mig är intet, som förströr min saknad;
i allt, som omger mig, har hon en målsman.
De höga tempelvalven tala blott           400
om dig, och gudens bild, som skulle hota,
tar dina anletsdrag, när månen skiner.
Ser jag åt sjön, där sam din köl och skar
i skum sin väg till längterskan på stranden.
Ser jag åt lunden, där står mången stam   405
med Ingborgs runor ritade i barken.
Nu växer barken ut, mitt namn förgås,
och det betyder döden, säger sagan.
Jag frågar dagen, var han såg dig sist,
jag frågar natten, men de tiga still,     410
och havet självt, som bär dig, svarar på
min fråga endast med en suck mot stranden.
Med aftonrodnan skall jag skicka dig
en hälsning, när hon släcks i dina vågor,
och himmelns långskepp, molnen, skola ta  415
ombord en klagan från den övergivna.
Så skall jag sitta i min jungfrubur,
en svartklädd änka efter livets glädje,
och sömma brutna liljor uti duken,
tills en gång våren vävt sin duk och sömmar  420
den full med bättre liljor på min grav.
Men tar jag harpan för att sjunga ut
oändlig smärta uti djupa toner,
då brister jag i gråt, som nu----

_Fritiof_.
Du segrar, Beles dotter, gråt ej mera!   425
Förlåt min vrede; det var blott min sorg,
som för ett ögonblick tog vredens dräkt;
den dräkten kan hon icke bära länge.
Du är min goda norna, Ingeborg:
vad ädelt är, lär bäst ett ädelt sinne.  430
Nödvändighetens vishet kan ej ha
en bättre förespråkerska än dig,
du sköna vala med de rosenläppar!
Ja, jag vill vika för nödvändigheten,
vill skiljas från dig men ej från mitt hopp;  435
jag tar det med mig över västervågor,
jag tar det med mig intill gravens port.
Med nästa vårdag är jag här igen;
kung Helge, hoppas jag, skall se mig åter.
Då har jag löst mitt löfte, fyllt hans fordran,  440
försont jämväl det brott, man diktat på mig;
och då begär jag, nej, jag fordrar dig
på öppet ting emellan blanka vapen,
ej utav Helge men av Nordens folk;
det är din giftoman, du kungadotter!          445
Jag har ett ord att säga den, som vägrar.
Farväl till dess, var trogen, glöm mig ej,
och tag, till minne av vår barndomskärlek,
min armring bär, ett skönt vaulunderverk,
med himlens under ritade i guldet             450
--det bästa undret är ett troget hjärta--.
Hur skönt han passar till din vita arm,
en lysmask lindad kring en liljestängel!
Farväl, min brud, min älskade, farväl,
om några måna'r är det annorlunda!            455

_(Går.)_

_Ingeborg_.

Hur glad, hur trotsig, hur förhoppningsfull
han sätter spetsen av sitt goda svärd
på nornans bröst och säger: Du skall vika!
Du arme Fritiof, nornan viker ej,
hon går sin gång och ler åt Angurvadel.      460
Hur litet känner du min mörke broder!
Ditt öppna hjältesinne fattar ej
det dystra djupet utav hans och hatet,
som glöder i hans avundsjuka barm.
Sin systers hand ger han dig aldrig; förr    465
han ger sin krona, ger sitt liv till spillo
och offrar mig åt gamle Oden eller
åt gamle Ring, som nu han kämpar mot.--
Varhelst jag ser, finns intet hopp för mig;
dock är jag glad, det lever i ditt hjärta.   470
Jag vill behålla för mig själv min smärta,
men alla goda gudar följe dig!
Här på din armring dock sig räkna låter
var särskild månad av en långsam sorg;
två, fyra, sex, då kan du vara åter          475
men finner icke mer din Ingeborg.


IX.

INGEBORGS KLAGAN.

Nu är det höst,                         1
stormande häver sig havets bröst.
Ack, men hur gärna jag sute
ändå där ute!

Länge jag såg                           2
seglet i väster, det flög på sin våg.
Ack, det är lyckligt, får följa
Fritiof på bölja.

Bölja, du blå,                          3
sväll ej så högt det går fort nog ändå.
Lysen, I stjärnor, och sägen
seglaren vägen!

När det blir vår,                       4
kommer han hem, men den älskade går
ej till hans möte i salen,
icke i dalen;

ligger i mull,                          5
bleknad och kall för sin kärleks skull,
eller hon klagar och blöder,
offrad av bröder.--

Falk som han glömt!                     6
Du skall bli min, jag vill älska dig ömt.
Själv vill jag mata för ägarn
vingade jägarn.

Här på hans hand                        7
virkar jag in dig i dukens rand,
vingar av silver och rika
guldklor tillika.

Falkvingar tog                          8
Freja en gång och kring rymderna drog,
sökte i norr och i söder
älskade Öder.

Länte du ock                            9
vingarna ut, du ej bure mig dock.
Döden allena mig bringar
gudarnas vingar.

Jägare skön,                            10
sitt på min skuldra och blicka åt sjön!
Ack, hur vi längte och blicke,
kommer han icke.

När jag är död,                         11
kommer han säkert; minns då, vad jag bjöd:
hälsa och hälsa du åter
Fritiof, som gråter!


X.

FRITIOF PÅ HAVET.

    Men på stranden stod     1
    kung Helge och kvad
    med förbittrat mod,
    och till trollen han bad.

Se, då mörknar himlabågen,
dundret går kring öde rum,
och i djupet kokar vågen,
och dess yta höljs med skum.
Blixtarna i molnen draga
här och där en blodig rand,
alla havets fåglar jaga
skrikande emot sin strand.

    "Hårt blir vädret, bröder!
    Stormens vingar hör jag
    flaxande i fjärran,
    men vi blekna ej.
    Sitt du lugn i lunden,
    tänk på mig och längta,
    skön i dina tårar,
    sköna Ingeborg!"

    Mot Ellidas stam            2
    drog ett trollpar till fejd.
    Det var vindkall Ham,
    det var snöig Hejd.

Och då lösas stormens vingar,
och den vilde doppar dem
än i djupet, än han svingar
virvlande mot gudars hem.
Alla fasans makter skrida,
ridande på vågens topp,
ur den skummiga, den vida,
bottenlösa graven opp.

    "Skönare var färden
    uti månens skimmer
    över spegelvågor
    hän mot Balders lund.
    Varmare, än här är,
    var vid Ingborgs hjärta,
    vitare än havsskum
    svällde hennes barm."

    Nu Solundar-ö             3
    står ur våg, som går vit,
    där är stillare sjö,
    där är hamn, styr dit!

Men förvågen viking rädes
ej så lätt på trofast ek,
står vid styret själv och glades
åt de vilda vindars lek.
Hårdare han seglen fäster,
skarpare han vågen skär.
Rakt i väster, rakt i väster
skall det gå, vart böljan bär.

    "Lyster mig att kämpa
    än en stund mot stormen.
    Storm och nordbo trivas
    väl ihop pä sjön.
    Ingborg skulle blygas,
    om dess havsörn flöge
    rädd, med slappa vingar,
    för en il i land."

    Men nu växer våg,        4
    nu fördjupas gõl,
    och det viner i tåg,
    och det knakar i köl.

Dock, hur vågorna må strida,
tumlande nu med, nu mot,
gudatimrade Ellida
trotsar ännu deras hot.
Som ett stjärnskott uti kvällen,
skjuter hon sin fart i fröjd,
hoppar, som en bock på fjällen,
över avgrund, över höjd.

    "Bättre var att kyssa
    brud i Balders hage
    än stå här och smaka
    saltskum, som yr opp.
    Bättre var att famna
    kungadotterns midja
    än stå här och gripa
    roderstången om."

    Men oändlig köld         5
    snöar skyn utur,
    och på däck och på sköld
    smattrar hagelskur.

Och emellan skeppets stammar
kan du icke se för natt,
där är mörkt som i den kammar,
där den döde bliver satt.
Oförsonlig våg, förtrollad,
vill dra seglaren i krav;
vitgrå, som med aska sållad,
gapar en oändlig grav.

    "Blåa bolstrar bäddar
    Ran i djupet åt oss,
    men mig bida dina
    bolstrar, Ingeborg!
    Goda drängar lyfta
    årorna Ellidas,
    gudar byggde kölen,
    bär oss än en stund."

    Över styrbord gick     6
    nu en sjö med fart,
    i ett ögonblick,
    spolas däcket klart.

Då från armen Fritiof drager
lödig guldring, tre mark tung,
blank som sol i morgondager,
var en skänk av Bele kung.
Hugger så i stycken ringen,
konstfullt utav dvärgar gjord,
delar den och glömmer ingen
utav sina män ombord.

    "Guld är gott att hava
    uppå giljarfärden,
    tomhänt träde ingen
    ner till sjöblå Ran.
    Kall är hon att kyssa,
    flyktig till att famna,
    men vi fästa havsbrud
    med det brända guld."

    Med förnyat hot        7
    faller stormen på,
    och då brister skot,
    och då springer rå.

Och mot skeppet, halvt begravet,
vågorna till äntring gå.
Hur man också öser, havet
öser man ej ut ändå.
Fritiof själv kan ej sig dölja,
att han döden har ombord.
Högre dock än storm och bölja
ryter än hans härskarord.

    "Björn, kom hit till roder,
    grip det starkt med björnram!
    Sådant väder sända
    Valhalls makter ej.
    Trolldom är å färde:
    Helge niding kvad den
    säkert över vågen,
    jag vill upp och se."

    Som en mård han flög    8
    uti masten opp,
    och där satt han hög
    och såg ned från topp.

Se, då simmar för Ellida
havsval, lik en lossnad ö,
och två leda havstroll rida
på hans rygg i skummig sjö.
Hejd, med pälsen snöad neder,
skepna'n lik den vita björn,
Ham med vingar, dem han breder
viftande som stormens örn.

    "Nu, Ellida, gäller
    visa, om du gömmer
    hjältemod i järnfast,
    buktig barm av ek.
    Lyssna till min stämma:
    är du gudars dotter,
    upp, med kopparkölen
    stånga trollad val!"

    Och Ellida hör     9
    på sin herres röst,
    med ett språng hon kör
    emot valens bröst.

Och en blodig stråle ryker
utur såret upp mot sky;
genomborrat vilddjur dyker
vrålande til djupets dy.
På en gång två lansar springa,
slungade av hjältearm,
mitt i luden isbjörns bringa,
mitt i becksvart stormörns barm.

    "Bra, Ellida, träffat!
    Ej så hastigt, tror jag,
    dyker Helges drakskepp
    upp ur blodig dy.
    Hejd och Ham ej heller
    hålla sjön nu längre:
    bittert är att bita
    i det blåa stål."

    Och nu stormen flyr   10
    på en gång från sjön,
    blott en svallvåg styr
    mot den nära ön.

Och på en gång solen träder
som en konung i sin sal,
återlivar allt och gläder
skepp och bölja, berg och dal.
Hennes sista strålar kröna
klippans topp och dunkel lund,
alla känna nu de gröna
stränderna av Efjesund.

    "Stego Ingborgs böner,
    bleka mör, mot Valhall,
    böjde liljevita
    knän på gudars guld.
    Tår i ljusblå ögon,
    suck ur svandunsbarmar
    rörde asars hjärtan.
    Låt oss tacka dem!"

    Men Ellidas stam,    11
    utav valen stött,
    går i marvad fram,
    är av färden trött.

Tröttare ändå av färden
äro alla Fritiofs män,
knappast, stödda emot svärden,
hålla de sig uppe än.
Björn på väldig skuldra drager
fyra utav dem i land,
Fritiof ensam åtta tager,
sätter dem kring brasans brand.

    "Blygens ej, I bleka!
    Våg är väldig viking;
    det är hårt att kämpa
    emot havets mör.
    Se, där kommer mjödhorn
    vandrande på guldfot,
    värmer frusna lemmar.
    Skål för Ingeborg!"


XI.

FRITIOF HOS ANGANTYR.

Nu är att säga, huru        1
jarl Angantyr satt än
uti sin sal av furu
och drack med sina män.
Han var så glad i hågen,
såg ut åt blånad ban,
där solen sjöng i vågen
allt som en gyllne svan.

Vid fönstret gamle Halvar   2
stod utanför på vakt.
Han vaktade med allvar,
gav ock på mjödet akt.
En sed den gamle hade:
han jämt i botten drack,
och intet ord han sade,
blott hornet in han stack.

Nu slängde han det vida     3
i salen in och kvad:
"Skepp ser jag böljan rida,
den färden är ej glad.
Män ser jag döden nära;
nu lägga de i land,
och tvenne jättar bära
de bleknade på strand."--

Utöver böljans spegel       4
från salen jarl såg ned.
"Det är Ellidas segel
och Fritiof, tror jag, med.
På gången och på pannan
känns Torstens son igen.
Så blickar ingen annan
i Nordens land som den."

Från dryckesbord helt modig  5
sprang Atle viking då,
svartskäggig bärsärk, blodig
och grym att se uppå.
"Nu", skrek han, "vill jag pröva,
vad ryktet ment därmed,
att Fritiof svärd kan döva
och aldrig ber om fred."

Och upp med honom sprungo    6
hans bistra kämpar tolv,
på förhand luften stungo
och svängde svärd och kolv.
De stormade mot stranden,
där tröttat drakskepp stod,
och Fritiof satt å sanden
och talte kraft och mod.

"Lätt kunde jag dig fälla,"  7

skrek Atle med stort gny,
"vill i ditt val dock ställa
att kämpa eller fly.
Men blott om fred du beder,
fastän en kämpe hård,
jag som en vän dig leder
allt upp till jarlens gård."

"Väl är jag trött av färden",  8
genmälte Fritiof vred,
"dock må vi pröva svärden,
förrän jag tigger fred."
Då såg man stålen ljunga
i solbrun kämpehand,
på Angurvadels tunga
var runa stod i brand.

Nu skiftas svärdshugg dryga,  9
och dråpslag hagla nu,
och bägges sköldar flyga
på samma gång itu.
De kämpar utan tadel
stå dock i kretsen fast.
Men skarpt bet Angurvadel,
och Atles klinga brast.

"Mot svärdlös man jag svänger",  10
sad' Fritiof, "ej mitt svärd,
men lyster det dig länger,
vi pröva annan färd."
Likt vågor då om hösten
de bägge storma an,
och stålbeklädda brösten
slå tätt emot varann.

De brottades som björnar        11
uppå sitt fjäll av snö,
de spände hop som örnar
utöver vredgad sjö.
Rotfästad klippa hölle
väl knappast ut att stå,
och lummig järnek fölle
för mindre tag än så.

Från pannan svetten lackar,     12
och bröstet häves kallt,
och buskar, sten och backar
uppsparkas överallt.
Med bävan slutet bida
stålklädda män å strand;
det brottandet var vida
berömt i Nordens land.

Till slut dock Fritiof fällde   13
sin fiende till jord,
han knät mot bröstet ställde
och talte vredens ord:
"Blott jag mitt svärd nu hade,
du svarte bärsärksskägg,
jag genom livet lade
på dig den vassa egg."

"Det skall ej hinder bringa",   14
sad' Atle, stolt i håg.
"Gå du och tag din klinga,
jag ligger som jag låg.
Den ena som den andra
skall en gång Valhall se:
i dag må jag väl vandra,
i morgon du kanske."

Ej länge Fritiof dröjde,       15
den lek han sluta vill,
han Angurvadel höjde,
men Atle låg dock still.
Det rörde hjältens sinne,sin vrede då han band,
höll midt i hugget inne
och tog den fallnes hand.

Nu Halvar skrek med iver        16
och hov sin vita stav:
"För edert slagsmål bliver
här ingen glädje av.
På bord stå silverfaten
och ryka länge sen,
för er skull kallnar maten,
och törsten gör mig men."

Försonta trädde båda           17
nu inom salens dörr,
där mycket var att skåda,
som Fritiof ej sett förr.
Grovhyvlad planka kläder
ej nakna väggar där
men dyrbart gyllenläder
med blommor och med bär.

Ej mitt på golvet glöder       18
den muntra brasans sken,
men emot vägg sig stöder
kamin av marmorsten.
Ej rök i sal sig lade,
ej sågs där sotad ås,
glasrutor fönstren hade,
och dörren hade lås.

Där sträcka silverstakar       19
ut armarna med ljus,
men intet stickbloss sprakar
att lysa kämpens rus.
Helstekt, med späckad bringa,
står hjort på bordets rund,
med guldhov lyft att springa
och löv i hornens lund.

Bak kämpens stol en tärna      20
står med sin liljehy
och blickar som en stjärna
bakom en stormig sky.
Där flyga lockar bruna,
där stråla ögon blå,
och som en ros i runa
så glöda läppar små.

Men hög å silverstolen         21
satt jarlen i sin prakt;
hans hjälm var blank som solen
och pansar't guldbelagt.
Med stjärnor översållad
var manteln rik och fin,
och purpurbrämen fållad
med fläcklös hermelin.
Tre steg han gick från bordet,  22
bjöd handen åt sin gäst
och vänligt tog till ordet:
"Kom hit och sitt mig näst!
Rätt månget horn jag tömde
med Torsten Vikingsson;
hans son, den vittberömde,
ej sitte fjärran från!"

Då sågs han bägarn råga       23
med vin från Sikelö;
det gnistrade som låga,
det skummade som sjö:
"Välkommen gäst här inne,
du son utav min vän!
Jag dricker Torstens minne,
Jag själv och mina män".
En skald från Morvens kullar  24
då prövar harpans gång.
I välska toner rullar
hans dystra hjältesång.
Men i norräna tunga
en ann på fädrens vis
hörs Torstens bragder sjunga,
och han tog sångens pris.

Nu mycket jarlen sporde       25
om fränderna i Nord,
och Fritiof redogjorde
för allt med vittra ord.
Ej någon kunde klaga
på vald uti hans dom,
han talte lugnt som Saga
i minnets helgedom.

När han därnäst berättar,     26
vad han på djupet såg,
om Helges troll och jättar,
besegrade på våg,
då gladas kämpar alla,
då småler Angantyr,
och höga bifall skälla
till hjältens äventyr.

Men när han talar åter        27
om älskad Ingeborg,
hur ömt den sköna gråter,
hur ädel i sin sorg,
då suckar mången tärna
med kinderna i brand.
Ack, hur hon tryckte gärna
den trogne älskarns hand!

Sitt ärende framförde         28
den ungersven till slut,
och jarlen tåligt hörde,
till dess han talat ut.
"Skattskyldig var jag icke,
mitt folk är fritt som jag:
kung Beles skål vi dricke
men lyda ej hans lag.

Hans söner ej jag känner,     29
men fordra de en gärd,
väl, som det höves männer,
de kräve den med svärd!
Vi möta dem på stranden--
dock var din far mig kär."--
Då vinkar han med handen
sin dotter, som satt när.

Då: sprang den blomstervidja  30
från stol med gyllne karm;
hon var så smal om midja,
hon var så rund om barm.
I gropen uppå kinden
satt Astrild, liten skalk,
lik fjäriln, förd av vinden
allt i en rosenkalk.

Hon sprang till jungfruburen  31
och kom tillbaka med
grönvirkad pung, där djuren
gå under höga träd
och silvermånen skiner
på sjö av segel full;
dess lås är av rubiner
och tofsarna av gull.

Hon lade den i handen        32
uppå sin fader huld;
han fyllde den till randen
med fjärran myntat guld.
"Där är min välkomstgåva,
gör med den vad du vill;
men nu skall Fritiof lova
bli här i vinter still.

Mod gagnar allestädes,       33
men nu är stormens tid,
och Hejd och Ham, jag rädes,
ha åter kvicknat vid.
Ej alltid gör Bllida
så lyckligt språng som sist,
och många valar rida
sin våg, fast en vi mist."

Så skämtades i salen         34
och dracks till dager ljus,
men gyllne vinpokalen
gav glädje blott, ej rus.
Fullbräddad skål vart ägnad
åt Angantyr till slut,
och så i god välfägnad
satt Fritiof vintern ut.


XII.

FRITIOFS ÅTERKOMST.

Men våren andas i blånad sky,
och jordens grönska blir åter ny.
Då tackar Fritiof sin värd och sätter
ånyo ut över böljans slätter,
och glättigt skjuter hans svarta svan   5
sin silverfåra på solblank ban;
ty västanvindar med vårens tunga
som näktergalar i seglen sjunga,
och Ägirs döttrar med slöjor blå
kring rodret hoppa och skjuta på.       10
Det är så skönt, när du stäven vänder
från fjärran segling mot hemmets stränder,
där röken stiger från egen härd
och minnet vaktar sin barndomsvärld
och friska källan din lekplats lögar,   15
men fädren sitta i gröna högar
och, full av längtan, den trogna mön
står på sin klippa och ser åt sjön.--
Sex dar han seglar, men på den sjunde
en mörkblå strimma han skönja kunde     20
vid himlaranden; den växer ut
med skär och öar och land till slut.
Det är _hans_ land, som ur böljan träder,
han ser dess skogar i gröna kläder,
han hör dess forsar med skummigt larm,  25
och klippan blottar sin marmorbarm.
Han hälsar näsen, han hälsar sunden
och seglar tätt under gudalunden,
där sista sommar så mången natt
den glade svärmarn med Ingborg satt.    30
"Vi syns hon icke, kan hon ej ana,
hur när jag gungar på mörkblå bana?
Kanske hon lämnat sin Balders vård
och sitter sorgsen i kungens gård
och harpan slår eller guldet tvinnar."--35
Då stiger plötsligt från templets tinnar
hans falk i höjden och skjuter ned
på Fritiofs axel, så var hans sed.
Han flaxar ständigt med vita vingen,
från skuldran lockar den trogne ingen;  40
han krafsar ständigt med brandgul klo,
han ger ej vika, han ger ej ro.
Han lutar kroknäbb till Fritiofs öra,
det är som hade han bud att föra
kanske från Ingborg, från älskad brud,  45
men ingen fattar de brutna ljud.

Ellida susar nu fram om näset,
hon hoppar glad som en hind på gräset,
ty välkänd bölja mot kölen slår,
men Fritiof munter i stäven står.       50
Han gnuggar ögat, han lägger handen
utöver pannan och ser åt stranden,
men hur han gnuggar, och hur han ser,
han finner icke sitt Framnäs mer.
Den nakna eldstad står upp ur mullen,   55
lik kämpens benrad i ättekullen;
där gården var, är ett svedjeland,
och askan virvlar kring härjad strand.
Förbittrad Fritiof från skeppet hastar,
kring brända tomter han ögat kastar,    60
sin faders tomter, sin barndoms ban.
Då kommer hastigt lurvhårig Bran,
hans hund, som ofta, så käck som trogen,
för honom brottats med björn i skogen.
Han gör i glädjen så många hopp,        65
han springer högt på sin herre opp.
Mjölkvite gångarn med guld i manen,
med ben som hinden, med hals som svanen,
den Fritiof ridit så mången gång,
ur dalen ilar med höga språng.          70
Han gnäggar glättigt, han halsen vänder,
han vill ha bröd ur sin herres händer.
Den arme Fritiof, mer arm än de,
har ingenting att de trogna ge.--

Bedröfvad, husvill--på ärvda grunden    75
står Fritiof, blickar kring svedda lunden,
då gamle Hilding mot honom går,
hans fosterfader med silverhår.
"Vad här jag skådar mig knappt förundrar;
när örn är flugen, hans bo man plundrar.  80
En kunglig idrott för landets fred!
Väl håller Helge sin kungaed
att gudar dyrka och mänskor hata,
och mordbrand heter hans eriksgata.
Det gör mig snarare harm än sorg;       85
men säg mig nu, var är Ingeborg?"--
"De bud, jag bär dig", den gamle sade,
"jag räds, du finner dem föga glade.
Så snart du seglat, kung Ring bröt fram,
fem sköldar väl jag mot en förnam.      90
I Disardalen, vid ån, stod slaget,
och blodrött skummade vattendraget.
Kung Halvdan skämtade jämt och log,
men likafullt som en man han slog.
Jag höll min sköld över kungasonen,     95
jag var så glad åt den lärospånen.
Men länge hölls ej den leken ut;
kung Helge flydde, då vart det slut.
Men som han flydde, den asafrände,
förbi din gård, han i hast den tände.   100
För brödren sattes då två beting:
sin syster skulle de ge kung Ring,
hon ensam kunde hans skymf försona;
om ej, så toge han land och krona.
Och av och an gingo fredens bud;        105
men nu kung Ring har fört hem sin brud."--
"O kvinna, kvinna!" nu Fritiof sade,
"den första tanke, som Loke hade,
det var en lögn, och han sände den
i kvinnoskepnad till jordens män.       110
En blåögd lögn, som med falska tårar
alltjämt oss tjusar, alltjämt oss dårar,
högbarmad lögn med sin rosenkind,
med dygd av våris och tro av vind;
i hjärtat flärden och sveket viska,     115
och mened dansar på läppar friska.--
Och dock, hur var hon mitt hjärta kär,
hur kär hon var mig, hur kär hon är!
Jag kan ej minnas så långt tillbaka,
att hon i leken ej var min maka.        120
Jag minns ej bragd, som jag tänkt uppå,
där hon ej tänktes som pris också.
Som stammar, vuxna från rot tillsamman,
slår Tor den ena med himlaflamman,
den andra vissnar; men lövas en,        125
den andra kläder i grönt var gren:
så var vår glädje, vår sorg gemensam,
jag är ej van att mig tänka ensam.
Nu är jag ensam. Du höga Var,
som med din griffel kring jorden far    130
och skriver eder på gyllne skiva,
låt bli det narrspel, låt bli att skriva!
Med lögner ristar du skivan full,
det skada är på det trogna gull.
En dikt jag minnes om Balders Nanna,    135
men sanning finns ej på mänsklig panna,
det finns ej trohet i mänskobröst--
när sveket länte min Ingborgs röst,
den röst lik vinden på blomsterängar,
lik harpoljudet från Brages strängar.   140
Jag vill ej lyssna till harpoljud,
jag vill ej tänka på trolös brud.
Vart stormen dansar, dit vill jag följa,
blod skall du dricka, du världshavsbölja!
Varhelst en klinga sår högens säd,      145
på berg, i dal, vill jag vara med.
Jag tör väl möta en kung med krona,
mig lyster se, om jag då skall skona.
Jag tör väl möta bland sköldars larm
en ungersven med förälskad barm,        150
en narr, som litar på tro och heder,
den vill jag hugga av ömkan neder,
vill spara honom att stå en dag
besviken, skymfad, förrådd som jag."--

"Hur ungdomsblodet dock kokar över",    155
sad' gamle Hilding, "hur väl behöver
det dock att kylas av årens snö,
och orätt gör du den ädla mö.
Anklaga icke min fosterdotter,
anklaga nornan, vars vreda lotter       160
ej mänskor rubba; de falla från
åskdiger himmel på jordens son.
Väl hörde ingen den ädlas klagan,
hon teg som Vidar i gudasagan,
hon sörjde tyst som i sunnanskog        165
en turturduva, vars make dog.
För mig hon yppade dock sitt hjärta,
i djupet bodde oändlig smärta.
Som vattenfågeln med sårat bröst
till bottnen dyker--det är hans tröst,  170
att dagen icke i såret glöder,
på bottnen ligger han och förblöder--,
så hennes smärta i natt sjönk ned,
jag ensam vet vad den starka led.
'Ett offer är jag', hon sade ofta,      175
'för Beles rike: snöblommor dofta
i fridsmöns lockar, och vintergrönt
kring offret hänges, det är dock skönt!
Jag kunde dö, men det vore skoning;
förtörnad Balder vill blott försoning,  180
en långsam död, kan ej vila få,
dess hjärta klappar, dess pulsar slå.
Men säg för ingen den svagas strider!
Jag vill ej ömkas, ehur jag lider;
kung Beles dotter fördrar sin sorg,     185
men hälsa Fritiof från Ingeborg!'--
När bröllopsdagen nu kom--den dagen
jag gärna sett från min runstav tagen--,
mot templet skredo i långsam färd
vitklädda jungfrur och män med svärd.   190
För skaran tågade dyster sångarn,
men blek satt bruden på svarte gångarn,
blek som en ande, som sitter på
det svarta molnet, när åskor gå.
Jag hov ur sadeln min höga lilja,       195
jag ledde henne på tempeltilja
till altarrunden; där sade hon
åt Lofn sitt löfte med säker ton,
och mycket bad hon till vite guden,
och alla gräto, så när som bruden.      200
Då märkte Helge på hennes arm
din ring, han ryckte den bort med harm;--
på Balders bild nu den gyllne hänger--.
Min vrede styrde jag då ej länger;
jag rev från länden mitt goda svärd,    205
ej mycket var då kung Helge värd.
Men Ingborg viskade mig: 'Låt vara,
en broder kunnat mig detta spara,
dock mycket tål man, förrn man förgås,
Allfader dömer emellan oss.'"--         210

"Allfader dömer", sad' Fritiof dyster,
"men litet också mig döma lyster.
Är nu ej Balders midsommarfest?
I templet är väl den krönte präst,
mordbrännarkungen, som sålt sin syster; 215
mig också litet att döma lyster."


XIII.

BALDERS BÅL.

Midnattssolen på bergen satt,    1
blodröd till att skåda;
det var ej dag, det var ej natt,
det vägde emellan båda.

Baldersbålet, den solens bild,   2
brann på vigda härden.
Snart är ändå lågan spilld,
då rår Höder för världen.

Präster stodo kring tempelvägg,  3
makade bålets bränder,
bleka gubbar med silverskägg
och med flintkniv i hårda händer.

Kung med krona står bredvid,     4
sysslar kring altarrunden.
Hör! Då klinga i midnattstid
vapen i offerlunden.

"Björn, håll endast dörren till, 5
fångna äro de alle.
Ut eller in om någon vill,
klyv hans huvudskalle!"

Blek vart kungen, alltför väl    6
kände han den rösten.
Fram steg Fritiof med vredgad själ,
kvad som en storm om hösten:

"Här är skatten, som du bjöd     7
hämtas från västervågor.
Tag den! Sedan på liv och död
slåss vi vid Balders lågor;

sköld på ryggen, barmen bar,     8
ingen skall striden klandra.
Första hugget som kung du har,
glöm ej, mitt är det andra.

Blicka ej åt dörren så!          9
Räv är fångad i kula.
Tank på Framnäs, tänk uppå
systern med lockar gula!"--

Så han talte med hjältefog,      10
drog ur gördel pungen;
föga varsamt han den slog
mitt i pannan på kungen.

Blodet frusade ut ur mund,       11
svart det blev för öga:
dånad låg vid altarrund
asafränden höga.

"Tål du ej ditt eget guld,       12
fegaste i ditt rike?
Angurvadel vill ej ha skuld
att ha fällt din like.

Stilla, präster med offerkniv,   13
bleka månskensförstar!
Kunde gälla ert usla liv,
ty min klinga törstar.

Vite Balder, styr din harm,      14
se ej på mig så mulen!
Ringen, som du bär på arm,
med förlov, han är stulen.

Ej för dig, så vitt jag vet,     15
smiddes han av Vaulunder.
Våldet rånade, jungfrun grät,
bort med de nidingsfunder!"--

Tappert drog han, men ring och arm  16
voro som grodda samman:
när den lossnade, stöp av harm
guden i offerflamman.

Hör! det knattrar, lågan slår     17
guldtand i tak och sparrar.
Dödsblek Björn i porten står,
Fritiof blygs, att han darrar.

"Öppna dörren, släpp folket ut!   18
Vakt ej mer jag behöver.
Templet brinner, gjut vatten, gjut
hela havet däröver!"

Nu från templet och ned till strand  19
knyts en kedja av händer,
böljan vandrar från hand till hand,
fräser mot svedda bränder.

Fritiof sitter som regnets gud    20
högt på bjälken och flödar,
delar till alla sitt härskarbud,
lugn bland de heta dödar.

Fåfängt! Elden tar överhand,      21
rökmoln virvla och välta,
guldet droppar på glödhet sand,
silverplåtarna smälta.

Allt förlorat! Ur halvbränd sal   22
eldröd hane sig svingar,
sitter på takets ås och gal,
flaxar med lösta vingar.

Morgonvinden spelar från norr,    23
högt det mot himmeln blossar.
Balderslunden är sommartorr,
lågan är hungrig och frossar.

Rasande far hon från gren till gren,  24
än har hon långt till målet.
Eja, vad vilt, vad rysligt sken!
Väldigt är Baldersbålet.

Hör, hur det knakar i rämnad rot,  25
se, hur topparna glöda!
Vad är människokraft emot
Muspels söner, de röda!

Eldhav böljar i Balders lund,      26
strandlöst svalla dess vågor.
Sol går opp, men fjärd och sund
spegla blott avgrundslågor.

Aska är templet inom kort,         27
aska tempellunden;
sorgsen drager Fritiof bort,
gråter i morgonstunden.


XIV.

FRITIOF GÅR I LANDSFLYKT.

På skeppsdäck satt
i sommarnatt
bedrövad hjälte.
Som vågor välte
än sorg, än harm      5
uti hans barm;
och tempelbranden
rök än från stranden.
"Du tempelrök,
flyg högt och sök,    10
sök opp Valhalla
och nederkalla
den Vites hämnd,
åt mig bestämd!
Flyg dit och skvallra,  15
så valven skallra,
om tempelrund,
förbränd till grund;
om träbelätet,
som föll från sätet    20
och brände ned
som annan ved;
om lunden sedan,
fridlyst, alltsedan
svärd bands vid länd-- 25
nu är han bränd,
fick ej den heder
att ruttna neder!--
Det där, med mer,
som var man ser,       30
glöm ej att föra
till Balders öra,
du töckenbud
till töcknig gud!

Helt visst besjungen   35
blir milde kungen,
som bannlyst mig,
ej just från sig,
men från sitt rike.
Välan, vi vike         40
till riken blå,
där vågor gå.
Du får ej vila,
du måste ila,
Ellida, ut             45
till världens slut.
Du måste vagga
i saltad fragga,
min drake god;
en droppe blod         50
ej heller skadar,
evar du vadar.
I stormens sus
är du mitt hus;
det andra brände       55
gud Balders frände.
Du är min Nord,
min fosterjord;
ifrån den andra
jag måste vandra.      60
Du är min brud
i becksvart skrud;
ty på den vita
var ej att lita.--

Du fria hav,           65
du vet ej av
kung, som förtrycker
med härskarnycker.
Din kung är den
bland fria män,        70
som aldrig skälver,
hur högt du välver
i retad harm
vitskummig barm.
De blåa fälten         75
förnöja hjälten.
Hans kölar gå
som plog därpå,
och blodregn dugga
i ekens skugga,        80
men stålblankt är
utsädet där.
De fälten bära
sin skörd av ära,
sin skörd av guld.     85
Bliv du mig huld,
du vilda bölja!
Dig vill jag följa.
Min faders hög
står still, och trög,  90
och vågor döna
omkring den gröna.
Min skall bli blå,
med havsskum på,
skall ständigt simma   95
i storm och dimma
och dra allt fler
i djupet ner.--
Du blev mig givet
till hem i livet,      100
du blir min grav,
du fria hav!"

Så kvad den vilde.
Med sorg sig skilde
hans trogna stäv       105
från välkänd säv.
Han vaggar sakta
bland skär, som vakta
ännu i Nord
den grunda fjord.      110
Men hämnden vakar:
med tio drakar
kung Helge sam
i sundet fram.
Då ropte alla:         115
"Nu kung vill falla.
Ett slag han ger;
ej trives mer
valhallasonen
inunder månen,         120
vill ovanom,
varfrån han kom;
den gudabloden
vill hem till Oden."

Knappt var det sagt,   125
förrn osedd makt
vid köln sig hakar
på Helges drakar.
Allt mer och mer
de dragas ner          130
till Ranas döda,
och själv med möda
kung Helge sam
från halvdränkt stam.--

Men Björn den glade     135
log högt och sade:
"Du asablod,
den list var god.
Mig ingen sporrat,
jag skeppen borrat      140
förliden natt,
ett lovligt spratt!
Jag hoppas, Bana
af gammal vana
dem håller kvar;        145
men skada var,
att icke drotten
gick med till botten."

I vredesmod
kung Helge stod,        150
knappt frälst ur vågen.
Han spände bågen,
stålgjuten, rund,
mot klippig grund.
Han själv ej kände,     155
hur hårt han spände,
tills med en klang
stålbågen sprang.

Men Fritiof väger
sin lans och säger:     160
"En dödsörn bär
jag bunden här.
Om ut den flöge,
då låge höge
kungsniding fälld       165
för våld och väld.
Men frukta icke,
min lans ej dricke
den feges blod!
Den är för god          170
för de bedrifter.
På runogrifter
han ristas må,
men icke på
de nidingsstänger,      175
där ditt namn hänger.
Ditt mandomsrön
försjönk i sjön.
Till lands ej heller
det mycket gäller.      180
Rost bryter stål,
ej du; ett mål
mer högt än detta
vill jag mig sätta.
Giv akt, hur vitt       185
det går från ditt."--

Då tar han furen,
till åra skuren,
en mastfur fälld
i Gudbrands däld.       190
Han tar dess make
och ror sin drake.
Han ror med kraft:
som rörpils skaft,
som kallbräckt klinga,   195
de åror springa.--

Nu sol går opp
bak fjällens topp,
och vinden ljuder
från land och bjuder     200
var våg till dans
i morgonglans.
På böljans toppar
Ellida hoppar
i fröjd åstad;           205
men Fritiof kvad:

"Heimskringlas panna,
du höga Nord!
Jag får ej stanna
uppå din jord.           210
Från dig att stamma
jag yvs med skäl.
Nu, hjälteamma,
farväl, farväl!

Farväl, du höga          215
valhallastol,
du nattens öga,
midsommarsol!
Du klara himmel,
lik hjältens själ,       220
du stjärnevimmel,
farväl, farväl!

Farväl, I fjällar,
där äran bor!
I runohällar             225
för väldig Tor!
I blåa sjöar,
jag känt'å väl,
I skär och öar,
farväl, farväl!          230

Farväl, I högar
vid bölja blå,
dem linden snögar
sitt blomdoft på;
men Saga dömer           235
med rättvis själ
vad jorden gömmer:
farväl, farväl!
Farväl, I lunder,
I gröna hus,             240
jag lekt inunder
vid bäckens sus!
I barndomsvänner,
som ment mig väl,
jag än er känner;        245
farväl, farväl!
Min kärlek gäckad,
min gård är bränd,
min ära fläckad,
i landsflykt sänd!       250
Från jord vi vädje
till havet väl,
men livets glädje,
farväl, farväl!"


XV.

VIKINGABALK.


Nu han svävade kring på det ödsliga hav, han for vida     1
  som jagande falk;
men för kämpar ombord skrev han lagar och rätt. Vill
  du höra hans vikingabalk?

"Ej må tältas å skepp, ej må sovas i hus: inom salsdörr   2
  blott fiender stå.
Viking sove på sköld och med svärdet i hand, och till
  tält har han himmeln den blå.

Kort är hammarens skaft hos den segrande Tor, blott       3
  en aln långt är svärdet hos Frej.
Det är nog; har du mod, gå din fiende när, och för kort
  är din klinga då ej.

När det stormar med makt, hissa seglen i topp! det är     4
  lustigt på stormande hav.
Låt det gå, låt det gå! den, som stryker, är feg; förrn
  du stryker, gå hellre i krav!

Mö är fridlyst å land, får ej komma ombord: var det       5
  Freja, hon sveke dig dock;
ty den gropen på kind är den falskaste grop, och ett nät
  är den flygande lock.

Vin är Valfaders dryck, och ett rus är dig unt, om du     6
  endast med sansning det bär:
den, som raglar å land, kan stå upp, men till Ran, till
  den sövande, raglar du här.

Seglar krämare fram, må du skydda hans skepp, men         7
  den svage ej vägre dig tull!
Du är kung på din våg, han är slav av sin vinst, och
  ditt stål är så gott som hans gull.

Gods må skiftas å däck genom tärning och lott: hur den    8
  faller, beklaga ej dig!
Men sjökonungen själv kastar tärningen ej, han behåller
  blott äran för sig.

Nu syns vikingaskepp, då är äntring och strid, det går    9
  hett under sköldarna till;
Om du viker ett steg, har du avsked från oss, det är
  lagen, gör sen som du vill!

När du segrat, var nöjd! Den, som beder om frid, har      10
  ej svärd, är din fiende ej;
bön är valhallabarn, hör den bleknades röst, den är
  niding, som ger henne nej.

Sår är vikingavinst, och det pryder sin man, när på bröst 11
  eller panna det står;
låt det blöda, förbind det, sen dygnet är om men ej förr,
  vill du hälsas för vår."--

Så han ristade lag, och hans namn med var dag växte       12
  vida på främmande kust,
och sin like han fann ej på blånande sjö, och hans
  kämpar de stridde med lust.

Men han själv satt vid rodret och blickade mörk, han      13
  såg ned i det vaggande blå:
"Du är djup; i ditt djup trives friden kanske, men hon
  trives ej ovanuppå.

Är den Vite mig vred, må han taga sitt svärd, jag vill    14
  falla, om så är bestämt;
men han sitter i skyn, skickar tankarna ned, som förmörka
  mitt sinne alltjämt."--

Dock, när striden är när, tar hans sinne sin flykt, stiger 15
  djärvt som den vilade örn,
och hans panna är klar, och hans stämma är hög, och
  som Ljungaren står han i förn.

Så han sam ifrån seger till seger alltjämt, han var trygg  16
  på den skummande grav,
och han synte i Söder båd öar och skär, och så kom
  han till Grekelands hav.

När han lunderna såg, som ur vågorna stå, med de           17
  lutande templen uti,
vad han tänkte, vet Freja, och skalden det vet, I, som
  älsken, I veten det, I!

"Här vi skulle ha bott, här är ö, här är lund, här är      18
  templet, min fader beskrev:
det var hit, det var hit jag den älskade bjöd, men den
  hårda i Norden förblev.

Bor ej friden i saliga dalarna där, bor ej minnet i pelaregång?  19
Och som älskandes viskning är källornas sorl, och som
  brudsång är fåglarnas sång.

Var är Ingeborg nu? Har hon glömt mig alltren för          20
  gråhårige, vissnade drott?
Ack! jag kan icke glömma; jag gåve mitt liv för att se,
  för att se henne blott.

Och tre år ha förgått, sen jag skådat mitt land, idrotternas  21
  konungasal;
stå de härliga fjällen i himmeln ännu? Är det grönt i min
  fädernedal?

På den hög, där min fader är lagd, har jag satt en lind,    22
  månn' hon lefver ännu?
Och vem vårdar den späda? Du jord, giv din must, och
  din dagg, o du himmel, giv du!

Dock, vi ligger jag längre på främmande våg och tar         23
  skatt och slår mänskor ihjäl?
Jag har ära alltnog, och det flammande guld, det lumpna,
  föraktar min själ.

Där är flagga på mast, och den visar åt norr, och i norr    24
  är den älskade jord;
jag vill följa de himmelska vindarnas gång, jag vill styra
  tillbaka mot Nord."


XVI.

FRITIOF OCH BJÖRN.

_Fritiof_.
Björn, jag är ledsen vid sjö och våg,      1
höljorna äro oroliga sällar.
Nordens de fasta, de älskade fjällar
locka med underlig makt min håg.
Lycklig är den, som hans land ej förskjutit,
ingen förjagat från fädernas grav!
Ack, för länge, för länge jag flutit
fridlös omkring på det vilda hav.

_Björn_.
Havet är gott, det må du ej klandra:       2
frihet och glädje på havet bo,
veta ej av den vekliga ro,
älska alltjämt att med böljorna vandra.
När jag blir gammal, vid grönskande jord
växer jag också väl fast som gräsen.
Nu vill jag kämpa och dricka ombord,
nu vill jag njuta mitt sorgfria väsen.

_Fritiof_.
Isen har nu dock oss jagat i land,         3
runt kring vår köl ligga vågorna döda:
vintern, den långa, vill jag ej föröda
här ibland klippor på ödslig strand.
Ännu en gång vill i Norden jag jula,
gästa kung Ring och min rövade brud;
se vill jag åter de lockarna gula,
höra dess stämmas de älskade ljud.

_Björn_.
Gott, jag förstår dig: kung Ring skall röna,  4
vikingahämnden är föga blid.
Kungsgård vi tända vid midnattstid,
sveda den gamle och röva den sköna.
Eller kanhända på vikingavis
aktar du drotten en holmgång värdig,
eller han stämmes till härslag på is:--
säg, hur du vill, jag är genast färdig.

_Fritiof_.
Nämn mig ej mordbrand, och tänk ej på krig   5
fredlig till kungen min kosa jag ställer.
Han har ej felat, hans drottning ej heller,
hamnande gudar ha straffat mig.
Litet har jag att på jorden hoppas,
vill blott ta avsked av den, jag har kär,
avsked för evigt! När lundarna knoppas,
kanske ock förr, är jag åter här.

_Björn_.
Fritiof, din dårskap jag aldrig förlåter.   6
Klagan och suck för en kvinnas skull!
Jorden, ty värr, är av kvinnor full,
miste du en, stå dig tusen åter.
Vill du, så hämtar jag dig av det kram
hastigt en laddning från glödande Söder,
röda som rosor och späka som lamm,
sen dra vi lott eller dela som bröder.

_Fritiof_.
Björn, du är öppen och glad som Frej,       7
tapper att strida och klok att råda;
Oden och Tor, dem känner du båda,
Freja, den himmelska, känner du ej.
Icke om gudarnas makt må vi tvista:
akta dig, väck ej den evigas harm!
Fort eller sent hennes slumrande gnista
vaknar i gudars och människors barm!

_Björn_.
Gå dock ej ensam, din hemväg kan stängas.   8

_Fritiof_.
Ej går jag ensam, mitt svärd följer med.

_Björn_.
Minns du, hur Hagbart blev hängd i träd?

_Fritiof_.
Den, som kan tagas, är värd att hängas.

_Björn_.
Stupar du, stridsbror, jag hämnar dig väl,
ristar väl blodörn på Fritiofs bane.

_Fritiof_.
Onödigt, Björn, den galande hane
hör han ej längre än jag. Farväl!


XVII.

FRITIOF KOMMER TILL KUNG RING.

Kung Ring han satt i högbänk om julen och drack mjöd,   1
hos honom satt hans drottning så vit och rosenröd.
Som vår och höst dem båda man såg bredvid varann;
hon var den friska våren, den kulna höst var han.

Då trädde uti salen en okänd gubbe in,                  2
från huvud och till fötter han insvept var i skinn.
Han hade stav i handen, och lutad sågs han gå,
men högre än de andra den gamle var ändå.

Han satte sig på bänken längst ned vid salens dörr;     3
där är de armas ställe ännu, som det var förr.
De hovmän logo smädligt och sågo till varann
och pekade med fingret på luden björnskinnsman.

Då ljungar med två ögon den främmande så vasst,         4
med ena handen grep han en ungersven i hast,
helt varligen han vände den hovman upp och ned;
då tystnade de andra--vi hade gjort så med.

"Vad är för larm där nere? Vem bryter kungens frid?     5
Kom upp till mig, du gamle, och låt oss talas vid!
Vad är ditt namn? Vad vill du? Var kommer du ifrån?"
Så talte kungen vredgad till gubben, gömd i vrån.

"Helt mycket spör du, konung, men jag dig svara vill.   6
Mitt namn ger jag dig icke, det hör mig ensam till.
I Ånger är jag uppfödd, min arvgård heter Brist,
hit kom jag ifrån Ulven, hos honom låg jag sist.

Jag red i forna dagar så glad på drakens rygg,          7
han hade starka vingar och flög så glad och trygg;
nu ligger han förlamad och frusen jämte land,
själv är jag gammal vorden och bränner salt vid strand.

Jag kom att se din vishet, i landet vida spord,         8
då mötte man med hån mig, för hån är jag ej gjord;
jag tog en narr för bröstet och vände honom kring,
dock steg han upp helt oskadd, förlåt mig det, kung Ring!"--

"Ej illa", sade kungen, "du lägger dina ord;            9
de gamla bör man ära, kom, sätt dig vid mitt bord!
Låt din förklädning falla, låt se dig, som du är,
förklädd trivs glädjen icke, jag vill ha glädje här."

Och nu från gästens huvud föll luden björnhud ner;      10
i stället för den gamle envar en yngling ser.
Ifrån den höga pannan kring skuldran bred och full
de ljusa lockar flöto liksom ett svall av gull.

Och präktig stod han för dem i sammetsmantel blå,       11
i handsbrett silverbälte med skogens djur uppå.
I drivet arbet' alla den konstnär bragt dem an,
och runt kring hjältens midja de jagade varann.

Och ringens gyllne smycke kring armen satt så rikt,     12
vid sidan häng hans slagsvärd, en stannad ljungeld likt.
Den lugna hjälteblicken kring sal och gäster for;
skön stod han där som Balder och hög som Asa-Tor.

Den häpna drottnings kinder de skifta färg så snällt,   13
som röda norrsken måla de snöbetäckta fält;
som tvenne vattenliljor inunder stormens larm
stå gungande på vågen, så hävdes hennes barm.

Nu blåste lur i salen, och tyst blev överallt,          14
ty nu var löftets timme, och in bars Frejers galt,
med kransar omkring bogen och äpple uti mund,
och fyra knän han böjde på silverfatets rund.

Och konung Ring sig reste i sina lockar grå,            15
han rörde galtens panna och gjorde löfte så:
"Jag svär att Fritiof vinna, fastän en kämpe stor;
så hjälpe Frej och Oden, därhos den starke Tor!"

Med trotsigt löje reste sig främlingen så hög,          16
en blixt av hjältevrede hans anlet' överflög;
han slog sitt svärd i bordet, så det i salen klang,
och upp från ekebänken varenda kämpe sprang.

"Och hör du nu, herr konung, mitt löfte ävenväl:        17
ung Fritiof är min frände, jag känner honom väl.
Jag svär att Fritiof skydda, och var det mot en värld;
så hjälpe mig min norna, därhos mitt goda svärd!"

Men kungen log och sade: "Helt dristigt är ditt tal,    18
dock, orden äro fria i nordisk kungasal.
Fyll honom hornet, drottning, med vin, som du har bäst!
Den främling, vill jag hoppas, i vinter är vår gäst."

Och drottningen tog hornet, som framför henne stod,     19
av urens panna brutet, en kostelig klenod,
på blanka silverfötter, med mången gyllne ring,
med forntidsbilder sirad och runeskrift omkring.

Med nederslagna ögon hon räckte hornet då,              20
men darrande var handen, och vin blev spillt därpå.
Som aftonrodnans purpur på liljorna ibland,
de dunkla droppar brunno på hennes vita hand.

Och glad tog gästen hornet utav den ädla fru;           21
ej tvenne män det tömde, som männer äro nu;
men lätt och utan tvekan, den drottning till behag,
den väldige det tömde uti ett andedrag.

Och skalden tog sin harpa--han satt vid kungens bord--  22
och sjöng ett hjärtligt kväde om kärleken i Nord,
om Hagbart och skön Signe, och vid hans djupa röst
de hårda hjärtan smälte i stålbeklädda bröst.

Han sjöng om Valhalls salar och om einheriars lön,      23
om tappra fäders bragder på fältet och på sjön.
Då grep var hand åt svärdet, då flammade var blick,
och flitigt omkring laget det djupa hornet gick.

Helt skarpt blev där nu drucket allt i det kungahus,    24
varenda kämpe tog sig ett ärligt julerus,
gick sedan bort att sova förutan harm och sorg;
men konung Ring den gamle sov hos skön Ingeborg.


XVIII.

ISFARTEN.

Kung Ring med sin drottning till gästabud far,   1
på sjön står isen så spegelklar.

"Far ej över isen", den främling sad':           2
"han brister, för djupt är det kalla bad."--

"Kung drunknar icke så lätt", sad' Ring,         3
"den, som är rädd, kan gå sjön omkring."

Den främling blickar så mörk med hot,            4
han spänner stålsko i hast på fot.

Slädtravarn sätter med makt åstad,              5
han frustar lågor, han är så glad.

"Sträck ut", skrek kungen, "min travare god,     6
låt se, om du är av Sleipners blod!"

Det går, som stormen går över sjön,              7
den gamle ej aktar sin drottnings bön.

Men stålskodd kämpe står heller ej still,        8
han far dem förbi, så snart han vill.

Han ritar mång' runa i isens famn,               9
skön Ingeborg åker över sitt namn.

Så ila de fram på den glatta ban,                10
men under dem lurar den falska Ran.

Hon stöter ett hål i sitt silvertak,             11
och släden ligger i öppen vak.

Skön Ingeborg vart så blek på kind,              12
då kommer den gäst som en virvelvind.

Han borrar sin stålsko i isen fast               13
och griper i gångarns man med hast.

Då svänger han lätt med ett enda hopp            14
båd' häst och släde på isen opp.

"Det tag vill jag prisa", sad' kungen fort,      15
"ej Fritiof den starke det bättre gjort."

Så vände de åter till kungsgård om;              16
den främmande blev där, tills våren kom.


XIX.

FRITIOFS FRESTELSE.

Våren kommer, fågeln kvittrar, skogen lövas, solen ler,  1
och de lösta floder dansa sjungande mot havet ner.
Glödande som Frejas kinder tittar rosen ur sin knopp,
och i mänskans hjärta vakna levnadslust och mod och hopp.

Då vill gamle kungen jaga, drottningen skall med på jakt, 2
och det hela hov församlas, vimlande i brokig prakt.
Bågar klinga, kogar skramla, hingstar skrapa mark med hov,
och med kappor över ögat skrika falkarna på rov.

Se, där kommer jaktens drottning! Arme Fritiof, se ej dit! 3
Som en stjärna på en vårsky sitter hon på gångarn vit,
hälften Freja, hälften Rota, skönare än bägge två,
och från lätta purpurhatten vaja högt de fjädrar blå.

Se ej på de ögons himmel, se ej på de lockars gull!        4
Akta dig, det liv är smidigt, akta dig, den barm är full!
Blicka ej på ros och lilja, skiftande på hennes kind,
hör ej på den kära stämman, susande som vårens vind!

Nu är jägarskaran färdig. Hejsan, över berg och dal!       5
Hornet smattrar, falken stiger lodrätt emot Odens sal.
Skogens åbor fly med ångest, söka sina kulors hem,
men med spjutet sträckt framför sig är valkyrjan efter dem.

Gamle kungen kan ej följa jakten, som hon flyger fram,     6
ensam vid hans sida rider Fritiof, tyst och allvarsam.
Mörka, vemodsfulla tankar växa i hans kvalda bröst,
och varthelst han än sig vänder, hör han deras klagoröst.

"O! vi övergav jag havet, för min egen fara blind?         7
Sorgen trivs ej rätt på vågen, blåser bort med himmelns vind.
Grubblar viking, kommer faran, bjuder honom opp till dans,
och de mörka tankar vika, bländade av vapnens glans.

Men här är det annorlunda: outsäglig längtan slår          8
sina vingar kring min panna; som en drömmande jag går,
kan ej glömma Balders hage, kan ej glömma eden än,
som hon svor,--_hon_ bröt den icke, grymma gudar bröto den.

Ty de hata mänskors ätter, skåda deras fröjd med harm,     9
och min rosenknopp de togo, satte den i vinterns barm.
Vad skall vintern väl med rosen? Han förstår ej hennes pris,
men hans kalla ande kläder knopp och blad och stjälk med is."

Så han klagade. Då kommo de uti en enslig dal,             10
dyster, hopträngd mellan bergen, överskyggd av björk och al.
Där steg kungen av och sade: "Se, hur skön, hur sval den lund!
Jag är trött, kom låt oss vila! Jag vill slumra här en stund."--

"Icke må du sova, konung; kall är marken här och hård,     11
tung blir sömnen, upp! jag för dig snart tillbaka till din gård."--
"Sömnen, som de andra gudar, kommer, när vi minst det tro",
sade gubben. "Unnar gästen ej sin värd en timmes ro?"

Då tog Fritiof av sin mantel, bredde den på marken hän,    12
och den gamle kungen lade tryggt sitt huvud på hans knän,
somnade så lugnt, som hjälten somnar efter stridens larm
på sin sköld, så lugnt, som barnet somnar på sin moders arm.

Som han slumrar, hör! då sjunger kolsvart fågel ifrån kvist: 13
"Skynda, Fritiof, dräp den gamle, sluta på en gång er tvist!
Tag hans drottning, dig tillhör hon, dig har hon som brudgum kysst,
intet mänskligt öga ser dig, och den djupa grav är tyst."--

Fritiof lyssnar: Hör! då sjunger snövit fågel ifrån kvist:  14
"Ser dig intet mänskligt öga, Odens öga ser dig visst.
Niding, vill du mörda sömnen? Vill du värnlös gubbe slå?
Vad du vinner, hjälterykte vinner du dock ej därpå."--

Så de bägge fåglar sjöngo; men sitt slagsvärd Fritiof tog,  15
slängde det med fasa från sig fjärran i den mörka skog.
Kolsvart fågel flyr till Nastrand, men på lätta vingars par
som en harpoton den andra klingande mot solen far.

Strax är gamle kungen vaken. "Mycket var den sömn mig värd, 16
ljuvligt sover man i skuggan, skyddad av den tappres svärd.
Dock, var är ditt svärd, o främling? Blixtens broder, var är han?
Vem har skilt er, I, som aldrig skulle skiljas från varann!"--

"Lika mycket", Fritiof sade, "svärd jag finner nog i Nord;  17
skarp är svärdets tunga, konung, talar icke fridens ord.
Mörka andar bo i stålet, andar ifrån Nifelhem,
sömnen är ej säker för dem, silverlockar reta dem."--

"Jag har icke sovit, yngling, jag har blott dig prövat så;  18
obeprövad man och klinga litar ej den kloke på.
Du är Fritiof, jag har känt dig, alltsen i min sal du steg,
gamle Ring har vetat länge, vad hans kloke gäst förteg.

Varför smög du till min boning, djupt förklädd och utan namn?  19
Varför, om ej för att stjäla bruden ur den gamles famn?
Äran, Fritiof, sätter sig ej namnlös uti gästfritt lag,
blank är hennes sköld som solen, öppna hennes anletsdrag.

Ryktet talte om en Fritiof, människors och gudars skräck,   20
sköldar klöv och tempel brände den förvågne lika käck.
Snart med härsköld, så jag trodde, kommer han emot ditt land,
och han kom, men höljd i lumpor, med en tiggarstav i hand.

Varför slår du ner ditt öga? Jag var också ung en gång;     21
livet är en strid från början, ungdomen dess bärsärksgång.
Klämmas skall hon mellan sköldar, tills det vilda mod är tömt;
jag har prövat och förlåtit, jag har ömkat och förglömt.

Ser du, jag är gammal vorden, stiger snart i högen in;      22
tag mitt rike då, o yngling! tag min drottning, hon är din.
Bliv min son till dess och gästa i min kungssal som förut!
Svärdlös kämpe skall mig skydda, och vår gamla tvist har slut."--

"Icke", svarar Fritiof dyster, "kom jag som en tjuv till dig; 23
ville jag din drottning taga, säg, vem skulle hindrat mig?
Men min brud jag ville skåda, en gång, ack! blott en gång än.
O jag dåre! halvsläckt låga tände jag på nytt igen.

I din sal jag dröjt för länge, gästar mer ej där, o kung!   24
Oförsonta gudars vrede vilar på mitt huvud tung.
Balder med de ljusa lockar, han, som har var dödlig kär,
se, han hatar mig allena, ensamt jag förkastad är.

Ja, jag stack i brand hans tempel; varg i veum heter jag;   25
när jag nämnes, skrika barnen, glädjen flyr ur gästfritt lag.
Fosterjorden har förkastat en förlorad son med harm,
fridlös är jag i min hembygd, fridlös i min egen barm.

Icke på den gröna jorden vill jag söka friden mer,         26
marken bränner under foten, trädet ingen skugga ger.
Ingeborg har jag förlorat, henne tog den gamle Ring,
solen i mitt liv är slocknad, bara mörker runtomkring.

Därför, hän till mina vågor! Eja, ut, min drake god!       27
Bada åter becksvart bringa lustigt i den salta flod;
vifta vingarna i molnen, väsande de vågor skär,
flyg så långt som stjärnan leder, som besegrad bölja bär!

Låt mig höra stormens dunder, låt mig höra åskans röst!    28
När det dånar runtomkring mig, då är lugn i Fritiofs bröst.
Sköldeklang och pilregn, gubbe! Mitt i havet slaget står,
och jag stupar glad, och renad till försonta gudar går."


XX.

KUNG RINGS DÖD.

Gullmanig fåle,                    1
Skinfaxe, drager
vårsol ur vågen mer härlig än förr.
Morgonens stråle,
dubbelt så fager,
leker i kungssal: det klappar på dörr.

Sorgsen i hågen                    2
Fritiof inträder,
blek sitter kungen; skön Ingeborgs bröst
häves som vågen.
Främlingen kväder
avskedets kväde med darrande röst:

"Böljorna bada                     3
vingade hästen,
sjöhästen längtar från stranden igen.
Ut vill han vada;
bort måste gästen,
bort från sitt land och sin älskade vän.

Dig ger jag ringen,                4
Ingeborg, åter;
heliga minnen bo troget i den.
Giv den åt ingen!
Fritiof förlåter;
mig ser du aldrig på jorden igen.

Ej skall jag skåda                 5
stigande röken
mer ifrån Nordlanden. Mänskan är slav;
nornorna råda.
Böljornas öken,
där är mitt fädernesland och min grav.

Gå ej till stranden,               6
Ring, med din maka,
helst sedan stjärnorna sprida sitt sken!
Kanske i sanden
vräkas tillbaka
Fritiofs, den biltoge vikingens, ben."--

Då kväder kungen:                  7
"Tungt är att höra
mannen, som klagar likt kvidande mö.
Dödssång är sjungen
ren i mitt öra.
Vad är det mer? Den som föds, han skall dö.

Nornornas lottning,                8
huru vi fike,
trotsa vi, klaga vi ej oss ifrån.
Dig ger jag drottning,
dig ger jag rike,
skydda det du åt min växande son!

Väl har jag suttit                 9
vänsäll i salen,
väl har jag älskat den gyllene frid.
Dock har jag brutit
sköldar i dalen,
sköldar på sjön, och ej bleknat därvid.

Nu vill jag rista                  10
geirs-odd och blöda,
strådöd ej höves för nordmannakung.
Ringa är sista
idrottens möda,
mera än livet är döden ej tung."

Då skar han ärligt                11
runor åt Oden,
dödsrunor djupa på bröst och på arm.
Lyste så härligt
droppande bloden
fram mellan silvret på hårvuxen barm.

"Bringen mig hornet!               12
Skål för ditt minne,
skål för din ära, du härliga Nord!
Mognande kornet,
tänkande sinne,
fredelig bragd har jag älskat på jord.

Fåfängt bland vilda,               13
blodiga drotter
sökte jag friden, hon flyktade hän.
Nu står den milda
ätthögens dotter
väntande på mig vid gudarnas knän.

Hell er, I gudar,                  14
Valhallasöner!
Jorden försvinner; till asarnas fest
gjallarhorn budar.
Salighet kröner
skönt, som en guldhjälm, den kommande gäst."--

Sade och tryckte                   15
Ingeborg handen,
handen på son och på gråtande vän.
Ögat han lyckte,
kunglige anden
flög med en suck till Allfader igen.


XXI.

RINGS DRAPA.

Sitter i högen        1
högättad hövding,
slagsvärd vid sidan,
skölden på arm.
Gångaren gode
gnäggar där inne,
skrapar med guldhov
grundmurad grav.

Nu rider rike         2
Ring över Bifrost,
sviktar för bördan
bågiga bron.
Upp springa Valhalls
valvdörrar vida;
asarnas händer
hänga i hans.

Tor är ej hemma,      3
härjar i härnad.
Valfader vinkar
vinbägarn fram.
Ax flätar Frej kring
konungens krona,
Frigg binder blåa
blommor däri.

Brage, hin gamle,     4
griper i guldsträng,
stillare susar
sången än förr.
Lyssnande vilar
Vanadis vita
barmen mot bordet,
brinner och hör:

"Högt sjunga svärden  5
ständigt i hjälmar;
brusande böljor
blodas alltjämt.
Kraften, de goda
gudarnas gåva,
bister som bärsärk
biter i sköld.

Därför var dyre       6
drotten oss kär, som
stod med sin sköld för
fredliga fält:
sansade styrkans
skönaste avbild
steg som en offer-
ånga åt skyn.

Ord väljer vittre    7
Valfader, då han
sitter hos Saga,
Sökvabäcks mö.
Så klungo kungsord,
klara som Mimers
böljor och därhos
djupa som de.

Fridsam förlikar     8
Forsete tvisten,
domarn vid Urdas
vällande våg.
Så satt å domsten
dyrkade drotten,
blidkade händer
blodhämnden bjöd.

Karg var ej kungen,  9
kring sig han strödde
dvärgarnas dag-glans,
drakarnas bädd.
Gåvan gick glad från
givmilda handen,
lätt från hans läppar
lidandets tröst.

Välkommen, vise      10
Valhalla-arving!
Länge lär Norden
lova ditt namn.
Brage dig hälsar
höviskt med horndryck,
nornornas fridsbud
nerifrån Nord!"


XXII.

KONUNGAVALET.

Till tings! Till tings! Budkavlen gå  1
kring berg och dal.
Kung Ring är död: nu förestår
ett kungaval.

Då tager bonden svärd från vägg,      2
det stål är blått.
Med fingret prövar han dess egg,
den biter gott.

De piltar se med glädje på            3
det stålblå sken;
de lyfta svärdet två och två,
för tungt för en.

Men dottern skurar hjälmen ren--      4
blank skall han bli--
och rodnar, när hon skådar sen
sin bild däri.

Sist tar han sköldens runda värn,     5
en sol i blod.
Hell dig, du frie man av järn,
du bonde god!

All landets ära växer ur              6
ditt fria bröst.
I striden är du landets mur,
i frid dess röst.

Så samlas de med sköldegny            7
och vapenbrak
på öppet ting, ty himmelns sky
är deras tak.

Men Fritiof står på tingets sten,     8
hos honom står
den kungason, en liten en
med guldgult hår.

Då går ett sorl kring bondelag:       9
"För liten är
den kungsson, kan ej skipa lag,
ej leda här."--

Men Fritiof lyfte pilten ung          10
på skölden opp:
"I nordmän, här är eder kung
och landets hopp.

Sen här den gamle Odens ätt           11
i bild så skön.
På sköld han känner sig så lätt
som fisk i sjön.

Jag svär att skydda rike hans         12
med svärd och stång
och sätta faderns gyllne krans
på son en gång.

Forsete, Balders höge son,            13
har hört min ed;
och om jag viker därifrån,
slå han mig ned!"--

Men pilten satt på skölden lyft,      14
lik kung å stol,
lik unga örnen, som från klyft
ser opp mot sol.

Den väntan blev det unga blod         15
till slut för lång,
och med ett hopp i mark han stod,
ett kungligt språng!

Då ropte böndren högt på ting:        16
"Vi, Nordens män,
vi kora dig, bliv lik kung Ring,
sköldburne sven!

Och Fritiof före dina bud,            17
tills du blir stor.
Jarl Fritiof, dig ge vi till brud
hans sköna mor."--

Då blickar Fritiof mörk: "I dag       18
är kungaval
men bröllop ej; min brud tar jag
av eget val.

Till Balders hage vill jag gå,        19
har möte stämt
med mina nornor där: de stå
och vänta jämt.

Ett ord jag måste tala med            20
de sköldemör.
De bygga under tidens träd,
och ovanför.

Ljuslockig Balder vredgas än,         21
den bleke gud.
Han tog, blott han kan ge igen
mitt hjärtas brud."--

Då hälsade han nyvald kung,           22
på pannan kysst,
och långsamt över hedens ljung
försvann han tyst.


XXIII.

FRITIOF PÅ SIN FADERS HÖG.

Hur skönt ler solen, huru vänligt hoppar   1
dess milda stråle ifrån gren till gren,
Allfaders blick i aftondaggens droppar,
som i hans världshav, lika klar och ren!
Hur röda färgar hon ej bergens toppar!
O, det är blod på Balders offersten!
I natt är snart det hela land begravet,
snart sjunker hon, en gyllne sköld, i havet.

Först låt mig dock bese de kära ställen,   2
min barndoms vänner, dem jag älskat så.
Ack, samma blommor dofta än i kvällen,
och samma fåglar än i skogen slå.
Och vågen tumlar sig som förr mot hällen--
o, den som aldrig gungat däruppå!
Om namn och bragder jämt den falska talar,
men fjärran för hon dig från hemmets dalar.

Jag känner dig, du flod, som ofta burit   3
den djärve simmarn på din bölja klar.
Jag känner dig, du dal, där vi besvurit
en evig tro, som icke jorden har.
Och björkar, I, uti vars bark jag skurit
de runor många, I stån ännu kvar
med stammar vita och med kronor runda;
allt är som förr, blott jag är annorlunda.

Är allt som förr? Var äro Framnäs' salar  4
och Balders tempel på den vigda strand?
Ack, det var skönt uti min barndoms dalar,
men därutöver har gått svärd och brand,
och mänskors hämnd och gudars vrede talar
till vandrarn nu från svarta svedjeland.
Du fromme vandrare, ej hit du drage,
ty skogens vilddjur bo i Balders hage.

Det går en frestare igenom livet,       5
den grymme Nidhögg ifrån mörkrets värld.
Han hatar asaljuset, som står skrivet
på hjältens panna, på hans blanka svärd.
Vart nidingsdåd, i vredens stund bedrivet,
det är hans verk, är mörka makters gärd;
och när det lyckas, när han templet tänder,
då klappar han uti kolsvarta händer.

Finns ej försoning, strålande Valhalla?  6
Blåögde Balder, tar du ingen bot?
Bot tager mannen, när hans fränder falla,
de höga gudar sonar man med blot.
Det sägs, du är den mildaste av alla:
bjud, och vart offer ger jag utan knot.
Ditt tempels brand var icke Fritiofs tanka,
tag fläcken bort ifrån hans sköld, den blanka!

Tag bort din börda, jag kan den ej bära,  7
kväv i min själ de mörka skuggors spel;
försmå ej ångern, låt en levnads ära
försona dig för ögonblickets fel!
Jag bleknar ej, fast Ljungarn själv står nära,
i ögat kan jag se den blekblå Hel.
Du fromme gud med dina månskensblickar,
dig ensam räds jag och den hämnd, du skickar.

Här är min faders gravhög. Sover hjälten?  8
Ack, han red hän, där ingen kommer från.
Nu dväljs han, sägs det, uti stjärnetälten
och dricker mjöd och gläds åt sköldars dån.
Du asagäst, se ner från himlafälten,
din son dig kallar, Torsten Vikingsson!
Jag kommer ej med runor eller galder,
men lär mig blott, hur blidkas Asa-Balder?

Har graven ingen tunga? För en klinga    9
Den starke Angantyr ur högen kvad.
Det svärd var gott, men Tirfings pris är ringa
mot vad jag ber; om svärd jag aldrig bad--
svärd tar jag väl i holmgång själv, men bringa
du mig försoning ifrån asars stad!
Min skumma blick, min gissning blott du lede,
ett ädelt sinne tål ej Balders vrede.

Du tiger, fader! Hör du, vågen klingar,  10
ljuvt är dess sorl, lägg ner ditt ord däri!
Och stormen flyger, häng dig vid hans vingar,
och viska till mig, som han far förbi!
Och västern hänger full av gyllne ringar,
låt en av dem din tankes härold bli!
Ej svar, ej tecken för din son i nöden
du äger, fader! O, hur arm är döden!--

Och solen släcks, och aftonvinden lullar  11
för jordens barn sin vaggsång utur skyn,
och aftonrodnad körer upp och rullar
med rosenröda hjul kring himlens bryn.
I blåa dalar, över blåa kullar
hon flyger fram, en skön Valhallasyn.
Då kommer plötsligt över västervågor
en bild framsusande i guld och lågor.

En hägring kalla vi det himmelns under--  12
i Valhall klingar hennes namn mer skönt.--
Hon svävar sakta över Balders lunder,
en gyllne krona på en grund av grönt.
Det skimrar över, och det skimrar under
med sällsam glans, ej förr av mänskor rönt.
Till slut hon stannar, sjunkande till jorden,
där templet stått, nu själv ett tempel vorden.

En bild av Breidablick, den höga muren    13
stod silverblank på klippans brant och sken.
Av djupblått stål var pelare var skuren,
och altaret utav en ädelsten:
och dômen hängde, som av andar buren,
en vinterhimmel stjärneklar och ren,
och högt däri, med himmelsblåa skrudar,
med gyllne kronor, sutto Valhalls gudar.

Och se, på runbeskrivna sköldar stödda,   14
de höga nornor uti dörren stå:
tre rosenknoppar i en urna födda,
allvarliga men tjusande ändå.
Och Urda pekar tyst på det förödda,
det nya tempel pekar Skulda på.
Och bäst som Fritiof nu sig sansa hunnit
och gläds och undrar, så är allt försvunnet.

O, jag förstår er, mör från tidens källa,  15
det var ditt tecken, hjältefader god!
Det brända templet skall jag återställa,
skönt skall det stå på klippan, där det stod.
O, det är härligt att få vedergälla
med fredlig bragd sin ungdoms övermod!
Den djupt förkastade kan hoppas åter,
den vite guden blidkas och förlåter.

Välkomna stjärnor, som där uppe tågen!    16
Nu ser jag åter glad er stilla gång.
Välkomna norrsken, som där uppe lågen!
I voren tempelbrand för mig en gång.
Uppgrönska, ättehög, och stig ur vågen,
så skön som förr, du underbara sång!
Här vill jag slumra på min sköld och drömma,
hur mänskor sonas och hur gudar glömma.


XXIV.

FÖRSONINGEN.

Fulländat nu var Balders tempel. Däromkring
stod ej som förr en skidgård, men av hamrat järn,
med gyllne knappar på var stång, ett värn var rest
kring Balders hage: som en stålklädd kämpehär
med hillebarder och med gyllne hjälmar stod        5
det nu på vakt kring gudens nya helgedom.
Av idel jättestenar var dess rundel byggd,
med dristig konst hopfogade, ett jätteverk
för evigheten, templet i Uppsala likt,
där Norden såg sitt Valhall i en jordisk bild.     10
Stolt stod det där på fjällets brant och speglade
sin höga panna uti havets blanka våg.
Men runtomkring, en präktig blomstergördel lik,
gick Balders dal med alla sina lundars sus,
med alla sina fåglars sång, ett fridens hem.       15
Hög var den kopparstöpta port, och innanför
två pelarrader uppå starka skulderblad
uppburo valvets rundel, och han hang så skön
utöver templet som en kupig sköld av guld.
Längst fram stod gudens altar. Det var hugget av   20
en enda nordisk marmorklyft, och däromkring
ormslingan slog sin ringel, full med runeskrift,
djuptänkta ord ur Vala och ur Havamal.
Men uti muren ovanföre var ett rum
med gyllne stjärnor uppå mörkblå grund, och där    25
satt fromhetsgudens silverbild, så blid, så mild,
som silvermånen sitter uppå himmelns blå.--
Så templet syntes. Parvis trädde nu därin
tolv tempeljungfrur, klädda uti silverskir,
med rosor uppå kinderna och rosor i                30
det oskuldsfulla hjärtat. Framför gudens bild
kring nyinvigda altaret de dansade,
som vårens vindar dansa över källans våg,
som skogens älvor dansa i det höga gräs,
när morgondaggen ligger skimrande därpå.           35
Och under dansen sjöngo de en helig sång
om Balder, om den fromme, hur han älskad var
utav vart väsen, hur han föll för Höders pil
och jord och hav och himmel gräto. Sången var,
som om den icke komme från ett mänskligt bröst,    40
men som en ton från Breidablick, från gudens sal,
som tanken på sin älskling hos en enslig mö,
när vakteln slår de djupa slag i nattens frid
och månen skiner över björkarna i Nord.--
Förtjust stod Fritiof, lutad vid sitt svärd, och såg  45
på dansen, och hans barndomsminnen trängde sig
förbi hans syn, ett lustigt folk, ett oskuldsfullt.
Med himmelsblåa ögon och med huvuden
omflutna utav lockigt guld, de vinkade
en vänlig hälsning till sin forne ungdomsvän.      50
Och som en blodig skugga sjönk hans vikingsliv
med alla sina strider, sina äventyr,
i natten neder, och han tyckte själv sig stå,
en blomsterkransad bautasten, på deras grav.
Och allt som sången växte, höjde sig hans själ     55
från jordens låga dalar upp mot Valaskjalf;
och mänsklig hämnd och mänskligt hat smalt sakta hän,
som isens pansar smälter ifrån fjällets bröst,
när vårsol skiner; och ett hav av stilla frid,
av tyst hänryckning göt sig i hans hjältebarm.     60
Det var, som kände han naturens hjärta slå
emot sitt hjärta, som han ville trycka rörd
Heimskringla i sin brodersfamn och stifta frid
med varje skapat väsen inför gudens syn.--
Då trädde in i templet Balders överpräst,          65
ej ung och skön som guden men en hög gestalt,
med himmelsk mildhet i de ädla anletsdrag,
och ned till bältestaden flöt hans silverskägg.
En ovan vördnad intog Fritiofs stolta själ,
och örnevingarna på hjälmen sänktes djupt          70
inför den gamle; men han talte fridens ord:

"Välkommen hit, son Fritiof! Jag har väntat dig,
ty kraften svärmar gärna vitt kring jord och hav,
en bärsärk lik, som biter blek i sköldens rand,
men trött och sansad vänder hon dock hem till slut.  75
Den starke Tor drog mången gång till Jotunheim,
men trots hans gudabälte, trots stålhandskarna,
Utgårda-Loke sitter på sin tron ännu;
det onda viker icke, själv en kraft, för kraft.
En barnlek blott är fromhet, ej förent med kraft;  80
hon är som solens strålar uppå Ägirs barm,
en löslig bild med vågen stigen eller sänkt,
förutan tro och hållning, ty han har ej grund.
Men kraft förutan fromhet tär ock bort sig själv,
som svärdet tärs i högen: hon är livets rus,       85
men glömskans häger svävar över hornets brädd,
och när den druckne vaknar, blygs han för sitt dåd.
All styrka är från jorden, ifrån Ymers kropp;
de vilda vattnen äro ådrorna däri,
och hennes senor äro smidda utav malm.             90
Dock blir hon tom och öde, blir hon ofruktbar,
tills solen, himmelns fromhet, skiner däruppå.
Då grönskar gräs, då stickas blomstrens purpurduk,
och djur och mänskor näras vid sin moders barm.    95 (sic!)
Så är det ock med Askers barn. Två vikter har
Allfader lagt i vågskåln för allt mänskligt liv,
motvägande varandra, när den våg står rätt;
och jordisk kraft och himmelsk fromhet heta de.
Stark är väl Tor, o yngling, när han spänner hårt  100
sitt Megingjard utöver bergfast höft och slår.
Vis är väl Oden, när i Urdas silvervåg
han blickar ner, och fågeln kommer flygande
till asars far med tidningar från världens rund.
Dock bleknade de bägge, deras kronors glans        105
halvslocknade, när Balder, när den fromme föll,
ty han var bandet uti Valhalls gudakrans.
Då gulnade på tidens träd dess kronas prakt,
och Nidhögg bet uppå dess rot, då lossades
den gamla nattens krafter, Midgårdsormen slog      110
mot skyn sin ettersvällda stjärt, och Fenris röt,
och Surturs eldsvärd ljungade från Muspelheim.
Varthelst sen dess ditt öga blickar, striden går
med härsköld genom skapelsen: i Valhall gal
guldkammig hane, blodröd hane gal till strids      115
på jorden och inunder jord. Förut var frid
ej blott i gudars salar men på jorden ock;
frid var i mänskors som i höga gudars barm.
Ty vad som sker här nere, det har redan skett
i större mått där uppe: mänskligheten är           120
en ringa bild av Valhall; det är himmelns ljus,
som speglar sig i Sagas runbeskrifna sköld.
Vart hjärta har sin Balder. Minns du än den tid,
då friden bodde i ditt bröst och livet var
så glatt, så himmelskt stilla som sångfågelns dröm, 125
när sommarnattens vindar vagga hit och dit
var sömnig blommas huvud och hans gröna säng?
Då levde Balder ännu i din rena själ,
du asason, du vandrande Valhallabild!
För barnet är ej guden död, och Hela ger           130
igen sitt rov, så ofta som en mänska föds.
Men jämte Balder växer i var mänsklig själ
hans blinde broder, nattens Höder; ty allt ont
föds blint, som björnens yngel föds, och natten är
dess mantel, men det goda kläder sig i ljus.       135
Beställsamt träder Loke, frestarn fram alltjämt
och styr den blindes mördarhand, och spjutet far
i Valhalls kärlek, i den unge Balders bröst.
Då vaknar hatet, våldet springer opp till rov,
och hungrig stryker svärdets ulv kring berg och dal, 140
och drakar simma vilda över blodig våg.
Ty som en kraftlös skugga sitter fromheten,
en död ibland de döda, hos den bleka Hel,
och i sin aska ligger Balders gudahus.--
Så är de höga asars liv en förebild                145
till mänsklighetens lägre: bägge äro blott
Allfaders stilla tankar, de förändras ej.
Vad skett, vad ske skall, det vet Valas djupa sång.
Den sång är tidens vaggsång, är dess drapa ock,
Heimskringlas hävder gå på samma ton som den,      150
och mannen hör sin egen saga däruti.
Förstån I ännu eller ej? spör Vala dig.--
Du vill försonas. Vet du, vad försoning är?
Se mig i ögat, yngling, och bliv icke blek!
På jorden går försonarn kring och heter död.       155
All tid är från sin början grumlad evighet,
allt jordiskt liv är avfall från Allfaders tron,
försonas är att vända renad dit igen.
De höga asar föllo själva; Ragnarök
är asarnas försoningsdag, en blodig dag            160
på Vigrids hundramilaslätt: där falla de,
ohämnade dock icke, ty det onda dör
för evigt, men det fallna goda reser sig
ur världsbålslågan, luttrat till ett högre liv.
Väl faller stjärnekransen blek och vissnad ner     165
från himmelns tinning, väl försjunker jord i sjön;
men skönare hon återföds och lyfter glad
sitt blomsterkrönta huvud utur vågorna,
och unga stjärnor vandra med gudomlig glans
sin stilla gång utöver den nyskapade.              170
Men på de gröna kullar styrer Balder då
nyfödda asar och en renad mänskoätt;
och runetavlorna av guld, som tappats bort
i tidens morgon, hittas uti gräset då
på Idavallen av försonta Valhalls barn.--          175
Så är det fallna godas död dess eldprov blott,
är dess försoning, födseln till ett bättre liv,
som återflyger skärat dit, det kom ifrån,
och leker skuldlöst som ett barn på faderns knä.
Ack! allt det bästa ligger på hinsidan om          180
gravhögen. Gimles gröna port, och lågt är allt,
besmittat allt, som dväljes under stjärnorna.--
Dock, även livet äger sin försoning ren,
en ringare, den högres stilla förespel.
Hon är som skaldens löpning på sin harpa, när      185
med konsterfarna fingrar han slår sången an
och stämmer tonen, sakta prövande, till dess
att handen griper väldigt uti strängens guld,
och forntids stora minnen lockas ur sin grav,
och Valhalls glans omstrålar de förtjustas syn.    190
Ty jorden är dock himmelns skugga, livet är
förgården dock till Balderstemplet ovan skyn.
Till asar blotar hopen, leder gångarn fram,
guldsadlad, purpurbetslad, för att offras dem.
Det är ett tecken, och dess mening djup, ty blod   195
är morgonrodnan till envar försoningsdag.
Men tecknet är ej saken, det försonar ej:
vad själv du brutit, gäldar ingen ann för dig.
De döda sonas vid Allfaders gudabarm,
den levandes försoning är i eget bröst.            200
Ett offer vet jag, som är gudarna mer kärt
än rök av offerbollar, det är offret av
ditt eget hjärtas vilda hat, din egen hämnd.
Kan du ej döva deras klingor, kan du ej
förlåta, yngling, vad vill du i Balders hus?       205
Vad mente du med templet, som du reste här?
Med sten försonas Balder ej; försoning bor,
här nere som där uppe, blott där friden bor.
Försonas med din fiende och med dig själv,
då är du ock försonad med ljuslockig gud!--        210
I Södern talas om en Balder, jungfruns son,
sänd av Allfader att förklara runorna
på nornors svarta sköldrand, outtydda än.
Frid var hans härskri, kärlek var hans blanka svärd,
och oskuld satt som duva på hans silverhjälm.      215
From levde han och lärde, dog han och förlät,
och under fjärran palmer står hans grav i ljus.
Hans lära, sägs det, vandrar ifrån dal till dal,
försmlälter hårda hjärtan, lägger hand i hand
och bygger fridens rike på försonad jord.          220
Jag känner ej den läran rätt, men dunkelt dock
i mina bättre stunder har jag anat den:
vart mänskligt hjärta anar den ibland som mitt.
En gång, det vet jag, kommer hon och viftar lätt
de vita duvovingar över Nordens berg.              225
Men ingen Nord är längre till för oss den dag,
och eken susar över de förgätnas hög.
I lyckligare släkten, I, som dricken då
strålbägarn av det nya ljus, jag hälsar er!
Väl eder, om det jagar bort var sky, som hängt     230
sitt våta täcke hittills över livets sol!
Förakten likväl icke oss, som redligt sökt
med oavvända ögon hennes gudaglans!
_En_ är Allfader, fastän fler hans sändebud.--

Du hatar Beles söner. Varför hatar du?            235
Åt sonen av en odalbonde ville de
ej ge sin syster, ty hon är av Semings blod,
den store Odenssonens; deras ättartal
når upp till Valhalls troner, det ger stolthet in.
Men börd är lycka, ej förtjänst, invänder du.     240
Av sin förtjänst, o yngling, blir ej mänskan stolt
men endast av sin lycka; ty det bästa är
dock goda gudars gåva. Är du själv ej stolt
av dina hjältebragder, av din högre kraft?
Gav du dig själv den kraften? Knöt ej Åsa-Tor     245
dig armens senor fasta såsom ekens gren?
Är det ej gudens högre mod, som klappar glatt
i sköldeborgen av ditt välvda bröst? Är ej
det gudens blixt, som ljungar i ditt ögas brand?
De höga nornor sjöngo vid din vagga ren           250
drottkvädet av din levnad; din förtjänst därav
är större ej än kungasonens av sin börd.
Fördöm ej andras stolthet, att ej din fördöms!
Nu är kung Helge fallen."--Här bröt Fritiof av:
Kung Helge fallen? När och var?"--"Du vet det själv:  255
så länge som du murat här, han var på tåg
bland finnarna i fjällen. På en ödslig klint
stod där ett gammalt tempel, vigt åt Jumala.
Nu var det stängt och övergivet länge sen,
men över porten ännu en vidunderlig               260
forntidabild av guden lutade till fall.
Men ingen tordes nalkas, ty en sägen gick
bland folket ifrån släkt till släkt, att vem som först
besökte templet, skulle skåda Jumala.
Det hörde Helge, och med blind förbittring drog   265
han uppå öde stigar emot hatad gud
och ville störta templet. När han kom dit upp,
var porten stängd och nyckeln rostad fast däri.
Då grep han om dörrposterna och rystade
de multna stammar; på en gång med rysligt brak    270
föll bilden ner och krossade uti sitt fall
Valhallasonen, och så såg han Jumala.
Ett bud i natt har bragt oss tidningen härom.
Nu sitter Halvdan ensam på kung Beles stol;
bjud honom handen, offra gudarna din hämnd!       275
Det offret fordrar Balder, fordrar jag, hans präst,
till tecken, att du icke gäckat fridsäll gud.
Förvägrar du det, då är templet fåfängt byggt,
och fåfängt har jag talat."--

                             Nu steg Halvdan in   280
utöver koppartröskeln, och med oviss blick
han stod på avstånd från den fruktade och teg.
Då knäppte Fritiof brynjohataren från länd,
mot altaret han stödde sköldens gyllne rund
och trädde obeväpnad till sin ovän fram.          285
"I denna strid", så talte han med vänlig röst,
"är ädlast den, som bjuder först sin hand till frid."
Då rodnade kung Halvdan, drog stålhandsken av,
och länge skilda händer slogo nu ihop,
ett kraftigt handslag, trofast såsom fjällens grund.  290
Förbannelsen upplöste gubben då, som låg
utöver varg i veum, över biltog man.
Och som den löstes, insteg plötsligt Ingeborg,
brudsmyckad, hermlinsmantlad, utav tärnor följd,
som månen följts av stjärnorna på himmelns valv.   295
Med tårar i de sköna ögonen hon föll
intill sin broders hjärta, men han lade rörd
den kära systern intill Fritiofs trogna bröst.
Och över gudens altar räckte hon sin hand
åt barndomsvännen, åt sitt hjärtas älskade.----




NOTES.


[The commentaries of F. W. Lindvall's school edition of Fritiofs Saga
have been extensively reproduced.]


CANTO I.

Stanza 1. _Hilding_ was a yeoman or bonde (see note, canto 2: 1) of Sogn
in Norway and fosterfather of Fritiof and Ingeborg. In viking times the
children of kings and great warriors were often entrusted to the care of
less influential and less wealthy friends to be trained by them, thus
removing the young from the temptations and disturbing influences of
court life and warfare. This practice would also remove them from the
danger of being pampered by fond parents or sycophantic servants.

1. _Ej Norden förr sett två så sköna_. The auxiliary _har_ is omitted.
Such omissions are common in subordinate clauses and in poetry.

6. _Såg_. Subjunctive past, regular form _såge_.

6. _i Frejas Hus_. Freja, or Fröja, wife of Öder, was the goddess of
beauty and love. In her abode, Folkvang, were gathered all the lovers who
had been faithful to each other unto death.

7. _älvkungen_. _Älvor_ or _alfer_ were ethereal beings of great beauty
and with voices that had the clearness of silver. During moonlight nights
especially they danced in dales and groves. _Ljusalfer_, light elves,
personified the benign influences in nature, especially as they manifest
themselves in the realms of light and air. _Svartalfer_, black elves,
lived in the earth and personified the silent forces that operate beneath
its surface. They are perhaps identical with the dwarfs. The elves are
here thought of as having kings and queens just as human beings.

8. _En Kung var ej som han i ära_. A king was not honored as he.

8. _runan_. The runes were the characters of the early alphabet of the
Germans, Anglo-Saxons, and Scandinavians. Runic inscriptions were
generally cut into wood, bone or rock.

9. _fick han Ingborg lära. Fick_ may mean either that he was permitted to
teach Ingeborg or that he must do it because of an irresistible desire to
do so.

10. _båd', både_.

12. _Det första ax, vars guld blev moget_. A striking metaphor meaning
"the first head of grain that ripened and assumed a golden color."

13. _innan kort_, before long.

14. _drog på jakt_. Idiomatic expression for "went hunting."

17. _Valhall(a)_, the home of the gods and the palace of Oden. Hither one
half of the heroes that fell in battle were carried by the valkyrs. Here
they spent their time in feasting and fighting.

18. _ett kornland, som för vinden går_. A field of grain that waves
before the wind.

19. _Idun(a)_, wife of Brage and keeper of the golden apples of youth.

20. _Frigg(a)_, the wife of Oden and queen of the goddesses. She was the
goddess of conjugal and motherly love.

21. _Gerd(a)_, wife of Frej, was the daughter of a giant, but
nevertheless renowned for her wonderful beauty.

22. _Nanna_, wife of Balder, personified pure and tender love. Balder was
the fair god who loved light and lived a life of purity and innocence.
The evil Loke induced Balder's blind brother, Öder, to throw an arrow of
mistletoe at him and he fell dead. When Nanna saw the body of her dead
husband carried out to the funeral pyre, her heart burst with grief.

23. _Hel(a)_, goddess of death and ruler of nine worlds in Nifelhem. She
received all that died of sickness or old age, but it seems that others
also came to her abode. In the deepest abyss of her kingdom was a place
of punishment for the wicked. From her name comes the word "hell" and
Swedish _ihjäl (att slå ihjäl_, to kill).

32. _Oden_, oldest and highest god of the Northern races. His spirit
pervaded everything. He is the source of the higher forms of life.

33. _Allfader_, Oden. He is so called because he was supposed to be the
father of men and of gods.

33. _till smycke_, as an ornament. This use of _till_ is very common in
Swedish.

34. _Beles dotter_. Ingeborg's father was Bele, king of Sogn in western
Norway.

35. _Till Oden ... uppstiger hennes ättartal_. The royal families were
supposed to have descended from the gods
(see note, canto XXIV: 237).

36. _Torstens son_. Fritiof was the son of Torsten Vikingsson, a viking
chief.

37. Observe the numerous expressions of the defiant spirit of Fritiof
prior to his going into exile. Note also in stanzas 37 and 38 his
ingenuity in proving his own high rank.

38. _Tor_, god of thunder and of war, the strongest of the gods. All
noble human strength came from him. He was the friend of man and the
enemy of the giants with whom he had many hard conflicts. His abode,
Trudvang, was marvelously beautiful. When he journeyed forth from
Trudvang, driving a span of he-goats, to meet the giants, thunder and
lightning arose.


CANTO II.

Stanza 1. _bonde_. This term is generally translated by the word peasant.
The word yeoman is often used as an equivalent term and sometimes the
original Scandinavian form _bonde_ is used in English. A _bonde_ was an
independent land-holder, liberty-loving, and, as a rule, an active
participant in public affairs.

3. _mjöd_, mead, a fermented drink made of water, honey and hops with a
flavoring of spices.

5. _altarrunden_. The pagan temples had no altars. The figure is borrowed
from the modern temple.

5. _offerlunden_. The Norse temples were usually surrounded by sacred
groves.

8. _hon_; antecedent is endräkt.

8. _som ringen på lansen_. This refers to the metal ring that served to
hold the point of the lance to the lance itself and thus gave it greater
strength.

11. _På pelarstoder fyra_. According to Scandinavian mythology the
heavens were supported by four dwarfs, _Austre_, East, _Västre_, West,
_Nordre_, North, and _Södre_, South.

13. _Nog svika lungans tecken i offrad falk_. This assumes that the
Norsemen read signs by observing the entrails of animals. Authorities
differ on this point. Some maintain that the poet has here merely
borrowed from classical mythology.

13. _flärd är mången runa, som skärs på balk_. Meaningless or deceptive
is many a rune that is cut in the staff. The early Northmen believed that
the will of the gods could be ascertained by writing runes on sticks of
wood which then were thrown on the ground and read by the priests.

18. _hur vis han het_ (heter). Expression is equivalent to "Hur vis han
än må heta."

18. _högbänk_. In the primitive Scandinavian homes benches were placed
along the four walls. The men had their places along the long walls
(långsidor) and the women along the end walls (kortsidor). At the center
of the two long walls were high seats of honor. The master of the house
occupied the one on the north side and the chief guest the one on the
south side.

21. _till Oden gå_, to die.

22. _Odens fåglar_. Oden is represented as having two birds, Hugin
(thought) and Munin (memory or, according to some authorities, the
longing that impels Oden to activity), which are dispatched to the earth
at every day-break and in the evening return to Oden and whisper into his
ears the news of the day's happenings.

26. _ty vädret rår för årsväxt och vind för lycka_. Equivalent to saying
that man is not himself the absolute master of his own destiny. The
forces of nature can thwart all his plans.

28. Throughout this canto Tegnér draws freely from Havamal, the "Song of
Oden" or the "Song of the Most High," which is replete with precepts on
morality and wisdom. In this stanza this ancient Scandinavian song is
followed very closely. Note the frequent sarcastic references to woman in
the Saga.

32. _norna_. The norns, three in number, weave the fate of men and gods.
Urda was the norn of the past, Verdandi of the present, and Skulda of the
future.

32. _hon stötte på sköld_. The meaning is: Wherever fate threatened with
some danger it was met by courage and vigilance.

33. _de asasöner_. See note, canto I: 35.

33. _Nordlands kungar_, the kings of the Northland.

38. _bautasten_. A monument erected in honor of rulers or heroes.

39. _Frej_, the god of sunshine and warm summer showers, hence also the
god of harvests.


CANTO III.

Line 1. _Voro nu satta i hög_. Were interred.

2. _fjärden_. In this case Sognefjord.

6. _fäste i lugn sin boning på Framnäs_. Took up his abode on Framnäs.
This probably lay on the south side of Sognefjord.

9. _de kullarnas topp. De_ is seldom used in this way. Here supplied for
the sake of the meter.

15. _som längta till stävan_. That yearn to be milked.

23. _till tio tolfter på hundrat_. A so-called _storhundrade_ or great
hundred was 120.

26. _högsätespelare_, the posts of the seat of honor. On it were carved
images of Oden and Frej.

28. _Frej med solen på hatten_. Frej was the sun god and was pictured
with a sun on his helmet.

34. _Östervåg_, Eastern billow, the Baltic. _Västersaltet_, Western salt,
the North Sea, _Gandvik_, the White Sea.

36. _Brage_, the god of poetry and music.

38. _Mimers evigt sorlande våg_. Mimer's ever rippling fountain. The god
Mimer guarded the fountain of wisdom. Oden once pawned one of his eyes
for a drink out of this fountain.

52. _visthus_. These were small houses, separated from the main building,
in which food was kept.

58. _Österland_, Asia.

59. _dvärgarnas eld_. The dwarfs were supposed to be most skillful
smiths.

61. _Gröningasund_, a sound between Seeland, Moen and Falster in Denmark.

62. _het_, abbrev. for _hette_.

63. _Ulleråker_, a royal estate near Uppsala, where judicial assemblies
were held.

68. _Järnhös_. The word means iron skull.

76. _vid solens portar_, in Asia.

79. _Hildur_, the goddess of war. "Hildur's lek" means war.

84. _Vaulund_ was the most skillful smith among the dwarfs. He is called
_haltande_, lame or limping, because Mimer's wife, who was his bitter
enemy, had cut the tendons of his knees.

85. _Tre mark höll han i vikt_. It weighed three marks. A mark was
approximately one half kilogram.

88. _Alfhem_, the realm of air between heaven and earth, was the home of
the elves and of Frej.

90. _Saga_, wife of Oden and goddess of history. She dwelt in Sökvabäck
beneath the stream of time and events, taking note of all she saw. Here
Oden visited her daily to drink the pure water from golden beakers and
listen to her songs about former days.

99. After the death of Balder (see note, canto I: 22) his body was burned
on a great funeral pyre.

100. _Glitner_, "glittering hall," the home of Forsete, the god of
justice.

110. _Bretland_, England.

111. _satt sig med skepp_, interred with ship and all.

114. _draken_. The viking ships were so called because in the prow were
placed carved images of the dragon's head and the stern was made to
resemble the dragon's tail.

164. _Ägir_, the god of the stormy sea.

171. _vingarna_. The sails.

172. _blev efter_. Was left behind in the race.

179. _Var han ej konungason_. Even though he was not a king's son.

186. _blandat blod med varandra_. A solemn compact of brotherhood was
sealed by the parties to it causing their blood to flow together from
self-inflicted wounds while they made the promises that are stated in the
text.


CANTO IV.

Stanza 2. _drakarna_. See note, canto III: 114.

3. _till gäst_. See note, canto I: 33.

4. _dess sida_. Dess, genitive of _den_ and _det_, is irregularly used
here. The regular form would be _hennes_.

5. _De taltes vid_. They talked together.

6. _namnen, som grodde i björkens bark_. See canto I: 27.

9. Observe in last line the change to direct address.

10. _väl_, doubtless.

11. _dagen om_, throughout the day.

16. _jagar i molnen_. Goes ahunting in the clouds, is dreaming.

18. _Den strådöd_. For the ancient Northmen it was a great disgrace to
die a natural death. Death from self-inflicted wounds was more honorable.
The use of _den_ without an adjective is archaic.

18. _blåvit Hela_. Hela (see note, canto I: 23) was hideous in
appearance. Half of her body was livid in color and the other half bore
the ghastly pallor of death.

23. _jarl_, chief of a province. English, earl.

26. _Nordlandens drotter_, the kings of the Northland.

27. _Odensblodet_. See note, canto I: 35.

28. _man_. In this connection _man_ means one of the king's retinue. The
_bönder_ rarely sought protection from kings and the proposal of Helge
was highly insulting to Fritiof, who himself had a retinue.

30. _runorna lågade röda därpå_. See canto II: 78-81.

31. _svartekung_, swartbeard. Helge is given this name, partly because of
his swarthy features, partly because he practices black arts. See canto
II: 5.


CANTO V.

Stanza 1. King Ring ruled over Ringerike, on the west side of Kristiania
fjord.

4. _snäckorna_, ships.

4. _vita vingar_, white wings, sails.

4. _av rikdom, som rikdomen (be)tingar_. Of wealth that brings more
wealth, or upon which further wealth is contingent.

11. _jag gått i frö_, I have grown old.

11. _kungens de glesnade lockar. De_ is here used irregularly.

17. _Men lungorna nekade bifall alltjämt_. Constantly the signs refused
to he affirmative. For reading of signs see note, canto II: 13.

2l. _i templet sätter jag min syster_. The temple of Balder is referred
to. Here persons were inviolate and it was especially a great crime for a
man to visit a woman in this sacred place.


CANTO VI.

Observe the ingenuity with which Fritiof's words to Björn are also made
to convey an answer to Hilding. _Kung_ and _bonde_ refer to Helge and
Fritiof, but they are also the chess terms for king and pawn. Note also
the ingenious rhyme of this canto.

Stanza 6. _sköldborg_. In battle the chief warriors stood around the king
and the royal banner in closed ranks with their shields turned outward
for protection.

11. _man_. See note, canto IV: 28.

Stanza 3. _Delling_, Dawn, was the husband of _Natt_. Their son, _Dag_,
was radiant with heauty.

4. _pärlor_, the stars.

5. _kärlekens gudinna_. Fritiof's name for Ingeborg.

10. _valkyria_. The valkyrs were beautiful maidens that served in
Valhall. They were sent by Oden to the battlefields to select certain
among the fallen heroes and bring them to Valhall.

16. _Vingolv_, the common hall of the gods.

19--22. Compare Shakespeare's Romeo and Juliet, Act III., Scene V.

20. _Ragnarök_, the twilight of the gods, the end of the world.


CANTO VIII.

Lines 27--28. See note, canto V: 21.

35. _Urdas blanka våg_. The pure water of Urda's fountain. The norns
daily brought holy water out of this fountain to sprinkle the roots of
the great world-tree Yggdrasil in order to keep it ever green. This tree
is symbolic of the universe as a great unity. Its branches reach unto
heaven. One of its roots extends unto the abode of men, another to the
realm of the giants and the third to Hel's kingdom.

36. _Gefton_, the virgin goddess and the protector of female chastity.
All women that died unmarried were supposed to serve her.

57. _Bifrosts bro_, the rainbow, the radiant bridge over which the gods
pass from heaven to earth. The valkyrs conduct the fallen heroes to
Valhall over this bridge.

59. _Där skall han stå_. Han refers to the god of love who is represented
as having light wings on his shoulders.

65--66. See canto I: 35.

77. _Min vreda norna_. My evil fate.

87. The _ting_ or judicial assembly was held in the open, usually by a
burial mound or on a knoll. The proximity to the burial place added
solemnity to the procedure. The dead were supposed to be able to hear the
deliberations (see canto 4: 25). The judge's seat usually consisted of a
boulder.

91--95. See canto II: 5 and 6.

105. _Asa-Tor_, a common designation for Tor.

106. _till försoning_, in reconciliation.

109-110. _som glad drack fria männers bifall till det rätta_. Observe the
apt and striking metaphor.

124. _Ett bleklagt nej på mänsklighetens böner_. A striking hyperbole.
Only Fritiof and Ingeborg and the assembly were directly concerned.

129. _Har du ej sett. Sett_ here used instead of _träffat_ or _mött_.

145. _Den dumma vantron_. Note Fritiof's frequent sarcastic references to
the religious beliefs and practices of his day. In later cantos (15-24)
he appears as a serious-minded and "orthodox" man.

149. _den döda valans_. Refers to Oden's journey to Hel to ascertain from
the vala what fate awaited his son Balder. She predicts the death of
Balder at the hands of his brother. (See note, canto I: 22.)

150. _Vegtamskvida_, the Eddic Lay of Vegtam. This tells about Odin's
journey to Hel. He traveled in disguise and under the name of Vegtam.

156. _i Västerhafvet_, in the North Sea. The islands referred to are the
Orkneys, which were first visited by the Northmen in the early part of
the seventh century.

164. _Fafner_, a monster that had acquired great wealth by murdering his
father. In the form of a hideous dragon he guarded this treasure
carefully. His chief means of defense was spewing poison upon those that
attacked him.

165. _Sigurd Fafnesbane_, Sigurd the Dragonkiller. He slays Fafner by
thrusting his sword into the heart of the monster. He is the foremost
hero of the old sagas.

168. _till nästa sommar_. By next summer.

177. _Nastrand_, the dark region of the nether world whither all went
that had lived criminal and impure lives.

216. _Greklands hav_, the Grecian Sea. The Northern vikings often
extended their expeditions to Southern Europe and even to Asia.

233. _fägna än med mänsklig lycka de förgätna gudar_. This betrays
Fritiof's ignorance of the Greek's conception of their gods. The Greeks
believed that the gods became jealous of men when these prospered and
were happy.

272. _I högen din fader sitter_. The bodies of fallen heroes were placed
in a sitting posture in the funeral mound.

275. _är mig i faders ställe. Mig_, possessive dative.

285. _nu_, once for all.

303. _diktade i molnen_, fancied and located in the clouds.

360. _kung Helges syster_. There is bitterness in Fritiof's parting
words. Observe that later when Ingeborg's sound reasoning has convinced
and calmed him he calls her _kung Beles dotter_.

380. _Alltsen mitt väsen började att dagas_. Ever since the dawn of my
existence.

441. _man diktat på mig_, falsely attributed to me; _måna'r_, månader.

466. _ger sitt liv till spillo_. Sacrifices his life. _Till spillo_ is an
antiquated dative.


CANTO IX.

Stanza 2. _det är lyckligt, får följa_. Either _som_ or _det_ supplied
before _får_.

4. _Ej till hans möte: ej att möta honom_. Not to meet him. This
objective genitive occurs very seldom.

5. A fine example of the terse and striking expressions that are so
numerous in Tegnér.

6. _Falk_. The custom of using the falcon in the hunt is very old in
Scandinavia.

8. _Öder_, the faithless and restless husband of Freja. Once when he left
her and remained away a long time she sought him in all lands. The tears
she wept while on this sad errand were so precious that they turned to
gold; hence this metal is found in all lands. According to one version of
the story, she finally found Öder in the South, sitting under the myrtle
tree; hence the custom that every bride in Scandinavia must wear a crown
of myrtle.


CANTO X.

Stanza 1. _tänk på_, think of.

2. _Sam_ and _Hejd_ were two monsters that Helge had sent for and offered
presents with the request that they raise a storm that would destroy
Fritiof and his men. They appeared in the guise of polar bear and eagle.

2. _gudars hem_, the heavens.

3. _Solundar-ö_, an island near the Norwegian coast, probably at the
outlet of Sognefjord. Today the group is called the Outer and the Inner
Sol Islands.

4. _gudatimrade_, built by the gods. See note, canto 3: 164 seq.

5. _kan du icke se för natt_, could not see because of the darkness.

5. _dra seglaren i kvav_. Drag the sailor into the deep. _Gå i kvav_, to
founder, go down.

5. _Ran(a)_, wife of Ägir and goddess of the sea, was hostile to men and
sought to drag them down into the deep. She was passionately fond of
gold, and sailors deemed it wise to have some of the yellow metal with
them with which to appease her in case they foundered at sea. (See stanza
6.)

5. _åt oss_, for us.

6. _fästa havsbrud_, plight troth with the goddess of the sea.

7. _kvad den_, called it forth by incantation.

8. _skepna'n_, skepnaden.

8. _är du gudars dotter_. See canto III: 164 seq.

9. _hålla sjön_, keep afloat.

10. _Efjesund_, a sound in the Orkney Islands. Angantyr was jarl of the
Orkneys.

11. _havets mör_, the waves, nine beautiful daughters of Ägir and Ran who
delighted in playing all over the surface of their father's vast domain.

11. _mjödhorn vandrande på guldfot_. The drinking horns of the ancients
often had metal supports.


CANTO XI.

Stanza 1. _såg ut åt blånad ban_, looked out over the blue course (sea).

1. _allt som_, just like.

2. _blott hornet in han stack_, he passed the horn back through the
window to have it refilled.

4. _På gången och på pannan_. The definite form may be used thus instead
of the possessive when there is no ambiguity.

5. _bärsärk_, from _ber_, bare, and _serk_, shirt or coat of mail. The
berserk was an unarmed warrior that went to battle in a frenzy and
possessed with preternatural strength. In their fury the berserks would
attack indiscriminately friend or foe or even inanimate objects. They
were looked upon as abnormal.

8. _var runa stod i brand_. See canto III: 74-81.

10. _pröva annan färd_, try a new way.

13. _till slut_, at last.

13. _livet ... på dig_. A characteristic prepositional possessive.

14. _jag ligger som jag låg_, I will remain still.

15. _höll mitt i hugget inne_, stopped in the very act of striking.

16 _törsten gör mig men_, the thirst hurts me.

17-18. The description of Angantyr's hall is very much modernized by the
poet.

20. _som en ros i runa_. May perhaps mean an embellished rune or a flower
enclosed in a letter.

22. _ej sitte fjärran från_, should not sit far away.

23. _Sikelö_, Sicily.

24. _Morven_. Northern Scotland, which was often visited by vikings.

24. _välska_, Gaelic, the language spoken in the Scotch Highlands.

24. _norräna tunga_, Norse tongue, the common language of Scandinavia
before and during the Viking period.

29. _männer_, archaic plural.

30. _Astrild_, Cupid.

32. _fjärran myntat guld_, gold coined far away, foreign money.

34. _satt ... vintern ut_, remained to the end of winter.


CANTO XII.

Line 9. _Ägirs döttrar_, the waves. See canto X: 11.

19. _dar_, dagar.

21. _växer ut_, assumes the form.

84. _Eriksgata_, from _edh-vreks-gata (ed-givar-gata)_, the journey of
early kings to receive the homage of their subjects. Some authorities see
the origin of the word in the fact that Erik the Saint was supposed to be
the first king to take one of these royal trips.

91. _Disardalen_, the valley of the gods where Balder's temple lay.

108. _Loke_, the evil giant-god, the enemy of all that was good.

129. _Var_, the goddess of plighted troth. She recorded the solemn
promises of lovers and the marriage vows and avenged any violation of the
same.

135. _Balders Nanna_. See canto I: 22.

145. _sår högens säd_, sows the seed of the funeral mound, i. e., takes
life.

164. _Vidar_, the silent god, who next to Tor was the strongest among the
asar. He avenges Oden in Ragnarök.

187. _den dagen ... från min runstav tagen_. The early Scandinavians had
some sort of calendars, consisting of runes carved on a staff.

198. _Lofn_, the mild and good goddess, and the deity of matrimony.

199. _vite guden_, Balder.

200. _så när som_, except.


CANTO XIII.

Stanza 2. _då rår Höder för världen_, then Höder (Öder) rules the world.
Höder, the blind brother of Balder, is the god of night and darkness.

7. _Västervågor_, the western sea.

12. _din like_, one like you.

17. _Fritiof blygs, att han darrar_, Fritiof is so ashamed that he
trembles. The antecedent of _han_ may be Björn and not Fritiof, the
meaning then being, that the latter is ashamed because Björn trembles.

20. _flödar_, pours water.

22. _eldröd hane_. The red cock, the symbol of fire.

25. _Muspels söner_, the flames. Muspel or Muspelhem, the fire world, lay
south of the abyss Ginnungagap and was guarded by the flame giant Surt.


CANTO XIV.

In the first part of this canto Fritiof gives free expression to his
skepticism and to his contempt for the superstition of his day. See canto
VIII, lines 145, 196, 197, 255; canto XIII, stanzas 3, 13. Such
skepticism was common in Scandinavia just before the introduction of
Christianity.

91. _döna_, for _dåna_.

123. _gudabloden_. Blod is neuter but here used as a gender noun.

175. _nidingsstänger_ were pillars raised at crossroads or other
conspicuous places to mock an enemy or to indicate that he was held in
contempt by every one. At the top was the head of a horse and further
down were comic inscriptions giving the name of the despised person and
the nature of his offence.

179. _till lands_, on land, antiquated genitive. There are many similar
expressions in Swedish.

190. _Gudbrands däld_, the valley of Gudbrand in central Norway.

196. _springa_, break.

202. _Heimskringla_, the earth. Note the apt figure _Heimskringlas
panna_, meaning the Northland.

233. _snögar_, poetical form for _snöar_.


CANTO XV.

Stanza 3. _Kort är hammarens skaft hos den segrande Tor_. The handle of
Tor's hammer, Mjölner, was very short; in his conflicts with the giants
the god hurled it at the enemies. It always returned to his hand, no
matter how far he might hurl it. Frej's sword, referred to, had the power
of fighting successfully of its own accord as soon as it was drawn from
the sheath.

4. _den som stryker (segel)_, the one that lowers the sails, i.e.,
surrenders.

6. _Valfader_, Oden.

9. _nu_, equivalent to _om_.

15. _vill du hälsas för vår_, if you would be hailed as one of us.

15. _Ljungaren_, the thunderer, Tor.


CANTO XVI.

Stanza 4. _holmgång_, a duel, so called because originally fought on a
small island _(holme)_.

8. _Hagbart_, a Norse sea king, was secretly betrothed to Signe, daughter
of Sigar, king of Seeland, who caused Hagbart to be captured and hanged.
Signe then put fire to her chamber and perished in the flames. The tragic
story formed a popular theme for Scandinavian bards.

8. _rista blodörn_, inscribe the blood eagle. This was a monstrous
practice by which the Northmen sometimes wreaked vengeance upon their
fallen enemies. The ribs were severed from the spinal column and bent
outward in the form of wings and salt poured into the wounds, whereupon
the entrails were torn out.


CANTO XVII.

Stanza 6. _helt mycket_, a great deal.

6. _I Ånger är jag uppfödd_, seq. Fritiof's dejection blinds his eyes to
the happy conditions of his boyhood and youth. What he says is not true.
Compare with cantos I and III.

7. _bränner salt vid strand_, boils the sea water to get a residue of
salt. This occupation was carried on by the poor and the aged and was
considered a very menial service.

14. _nu var löftets timme, och in bärs Frejers galt_. The yule time
marked the return of light and was therefore an occasion for great
rejoicing and sacrificing to Frej, the sun god. In his honor a roasted
boar was placed on the table and with their hands on its head the
warriors vowed that they would perform certain heroic deeds.

15. _vinna_, conquer.

18. _i vinter_, this winter.

24. _helt skarpt_, quite liberally, profusely.

24. _ett ärligt julerus_, a good yuletide spree.


CANTO XVIII.

Stanza 6. _Sleipner_, the eight-footed steed of Odin, which was swifter
than the wind and never grew tired.


CANTO XIX.

Stansa 2. _med kappor över öga_. The falcons were trained for the hunt by
starving them and keeping a hood over their eyes. This was removed just
before the bird was released. It then rose perpendicularly and started in
pursuit of its prey.

3. _Rota_, a valkyr.

5. _Odens sal_, heaven.

5. _valkyrjan_, the huntress.

7. _Grubblar viking_. This has a conditional meaning; _om_ implied before
the clause.

9. _Ty de hata mänskors ätter_. Fritiof had changed his ideas about the
gods. See canto VIII: 235.

13-15. The birds give expression to Fritiof's own thoughts.

16. _I, som aldrig skulle_. The easier conversational form _skulle_ is
here used, rather than _skullen_, which the strict adherence to
grammatical forms would require.

17. _Nifelhem_, the abode of mist and darkness.

25. _varg i veum_, wolf in the temple, i. e., profaner of the sanctuary.


CANTO XX.

Stanza 1. _Skinfaxe_, the shining steed of _Dag_, day.

3. _vingade hästen_, the ship.

10. _rista geirs-odd_, to take one's own life by wounding oneself with a
lance.

13. _blodiga drotter_, bloody deeds of achievement.

13. _ätthögens dotter_, the peace that awaits him in another world.

14. _gjallarhorn_, the trumpet of Heimdall, the sentry of the gods.
_Gjallarhornet_ can be heard to the remotest part of the world. Upon it
Heimdall would blow one terrific blast to summon the gods to the final
conflict in Ragnarök.


CANTO XXI.

Stanza 4. _Vanadis_. Freja, having been born in Vanaheim, was also known
as Vanadis.

5. _bärsärk_. See canto XI: 5.

9. _dvärgarnas dag-glans, drakarnas bädd_, gold. The dwarfs and dragons
had a passionate desire for gold. _Dvärgarnas dag-glans_ is an allusion
to the belief that the subterranean caves of the dwarfs were illuminated
by gold. _Drakarnas bädd_ alludes to the supposition that all great
treasures in caves were guarded by fierce dragons, as Fafner. See canto
VIII: 164.


CANTO XXII.

Stanza 1. _Budkavlen_. Men were summoned to assemblies by staffs that
were inscribed with runes and passed from house to house.

7. _på öppet ting_. See canto VIII: 87.

11. _Odens ätt_. See canto I: 35.

16. _böndren_, regular form, _bönderna_.

20. _sköldemör_, shield maidens. The valkyrs were sometimes called norns.

20. _De bygga under tidens träd och ovanför_. This refers to the norns
who dwelt at the well of Urd by the world-tree Yggdrasil. But they also
determine the fate of men on earth. _Bygga_ means here build and dwell.


CANTO XXIII.

Stanza 2. _o, den som, aldrig gungat däruppå_! Note how Fritiof has
changed his mind regarding life on the sea. Contrast this with canto XII:
143 seq.; XIV: 65 seq.; XIX: 27 seq.

5. _Nidhögg_, a dragon that was continually gnawing at the roots of
Yggdrasil in order to bring about the destruction of the gods.

5. _mörkrets värld_, Nifelhem.

7. _fromme gud_, Balder.

9. _Angantyr_, a great warrior, who fell in a duel and was buried
together with his famous sword, Tyrfing. His daughter Hervor appealed to
him to give her the sword. This he did, at the same time predicting that
it would some day bring disaster upon her and upon her people.

13. _Breidablick_, Balder's glittering palace, the most beautiful hall in
Valhall. Its purity was such that nothing common or unclean could endure
within its confines.

14. _bäst som_, just as.

15. _mör från tidens källa_. See canto XXII: 20.


CANTO XXIII.

Line 16. _I voren tempelbrand för mig en gång_. Equivalent to saying:
When I saw you I was reminded of the burning temple.


CANTO XXIV.

Line 5. _hillebarder_, halberds, weapons that were a combination of axe
and spear.

9. _templet i Uppsala likt_. The ancient pagan temple at Uppsala was
famous for its marvelous beauty.

23. _Vala_. The reference is to Voluspa, the Vala Prophecy, one of the
oldest if not the oldest poetic production of Scandinavia.

26. _fromhetsguden_, Balder.

37-39. See canto I: 22.

56. _Valaskjalf_, a beautiful palace of Oden which was built by the gods
and roofed with pure silver. In this palace is the throne Hlidskjalf.
Seated there, Oden could overlook the whole world.

76. _Jotunheim_ or _Utgård_ was the dark and chaotic realm of the giants,
which lay in the uttermost part of the earth.

77. _gudabälte_. Tors' wonderful belt, Megingjard which doubled his
strength when he put it on. With his mailed gauntlets he seizes his
hammer Mjölner.

78. _Utgårda-Loke_. The evil giant-god is so called because he has his
realm in Utgård. See note, line 76.

81. _Ägirs barm_, the ocean.

88. _Ymer_, an enormous giant which the gods slew and from whose body
they formed earth and heaven. His flesh constitutes the earth; the bones,
mountains; the teeth, rocks; the skull, the heavenly vault; and the
blood, oceans.

96. _Asker_, the first created man.

103. _fågeln kommer flygande_. See canto II: 22.

106. _när Balder föll_. See canto I: 22.

110. _Midgårdsormen_, the serpent of Midgård, which Oden threw into the
sea where it grew until it encircled the earth.

111. _Fenris_ or _Fenrisulven_, a giant wolf, son of Loke, which the gods
bound securely to a solid rock. There he lies howling until the end of
mundane things, when he breaks his fetters and devours Oden. Oden's son,
Vidar, avenges his death by slaying Fenris.

112. _Surt or Surtur_, the god of fire, who guards the fiery realm
Muspelhem. At Ragnarök he is the first to ride forth to conflict with the
gods. He carries a flaming sword that transcends the sun in brightness.

114-116. _I Valhall gal gullkammig hane_, seq. The cock, as the symbol of
fire, announces the coming of Ragnarök. A golden-combed cock awakens the
halls of Valhall, a red cock crows on earth and beneath the earth.

161. _Vigrids hundramilaslätt_. Vigrid's plains, one hundred miles
square, upon which is waged the final conflict between the gods and the
forces of evil.

175. _Idavallen_, the plains of Ida, where the gods first met after the
creation of heaven and earth. Here the gods were at play when Balder
fell. After Ragnarök the regenerated gods return to Idavallen and recall
to their mind the heroic deeds they had performed. In the grass they find
the wonderful golden disks that had been the property of the ancient
gods.

181. _Gimles port_, the portal of Gimle, a hall lined with gold and
fairer than the sun, in which the righteous dwell after Ragnarök in
eternal bliss.

193. _leder gångarn fram_. The horse was used for food and for sacrifice.

211. _jungfruns son_, Christ. Returning warriors and tradesmen and
captives of war had undoubtedly at the time of Fritiof brought to
Scandinavia some knowledge of the teachings of the Christian religion.
The Balder of Scandinavian mythology has many of the attributes of
Christ.

237. _Semings blod_. Seming was one of the sons of Oden that became the
progenitor of a family of kings. Ingeborg and her brothers had descended
from him.

258. _Jumala_, a Finnish deity.

292. _varg i veum_. See canto XIX: 25.




INDEX TO MYTHOLOGICAL TERMS.


[Figures refer to canto and line or stanza under which explanatory notes
are given.]

/*[4]
    Alfhem, 3: 88.
    Allfader, 1: 33.
    Asa-Tor, 8: 105.
    Asker, 24: 96.
    Astrild, 11: 30.
    Austre, 2: 11.
    Balder, 1: 22; 3: 99.
    Bifrost, 8: 57.
    Brage, 3: 36.
    Breidablick, 23: 13.
    Dag, 7: 3.
    Delling, 7: 3.
    Disardalen, 12: 91.
    Dvärgar, l: 7; 2: 11; 3: 59; 21: 9.
    Fafner, 8: 164.
    Fenris, 24: 111.
    Folkvang, 1:6.
    Forsete, 3: 100.
    Frigga, 1: 20.
    Frej, 2: 39; 3: 28, 194; 17: 14.
    Freja, 1: 6; 9: 8.
    Geflon, 8: 36.
    Gerda, 1: 21.
    Gimle, 24: 181.
    Gjallarhom, 20: 14.
    Glitner, 3: 100.
    Havamal, 2: 28.
    Hel, 1: 23; 4: 18.
    Heimdal, 20: 4.
    Heimskringla, 14: 207.
    Hildur, 3: 79.
    Hugin, 2: 22.
    Höder (öder), 1: 22; 9: 8; 13: 2.
    Idavallen, 24: 175.
    Iduna, 1: 19.
    Jotunheim, 24: 76.
    Lofn, 12: 198.
    Loke, 1: 22; 12: 108.
    Megingjard, 24: 77.
    Midgårdsormen, 24: 110.
    Mimer, 3: 38.
    Mjölner, 15: 3.
    Munin, 2: 22.
    Muspelhem, 13: 25.
    Nanna, 2: 22.
    Nastrand, 8: 177.
    Natt, 7: 3.
    Nidhögg, 23: 5.
    Nifelhem, 19: 17.
    Nornor, 2: 32; 22: 20.
    Nordre, 2: 11.
    Oden, l: 32; 2: 22; 3: 90.
    Ragnarök, 7: 20.
    Ran, 10: 5.
    Rota, 19: 3.
    Saga, 3: 90.
    Seming, 24: 237.
    Sigurd Fafnesbane, 8: 165.
    Skinfaxe, 20: 1.
    Skulda, 2: 32.
    Sleipner, 18: 6.
    Surt, 24: 112.
    Sökvabäck, 3: 90.
    Södre, 2: 11.
    Tor, 1: 38; 15: 3.
    Trudvang, 1: 38.
    Urda, 2: 32; 7: 35.
    Utgårda-Loke, 24: 78.
    Vala, 24: 23.
    Valaskjalf, 24: 56.
    Valfader, 15: 6.
    Valhall, 1: 17.
    Valkyria, 7: 10.
    Vanadis, 21: 4.
    Var, 12: 129.
    Vaulund, 3: 84.
    Vegtam, 8: 150.
    Verdandi, 2: 32.
    Vidar, 12: 164.
    Vigrid, 24: 161.
    Vingolv, 7: 16.
    Västre, 2: 11.
    Yggdrasil, 7: 35; 22: 20.
    Ymer, 24: 88.
    Ägir, 3: 164; 10: 11.
    Älvor, 1: 7.
    Öder (Höder), 1: 22; 9: 8; 13: 2.
*/



BIBLIOGRAPHY.

/*[4]
    ANDERSON, RASMUS B. Viking Tales of the North, Chicago, 1876.
    BOYESEN, H. H. Essays on Scandinavian Literature, New York, 1895.
    BOLDT, A. Esaias Tegnér, Helsingfors, 1904.
    BRÄNDES, GEORGE. Esaias Tegnér. En litteraturpsychologisk studie,
        Copenhagen, 1878.
    --Mennesker og Værker, Copenhagen, 1883.
    BÖTTIGER, C. W. Levnadsteckning. Esaias Tegnérs Samlade skrifter.
        Nationalupplaga.
    ERDMAN, Nils. Esaias Tegnér. En porträttstudie, Stockholm, 1896.
    FLOM, G. T. Frithiofs Saga, Chicago, 1909.
    HORN, F. W. History of the Literature of the Scandinavian North.
        Translated by R. B. Anderson, Chicago, 1901.
    LJUNGGREN, GUSTAV. Om Tegnérs Fritiofs Saga, Stockholm, 1877. Also
        Svenska Akademiens Handlingar, Series of 1796, LII. and LIII.
    LONGFELLOW, H. W. Tegnér's Frithiofs Saga. The North American Review,
        XLV.
    LYTH, P. G. Tegnér och Frithiofs Saga, Norrköping, 1894.
    MINNE AF ESAIAS TEGNÉR, Stockholm, 1866. Contains biographical data on
        Tegnér by Franzén, Rappe, Geijer, Wieselgren, Hagberg, and
        Adlersparre, together with many poems by Franzén, Wallin, Longfellow,
        Oehlenschläger and others.
    NYBLAEUS, AXEL. Esaias Tegnér, Lund, 1882.
    SCHUCK, HENRIK, OCH WAEBURG, KARL. Illustrerad Svensk Litteraturhistoria,
        III. Stockholm, 1897.
    SHAW, CLEMENT, B. Frithiofs Saga, Chicago, 1908.
    TEGNÉR, ELOF. Ur Tegnérs papper, Stockholm, 1882. Contains a large number
        of letters to Tegnér from contemporary authors and other friends.
        Covers the period of 1801-1844.
    VEDEL, VALDEMAR. Svensk Romantik, Copenhagen, 1894.
*/



VOCABULARY


In the case of nouns, the singular with the postpositive definite article
and the indefinite plural are given in parenthesis. When a dash takes the
place of a plural ending it indicates that the indefinite plural is the
same as the indefinite singular. The vertical lines within a word
indicate to what part the endings are to be added.

The principal parts of irregular and strong verbs are given in full.

/*[4]
    A.

    ack, ah, oh, alas.
    adel, (-n), nobility,
    afton (-en, aftnar), evening.
    aftondagg (-en), evening dew.
    aftonrodnad (-en, -er), sunset glow.
    aftonsol (-en, -ar), evening sun.
    aftonvind (-en, -ar), evening breeze.
    akt, attention, giv --, look out, take notice.
    akt|a (-ade, -at), to consider worthy, respect, notice; -- sig, beware.
    akt|giva (-gav, -givit), to notice, pay attention.
    aktning (-en), respect.
    al (-en, -ar) alder.
    aldrig, never.
    alf (-en, -er), elf.
    all, (allt, alla), all.
    allena, (allen), alone.
    allenast, only.
    Allfader (-n), Father of All, Oden.
    alltför, altogether too.
    alltid, always, forever.
    alltren, already.
    alltjämt, all the time, always.
    alltså, thus.
    alltnog, enough.
    alltsedan, ever since.
    allvar (-et), seriousness.
    allvarsam, serious, grave.
    almträd (-et, --), elm.
    aln (-en, -ar), yard, ell.
    altare (-t, -n), altar.
    altarrund (-en, -er), altar circle.
    amm|a (-ade, -at), to nurse.
    an, on, forward, up.
    an|a (-ade, -at), to apprehend, divine.
    an|bringa (-bragte, -bragt), to attach, put.
    and|as (-ades, -ats), to breathe.
    and|e (-en, -ar), spirit.
    andedrag (-et, --), breath.
    andre, andra, other, second.
    anfall (-et, --), attack.
    ankare (-t, -n), anchor.
    ankartåg (-et, --), anchorchain.
    anklag|a (-ade, -at), to accuse.
    anlete (-t, -n), face, countenance.
    anletsdrag (-et, --), features.
    annan, (ann, annat, def., andre, andra), other, different, else.
    annars, otherwise.
    annorlunda, different.
    anor, no sing., ancestral traits, descent.
    an|slå (-slog, -slagit, -slagen), to strike, touch; slå an en sång,
      strike up a tune or song.
    arbet|a (-ade, -at) to work, form.
    an|taga (-tog, -tagit, -tagen), to accept, suppose.
    arbete, (-t, -n), work, labor.
    arm (-en, -ar), arm.
    arm, miserable, poor.
    armring (-en, -ar), armring, bracelet.
    art (-en, -er), kind, nature.
    arv (-et, --), inheritance.
    arvgård (-en, -ar), ancestral estate.
    arving|e (-en, -ar), heir.
    asablod (-et), blood of the gods.
    asafrände (-n, -r), kinsman of the gods.
    asagäst (-en, -er), guest of the gods.
    asaljus (-et), light of the gods.
    asar (def. sing. asen) gods.
    asason (-en, -söner), son of the gods.
    aska (-n), ashes, dust.
    att, to, that.
    av, by, of, from, with.
    av och an, back and forth.
    avbild (-en, -er), image.
    av|bryta (-bröt, -brutit, -bruten), to break, interrupt.
    avfall (-et, --), desertion, apostasy.
    av|göra (-gjorde, -gjort), to decide.
    avgrund (-en, -er), abyss, precipice, hell.
    avgrundslåg|a (-an, -or), flame of hell.
    avsides, out of the way, remote.
    avsked (-et, --), farewell, dismissal.
    avstånd (-et, --), distance.
    avundsjuk, jealous.
    ax (-et, --), head of grain.
    ax|el (-eln, -lar), shoulder.

    B.

    back|e (-en, -ar), hill.
    bad (-et --), bath.
    bad, see bedja.
    bad|a (-ade, -at), to bathe.
    bak, behind.
    bakstam (-men, -mar), stern.
    baktill, behind, in the rear.
    Baldersbål (-et), Balder's pyre or stake.
    Balderslund (-en), Balder's grove.
    balk (-en, -ar), code, barrier.
    ban|a (-an, -or), course, path.
    band, see binda.
    band (-et, --), band, bond.
    bane, murderer, death by violent means.
    bannlys|a (-te, -t), to banish.
    bar, see bära.
    bar, bare.
    bara, merely, only.
    bark (-en), bark.
    barm (-en, -ar), bosom.
    barn (-et, --), child.
    barndom (-en), childhood.
    barndomsdag (-en, -ar), childhood day.
    barndomskärlek (-en), childhood love.
    barndomsminne (-t, -n), memory of childhood.
    barndomsvän (-nen, -ner), childhood friend.
    barndomsvärld (-en, -ar), childhood world.
    barnlek (-en, -ar), child's play, pl. childish games.
    barnslig, childish.
    bautasten (-en, -ar), memorial stone.
    be, abbrev. bedja.
    beckad, covered with pitch.
    becksvart, pitch black.
    bedja, be (bad, bedit or bett), to pray, ask.
    bedrift (-en, -er), achievement.
    be|driva (-drev, -drivit, -driven), to carry on.
    bedröv|a (-ade, -at), to distress, grieve.
    befallja (-de, -t), to command.
    be|grava (-grov, -gravit, -graven), to bury.
    be|gråta (-grät, -grätit, -gråten), to mourn, bewail.
    begyn|na (-te, -t), to begin.
    begär (-et --), desire.
    begär|a (-de, -t), to demand, ask.
    behag (-et), delight, charm, comeliness.
    behag|a (-ade, -at) to please.
    behärsk|a (-ade, -at), to dominate, rule.
    be|hålla (-höll, -hållit, -hållen), to retain.
    behöv|a (-de, -t), to need.
    beklag|a (-ade, -at), to deplore, pity; -- sig, complain.
    bekrans|a (-ade, -at), to deck with flowers.
    belägen, situated.
    ben (-et --), leg, bone.
    benrad (-en, -er), spinal column, skeleton.
    bereda (beredde, berett), to prepare.
    berg (-et --), mountain.
    bergfast, firm as a mountain.
    bero (-dde, -tt), to depend; på, be dependent on.
    beryktad, famous.
    berömd, famous.
    be|se (-såg, -sett, -sedd), to view, inspect.
    besegr|a (-ade, -at), to conquer.
    besinn|a (-ade, -at), to consider.
    be|sjunga (-sjöng,-sjungit, -sjungen), to praise or celebrate
    with song.
    beskrev, see beskriva.
    be|skriva (-skrev, -skrivit, -skriven), to describe.
    beslut (-et, --), decision.
    be|sluta (-slöt, -slutit), to decide.
    besmittad, unclean, infected.
    besteg, see bestiga.
    be|stiga (-steg, stigit, -stigen), to ascend.
    beställsam, officious.
    bestämd, firm, decisive.
    bestäm|ma (-de, -t), to decide, determine, designate.
    beständig, constant.
    besviken, deceived.
    besvurit, see besvärja.
    be|svärja (pres. besvär, -svor, -svurit, -svuren), to implore, adjure.
    be|sätta (-satte, -satt), to set, mount (with jewels).
    besök|a (-te, -t), to visit.
    bet, see bita.
    bet|a (-ade, -at), to graze,
    betagen, enraptured,
    betal|a (-ade, -at), to pay.
    beteckna (-ade, -at), to signify.
    beting (-et, --), condition.
    beting|a (-ade, -at), to earn, demand.
    be|tyda (-tydde, -tytt), to signify, mean.
    betänk|a (-te, -t), to reflect, ponder.
    bi (-et, -n), bee.
    bid|a (-ade, -at), to bide, wait.
    bifall (-et), permission, assent.
    bild (-en, -er), picture, scene.
    billig, reasonable, cheap.
    biltog, outlawed.
    binda, (band, pl. bundo, bundit, bunden), to bind, restrain.
    bister, grim, harsh.
    bita (bet, bitit, biten), to bite, cut, gnaw.
    bitter, bitter.
    bjuda (bjöd, bjudit, bjuden), to invite, offer, bid.
    bjudning (-en, -ar), invitation.
    bjälk|e (-en, -ar), joist, beam.
    bjöd, see bjuda.
    björk (-en, -ar), birchtree.
    björkskog (-en, -ar), birch woods.
    björn (-en, -ar), bear.
    björnhud (-en, -ar), bearskin.
    björnram (-en, -ar), paw of bear.
    björnskinnsman (-nen, -män), man clad in bearskin.
    blad (-et, --), blade, leaf.
    bland, among.
    bland|a (-ade, -at), to mix.
    blank, bright, polished.
    blek, pale.
    blekblå, pale blue.
    bleklagd, pale-faced.
    blekn|a (-ade, -at), to turn pale.
    bleknad, pale, having turned pale.
    blev, see bliva.
    bli, abbrev. of bliva.
    blick (-en, -ar), glance, look.
    blick|a (-ade, -at), to look.
    blid, gentle.
    blidk|a (-ade, -at), to propitiate.
    blind, blind.
    blindskär (-et, --), submerged rock.
    bliva, bli (blev, blivit, bliven), to become; -- efter,
      to be left behind.
    blixt (-en, -ar), lightning, thunderbolt, flash.
    blixtr|a (-ade, -at), to lighten, flash.
    blod (et), blood.
    blod|a (-ade, -at), to stain with blood.
    blodfläckad, bloodstained.
    blodig, bloody.
    blodlös, bloodless.
    blodman (-nen, -män), headsman.
    blodregn (-et), blood rain.
    blodröd, blood red.
    blodshämnd (-en), blood vengeance.
    blodörn (-en, -ar), blood eagle.
    blomdoft (-en, -er), fragrance of flowers.
    blomkalk (-en, -ar), flower cup.
    blomm|a (-ade, -at), to blossom.
    blomm|a (-an, -or), flower.
    blomster (-ret, --), flower, blossom.
    blomsterdoft (-en, -er), rose fragrance.
    blomstergördjel (-em, -lar), flower girdle.
    blomsterkransad, wreathed in flowers.
    blomsterkront, decked or crowned with flowers.
    blomstervidj|a (-an, -or), rose willow.
    blomstervärld (-en), flower world.
    blomsteräng (-en, -ar), flowery meadow or field.
    blomstr|a (-ade, -at), to blossom.
    bloss (-et,--), torch.
    blossa (-ade, -at), to blaze, flash.
    blot (-et), blood sacrifice.
    blot|a (-ade, -at), to sacrifice.
    blott, only, merely.
    blott|a (-ade, -at), to lay bare.
    blyg|as (-des, -ta), to be ashamed.
    blå, blue.
    blånande, blue.
    blånad, blue.
    blås|a (-te, -t), to blow.
    blåvit, light blue, or blue white.
    blåögd, blue-eyed.
    bländ|a (-ade, -at), to dazzle.
    blöda  (blödde, blött), to bleed.
    bo (-et, -n), dwelling place, nest.
    bo (-dde, -tt), to dwell, live.
    bock (-en, -ar), buck, he-goat.
    bog (-en, -ax), shoulder of an animal.
    bok (-en, -ar), beech tree.
    bolster (-ret, -rar), pillow, mattress.
    bona (-ade, -at), to polish.
    bonde (-n, bönder), yeoman.
    bondelag (et, --), group of yeomen.
    bondeson (-en, -söner), yeoman's son.
    boning (-en, -ar), dwelling, abode.
    bord, om --, on board.
    bord (-et, --), table.
    borg (-en, -ar), castle.
    borr|a (-ade, -at), to bore, scuttle.
    bort, borta, away.
    bot (-en, böter), fine, penance.
    bott|en (-nen, -nar), bottom.
    bottenlös, bottomless.
    bra, good, well.
    bragd (-en, -er), achievement.
    brak (-et), crash, loud noise.
    brand (-en, bränder), firebrand, fire.
    brandgul, flame-colored.
    brann, see brinna.
    bras|a (-an, -or), fire, blaze.
    brant (-en, -er), precipice, edge, declivity.
    brant, steep.
    bred, broad.
    breda (bredde, brett), to spread.
    bredvid, beside.
    bring|a (-an, -or), chest of a horse or other animal.
    bring|a (-ade or bragte, -at or bragt), to bring.
    brinna (brann, pl. brunno, brunnit, brunnen), to burn.
    brista (brast, pl. brusto, brustit, brusten), to break, to
    be lacking in; -- i gråt, to burst into tears.
    bro (-n, -ar), bridge.
    broder (-n, bröder), brother.
    brodersfamn (-en), brother's embrace.
    brokig, variegated.
    bror, contr. of broder.
    brottande (-t), wrestling.
    brott|as (-ades, -äts), to wrestle.
    brottslig, criminal.
    brud (-en, -ar), bride.
    brudgumm|e (-en, -ar), bridegroom.
    brudpar (-et, --), bridal couple.
    brudsmyckad, decked as a bride.
    brudsång (-en, -er), bridal song.
    brun, brown.
    brunno, see brinna.
    brusa (-ade, -at), to gush, roar.
    brutit, see bryta.
    bryg|ga (-de, -t), to brew.
    bryn (-et, --), edge, horizon.
    brynj|a (-an, -or), coat of mail.
    brynjohatare (-n, --), armor hater, sword.
    bryta (bröt, brutit, bruten), to break, violate.
    bräcklig, frail.
    brädd (-en, -ar), brim, edge.
    brän|na (-de, -t), to burn.
    bröd (-et, --), bread.
    brödrafred (-en), fraternal peace.
    brödren, for bröderna.
    bröllop (-et, --), wedding.
    bröllopsdag (-en, -ar), wedding day.
    bröllopsdräkt (-en, -ar), wedding costume.
    bröllopsgård (-en, -ar), house where a wedding is celebrated.
    bröst (-et, --), breast, bosom.
    bröt, see bryta.
    bud (-et, --), command, commandment, message, messenger.
    bud|a (-ade, -at), to call, summon. [stick, summons.
    budkavl|e (-en, -ar), lit. bid-
    budskap (-et, --), message.
    buk (-en, -ar), belly.
    bukt (-en, -er), bay.
    buktig, bent, convex, irregular.
    bull|er (-ret), commotion, noise.
    bunden, see binda.
    bundo, see binda.
    buro, see bära.
    busk|e (-en, -ar), bush, shrub.
    bygg|a (-de, -t), to build.
    byte (-t, -n), prize, booty.
    både, båd', both.
    båg|e (-en, -ar), bow.
    bågig, curved.
    bål, (-et, --), stake, pyre.
    bång (-et), bluster, fuss.
    bångstyrig, refractory.
    båt|a (-ade, -at), to be of avail.
    bäck (-en, -ar), brook, stream.
    bädd (-en, -ar), bed.
    bädd|a (-ade, -at), to make a bed.
    bägare (-n, --), goblet, cup.
    bägge, both.
    bälte (-t, -n), belt.
    bältestad (-en), waist line.
    bänk (-en, -ar), bench, seat.
    bär (-et, --), berry.
    bära (bar, pl. buro, burit, buren), to carry, bear, lead.
    bärga (-ade, -at), to rescue; bärgad sol, sun that has set.
    bärsärk (-en, -er), berserk.
    bärsärksgång (-en), berserk fury.
    bärsärksskägg (-et), berserk's beard.
    bäst, best.
    bättre, better.
    bävan, indecl., trepidation.
    böj|a (-de, -t), to bend.
    böjlig, flexible.
    bölj|a (-an, -or), wave, billow.
    bölja (-ade, -at), to surge.
    bön (-en, -er), prayer.
    böra (borde, bort), ought.
    börd (-en), rank.
    börd|a (-an, -or), burden.
    börj|a (-ade, -at), to begin.
    början, indecl., beginning.

    D.

    dag (-en, -ar), day.
    dag|as (-ades, -ats), to dawn,
    dag|er (-ern, -rar), dawn.
    dagg (-en), dew.
    dagglans (-en), daylight splendor.
    dagsljus (-et), daylight.
    dal (-en, -ar), valley.
    dans (-en, -ar), dance.
    dans|a (-ade, -at), to dance.
    dar, contr. of dagar.
    darr|a (-ade, -at), to tremble.
    de, they, the, those.
    del|a (-ade or -te, -at or -t), to divide, share, give.
    dem, them, those.
    den, the, that one, that, it.
    densamme, the same.
    denna, detta, this one.
    deras, their.
    dess, its; till --, until.
    desslikes, likewise.
    det, it, the, there.
    diar, no. sing., chiefs having priestly and royal functions.
    dig, you, yourself, thee, thyself.
    dikt (-en, -er), poem, fiction, invention.
    dikt|a (-ade, -at), to invent, imagine, compose.
    dimm|a (-an, -or), fog.
    din, ditt, dina, your, yours, thy, thine.
    disarsal (-en, -ar), abode of the inferior gods.
    dit, thither.
    djup (-et, --), depth; adj. deep.
    djupblå, deep blue.
    djuptänkt, profound.
    djur (-et, --), animal.
    djärv, brave.
    djärvhet (-en), bravery, presumption.
    dock, yet, nevertheless, anyway.
    dock|a (-an, -or), doll.
    dockspel (-et, --), doll's play.
    doft|a (-ade, -at), to exhale perfume, scent.
    dog, see dö.
    dom (-en, -ar), judgment, verdict.
    dom (-en, -er), dome.
    domare (-n, --), judge.
    domarsten (-en, -ar), judgment seat.
    domarstol (-en, -ar), judgment seat.
    dopp|a (-ade, -at), to dip.
    dotter (-n, döttrar), daughter.
    drag (-et, --) feature.
    dra, abbrev. of draga.
    drack, see dricka,
    draga (drog, dragit, dragen), to draw, pull, go.
    drakje (-en, -ar), dragon.
    drakskepp (-et, --), dragon ship.
    drapja (-an, -or), dirge.
    dricka (drack, pl. drucko, druckit, drucken), to drink.
    dristig, bold.
    driva (drev, drivit, driven), to drive, drift.
    driv|a (-an, -or), snow drift.
    driven, wrought, embossed.
    drog, see draga.
    dropp|a (-ade, -at), to drip.
    dropp|e (-en, -ar), dröp.
    drott (-en, -ar), king.
    drottning (-en, -ar), queen.
    drottkväde (-t, -n), royal song.
    drucko, see dricka.
    druv|a (-an, -or), grape.
    dryck (-en, -er), drink.
    dryckesbord (-et, --), drinking table.
    drunkn|a (-ade, -at), to drown.
    dryckeshorn (-et, --), drinking horn.
    dryckessal (-en, -ar), drinking hall.
    dryg, lasting, overbearing, self-important.
    dråpslag (-et, --), heavy blow, death blow.
    dräkt (-en, -en), garb.
    dräng (-en, -ar), young man, man-servant.
    dräp|a (-te, -t), to kill.
    dröj|a (-de, -t), to tarry.
    dröm (-men, -mar), dream.
    dröm|ma (-de, -t), to dream.
    du, thou.
    dubbel, double.
    dugg|a (-ade, -at), to drizzle.
    duk (-en, -ar), cloth, canvas.
    dum, foolish.
    dund|er (-ret), thunder, roar.
    dundr|a (-ade, -at), to roar, thunder.
    dunkel, dark, dim.
    duv|a (-an, -or), dove.
    duvoving|e (-en, -ar), dove's wing.
    dvaldes, see dväljas.
    dväljas (dvaldes, dvalts), to live, dwell.
    dvärg (-en, -ar), dwarf.
    dy (-n), mud, slime.
    dygd (-en, -er), virtue.
    dygn (-et, --), day of twentyfour hours.
    dyk|a (-te or dök, -t), to dive.
    dyrbar, costly.
    dyrk|a (ade, -at), to worship.
    dyrköpt, dearly bought.
    dyster, morose, gloomy.
    då, then, when.
    dåd (-et, --), deed.
    dån (-et), din, noise.
    dån|a (-ade, -at), to rumble, faint.
    dår|a (-ade, -at), to deceive, fascinate.
    dåraktig, foolish.
    dår|e (-en, -ar), fool.
    dårskap (-en, -er), foolishness.
    däck (-et, --), deck.
    däld (-en, -er), valley.
    därav, thereof.
    där, there, where.
    därefter, thereafter, thereupon.
    däremot, on the other hand.
    därför(e), therefore.
    därhos, besides, In addition.
    däri, therein.
    därifrån, therefrom.
    därigenom, thereby, through it.
    därin, in there, into it.
    därmed, thereby.
    därnäst, thereafter, next.
    däromkring, thereabout.
    därpå, thereupon, thereafter.
    därstädes, there.
    därtill, thereto.
    därunder, under or during.
    däruppe, up there.
    däruppå, thereon, upon it.
    därur, out of it.
    därutöver, beyond, above it
    däråt, in that direction, towards.
    däröver, above it.
    dö (dog, dött), to die.
    död, dead.
    död (-en, -ar), death.
    dödlig, deadly, mortal.
    dödsblek, death pale.
    dödsrunja (-an, -or), death rune,
    dödssång (-en, -er),death song,
    dödsörn (-en, -ar), death eagle,
    dölja (dolde, dolt or döljt, dold), to conceal.
    döm|a (-de, -t), to judge,
    dön|a (-ade, -at), to rumble,
    dörr (-en, -ar), door,
    dörrsven (-nen, -ner), guard,
    dörrpost (-en, -er), doorpost
    döva (-ade, -at), to deafen.

    E.

    ed (-en, -er), oath.
    eder, you, your.
    efter, after, behind.
    egen, own, peculiar.
    egg (-en, -ar), edge.
    ehur, although, albeit.
    einheriar, the blest, no sing.
    ej, not.
    eja, ah.
    ek, (-en, -ar), oak; af eke, of oak.
    ekebänk (-en, -ar), oak bench.
    eld (-en, -ar), fire.
    eldig, fiery.
    eldprov (-et, --), fire test.
    eldhav (-et, --), ocean of fire.
    eldröd, fiery red.
    eldsken (-et, --), glow of fire.
    eldstad (-en, -städer), fireplace.
    eldsvärd (-et, --), flaming sword.
    eller, or.
    emellan, between.
    emot, towards, against.
    emot|taga (-tog, -tagit, tagen), to accept, receive.
    emottog, see emottaga.
    emedan, because.
    ena, den --, one, the one.
    en, ett, a, one.
    enahanda, same.
    endast, only, solely.
    ende, enda, endaste, sole, only.
    endräkt (-en), concord.
    ens, even.
    ensam, alone.
    enslig, lonely.
    envar, everyone, each one.
    envigskamp (-en), duel.
    er, you, your.
    eriksgat|a (-an, -or), royal journey.
    ettersvälld, swelled by poison.
    evar, wheresoever.
    evig, eternal.
    evighet (-en, -er), eternity.

    F.

    fader  (-n, fäder), father.
    fager, pretty.
    falk (-en, -ar), falcon,
    falkving|e  (-en, -ar), falcon's wing.
    fall (-et, --), fall,
    falla, (föll, fallit, fallen), to fall.
    falsk, false.
    famn (-en), embrace.
    famna (-ade, -at), embrace.
    fann, see finna,
    far, abbrev. of fader,
    fara (for, farit, faren), to travel, go, depart.
    far|a (-an, -or), danger.
    fart (-en), speed, course,
    farväl, farewell.
    fas|a (-an, -or), terror,
    fast, firm.
    fast, although,
    fastän, although,
    fatt, gripa --, få --, hold, seize.
    fatt|a (-ade, -at), to seize, hold, comprehend, take.
    fatt|as (-ades, -ats), to fail, be the matter with.
    feg, cowardly.
    fejd (-en, -er), conflict.
    fel (-et, --), mistake, error.
    fel|a (-ade, -at), to err, fail.
    fem, five.
    femton, fifteen.
    fest (-en, -er), feast, entertainment.
    fick, see få.
    fiende (-n, -r), enemy.
    fik|a (-ade, -at), to seek, hanker after.
    finge, see få.
    fing|er (-ret, rar), finger.
    finna (fann, pl. funno, funnit, funnen), to find.
    finnas (fanns, funnits), to be found, exist.
    finn|e (-en, -ar), Finlander.
    fira (-ade, -at), to celebrate.
    fisk (-en, -ar), fish.
    fjord (-en, -ar), fiord, bay.
    fjäder (-ern, -rar), feather.
    fjäll (-en, -ar, or --), mountain.
    fjällig, scaly.
    fjärd (-en, -ar), bay.
    fjärde, fourth.
    fjäril (en, -ar), butterfly.
    fjärran, far away, distant.
    fjättr|a (-ade, -at), to chain.
    flagg|a (-an, -or), flag.
    flamma (-ade, -at), to flame, flare.
    flamm|a (-an, -or), flame, fire.
    flax|a (-ade, -at), to flap the wings, flicker.
    flick|a (-an, -or) girl.
    flintkniv (-en, -ar), flint knife.
    flitig, diligent.
    flockvis, in flocks.
    flod (-en, -er), river.
    flugen, see flyga.
    flutit, see flyta.
    fly (-dde, -tt), to flee.
    flyga, (flög, flugit, flugen), to fly, speed.
    flykt (-en), flight.
    flykt|a (-ade, -at), to flee.
    flyktig, flighty, evanescent.
    flyta (flöt, flutit, fluten), to flow, drift, float.
    fläck (-en, -ar), spot, blemish.
    fläck|a (-ade, -at), to tarnish.
    fläcklös, spotless.
    fläkt (-en, -ar), breeze, gust of wind.
    flärd (-en), vanity, deceit.
    fläsk (-et), pork.
    flät|a (-ade, -at), to braid.
    flöd|a (-ade, -at), to flow, pour.
    flög, see flyga.
    flöt, see flyta.
    fnys|a (-te, or fnös, -t), to sniff, snort.
    fnös, see fnysa.
    fog|a (-ade, -at), to join, -- hop, to join together.
    folk (et, --), people.
    for, see fara.
    fordom, formerly.
    fordr|a (-ade, -at), to demand.
    fordran, indecl., demand.
    forna, former.
    forntid  (-en), antiquity, former time.
    forntidabild (-en, -er), ancient image.
    forntidsminne (-t, -n), memory of the past.
    fors (-en, -ar), rapids, current.
    fort, fast, hurriedly.
    fosterbroder (-n, -bröder), fosterbrother.
    fosterdotter (-ern, -döttrar), fosterdaughter.
    fosterfader (-n, -fäder), fosterfather.
    fosterjord (-en), native soil.
    fosterson (-en, -söner), fosterson.
    fostrare (-n, --), fosterer.
    fot (-en, fötter), foot.
    fradga (-n), foam.
    fragga, see fradga.
    fram, forth, along.
    fram|bryta (-bröt, -brutit), to advance, press forth.
    framför|a (-de, -t), to deliver, bring.
    framför(e), before, in front of.
    framme, at destination, there.
    framsus|a (-ade, -at), to murmur, rustle forth.
    fred (-en), peace.
    fredlig, peaceable.
    frestare (-n, --), tempter.
    frestelse  (-n, -r), temptation.
    fri, free.
    fri|a (-ade, -at), to court, woo.
    friare (-n, --), wooer.
    friboren, freeborn.
    frid (-en), peace.
    fridlyst, protected, inviolate.
    fridlös, peaceless, outlawed.
    fridsam, peaceable.
    fridsbud (-et, --), peace messenger, message of peace.
    fridsmö (-n, -r), peace maiden.
    fridsäll, peaceable, peace loving.
    frieri (-et, -er), courtship.
    frihet (-en, -er) liberty, freedom.
    frisk, healthy, fresh.
    fristad (-en, -städer), haven of refuge.
    frod|as (-ades, -ats), to flourish, grow, luxuriate.
    from, pious.
    fromhet (-en), piety.
    fromhetsgud (-en), god of piety.
    fromma, indecl., gain, advantage.
    fross|a (-ade, -at), to revel, gormandize.
    fru (-n, -ar), lady, wife.
    frukt (-en, -er), fruit.
    frukt|a (-ade, -at), to fear.
    frust|a (-ade, -at), to snort, sputter.
    frysa (frös, frusit, frusen), to freeze.
    fråg|a (-ade, -at), to ask.
    fråg|a (-an, or), question.
    från, from.
    fräck, brazen.
    fräls|a (-ade or -te, -at or -t), to save, rescue.
    främling (-en, -ar), stranger.
    främmande, strange.
    främst, foremost.
    frände (-n, -r), male relative.
    fränk|a (-an, -or), female relative.
    fräs|a (-te, -t), to frizzle, sputter, foam.
    frö (-et, -n), seed.
    fröjd (-en, -er), joy, pleasure.
    full, full.
    fullbräddad, filled to the brim.
    fullvuxen, full grown.
    fulländ|a (-ade, -at), to complete.
    funno, see finna.
    fur|a (-an, -or), fir, pine; av furu, of pine wood.
    furst|e (-en, -ar), prince.
    fyll|a (-de, -t), to fill.
    fyllig, plump.
    fyra, four.
    få, few.
    få (fick, pl. fingo, fått), to get, be allowed, receive, be compelled.
    fåfäng, vain.
    fåg|el (-eln, -lar), bird.
    fågelbo (-et, -n), bird's nest.
    fåkunnig, ignorant.
    fål|e (-en, -ar), colt, steed.
    fåll|a (-ade), to hem.
    fång|a (-ade, -at, -ad or fången), to capture.
    får (-et, --), sheep.
    fäder (pl. of fader, father), ancestors.
    fädernedal (-en, -ar), native valley.
    fädernesland (-et, --), native country.
    fädernestrand (-en, -stränder), native shore.
    fägn|a (-ade, -at), to please.
    fäll|a (-de, -t), to strike down, fell.
    fält (-et, --), field.
    färd (-en, -er), journey; å färde, on the way, pending.
    färdig, ready.
    färg (-en, -er), color.
    färg|a (-ade, -at), to color.
    färglös, colorless.
    fäst|a (-ade, -at), to fasten, bind, attach.
    fäste (-t, -n), stronghold, hilt, firmament.
    fästning (-en, -ar), fortification.
    föda (födde, fött), to give birth to, nourish.
    födelse or födsel (-n), birth.
    föga, little.
    följ|a (-de, -t), to follow, accompany.
    föll, see falla.
    fönst|er (-ret, --), window.
    för, for, before, in behalf of.
    för (-en), prow.
    för|a (-de, -t), to bring, conduct.
    förakt|a (-ade, -at), to despise.
    föraktlig, scornful, despicable.
    förbannelse (-n, -r), curse.
    förbi, past.
    för|binda (-band, pl. -bundo, -bundit, -bunden), to bandage, unite.
    förbittrad, incensed.
    förbittring (-en), anger.
    förblev, see förbliva
    för|bliva (-blev, -blivit, -bliven), to remain.
    för|blöda (-blödde, -blött), to bleed to death.
    förbrän|na (-de, -t), to consume by fire.
    fördjup|a (-ade, -ät), de deepen.
    fördraga (-drog, -dragit, -dragen), to tolerate.
    fördunkl|a (-ade, -at) to make dim.
    föröm|a (-de, -t), to condemn.
    före, before.
    förebild (-en, -er), prototype, model.
    fören|a (-ade or -te, -at or -t), to unite.
    förening (-en, -ar), union.
    förespel (-et, --), prelude.
    förespråkersk|a (-an, -or), female pleader, advocate.
    före|stå (-stod, -stått), to be near at hand, be imminent.
    för|flyta (-flöt, -flutit, -fluten), to pass by, elapse.
    för|frysa (-frös, -frusit, -frusen), to freeze severely.
    förfärlig, terrible.
    förfölj|a (-de, -t), to pursue.
    förglöm|ma (-de, -t), to forget.
    för|gråta (-grät, -gråtit,) to pass the time in weeping; förgråten,
      red-eyed or swollen from weeping.
    för|gå (-gick, -gått, -gången), to pass by (time); förgås, to perish.
    förgård (-en, -ar), outer court.
    förgäten, forgotten.
    förgäves, in vain.
    förgöm|ma (-de, -t), to conceal.
    förhand, på --, beforehand.
    förhoppning (-en, -ar), hope, expectation.
    förhoppningsfull, hopeful.
    förjag|a (-ade, -at), to drive away.
    förkast|a (-ade, -at), to reject.
    förklar|a (-ade, -at), to explain.
    för|kläda (-klädde, -klätt), to disguise, masque.
    förklädning (-en, -ar), disguise.
    förlama (-ade, -at), to paralyze.
    förliden, past.
    förlik|a (-te, -t), to reconcile.
    förlit|a (-ade, or förlet, -at), to depend upon.
    förlor|a (-ade, -at), to lose.
    förlov, med --, pardon me.
    för|låta (-lät, -låtit, -låten), to forgive.
    förlät, see förlåta.
    förmörk|a (-ade, -at), to darken.
    förnam, see förnimma.
    för|nimma, (-nam, -nummit, -nummen), to hear, perceive, ascertain.
    förnummit, see förnimma.
    förny|a (-ade, -at), to renew.
    förnöj|a (-de, -t), to please.
    förolämpad, insulted.
    förpläg|a (-ade, -at), to feed, entertain.
    förr, before, formerly.
    för|råda (-rådde, -rått, rådd), to betray.
    förrän, förrn, before, until.
    förrost|a (-ade, -at), to rust.
    försak|a (-ade, -at), to renounce, deny oneself.
    församl|a (-ade, -at), to gather, assemble.
    för|sjunka (-sjönk, -sjunkit, -sjunken), to sink down,
    försjönk, see försjunka.
    för|skjuta (-sköt, -skjutit, -skjuten), to reject.
    försmå (-dde, -tt), to disdain.
    för|smälta (-smalt, -smultit), to melt.
    förson|a (-ade, -at), to propitiate.
    försonare (-n, --), propitiator.
    försoning (-en), atonement, reconciliation.
    försoningsdag (-en, -ar), day of atonement.
    för|sova, sig (-sov, sovit), to oversleep.
    först, first.
    förströ (-dde, -tt), to divert, amuse.
    förlstå (-stod, -stått, -stådd), to understand.
    förstäm|ma (-de, -t), to depress.
    förstör|a (-de, -t), to destroy.
    försvann, see försvinna.
    försvar|a (-ade, -at), to defend.
    försvinna (-svann, pl. -svunno, -svunnit, -svunnen), to disappear.
    försök|a (-te, -t), to try.
    förtäl|a (-ade, -at), to relate, slander.
    försvunnit, see försvinna.
    förteg, see förtiga.
    för|tiga (-teg, -tegat), to conceal, keep back.
    förtjust, pleased, delighted.
    förtjän|a (-ade, -at), to earn, deserve.
    förtjänst (-en, -er), merit.
    fortork|a (-ade, -at), to dry up, wither.
    förtro (-dde, -tt), to entrust, confide.
    förtrogen (vän), confidential friend.
    fortroll|a (-ade, -at), to bewitch.
    förtryck[a (-te, -t), to oppress.
    förtyn|a (-ade, -at), to waste away.
    förtälj|a (-de, or förtaide, -t, or förtalt), to relate, tell.
    förtörn|a (-ade, -at), to anger, vex.
    föränderlig, changeable.
    forundr|a (-ade, -at), to fill with wonder; -- sig, to wonder, marvel.
    förut, before.
    förutan, without.
    forvirr|a (-ade, -at), to confuse, confound.
    förvågen, reckless.
    förvägr|a (-ade, -at), to refuse.
    förändr|a (-ade, -at), to change.
    för|öda (-ödde, -ött), to waste.

    G.

    gagn|a (-ade, -at), to benefit.
    gala (gol, galit), to crow.
    galder (-n, galdrar), incantation.
    galt (-en, -ar), boar.
    gammal, old.
    gamman, indecl., pleasure, joy.
    gap (-et, --), mouth, jaws.
    gapa (-ade, -at), to yawn, gape.
    gav, see giva.
    geirsodd (-en), death rune.
    gemensam, common, mutual.
    gen, short, near.
    genast, at once.
    genmäl|a (-de, -t), to retort.
    genom, through.
    genomborr|a (-ade, -at), to pierce, thrust through.
    genomströmm|a (-ade, -at), to flow through.
    gestalt (-en, -er), figure, body.
    gick, see gå.
    giftoman (-nen, -män), one who gives another in marriage.
    giljarfärd (-en, -er), wooing trip or expedition.
    ginge, gingo, see gå.
    gissning (-en, -ar), guess.
    giva, ge (gav, g&vo, givit, given), to give.
    givmild, generous.
    gjallarhorn (-et), giallarhorn, the trumpet of Heimdall.
    gjord, see göra.
    gjuta (göt, gjutit, gjuten), to pour, mold, shed.
    glad, glad, happy, merry.
    gladde, see glädja.
    glans (-en), splendor,
    glasrut|a (-an, -or), window pane.
    glatt, smooth.
    glesn|a (-ade, -at), to grow sparse.
    glittr|a (-ade, -at), to glitter.
    glädja (pr. gläder, gladde, glatt), to make glad, rejoice.
    gläder, see glädja.
    glädje (-n), joy.
    glättig, glad, happy.
    glöd (-en), glow.
    glöda (glödde, glött), to glow.
    glödhet, glowing hot.
    glöm|ma (-de -t), to forget.
    glömska (-n), oblivion, forgetfulness.
    gnist|a (-an, -or), spark.
    gnistr|a (-ade, -at), to sparkle.
    gnugga (-ade, -at), to rub.
    gny (-et), commotion, murmur.
    gnägg|a (-ade, -at), to neigh.
    god, good.
    godo, med or i --, willingly.
    gods (-et, --), goods, property.
    golv (-et, --), floor.
    grav (-en, -ar), grave.
    gravhög (-en, -ar), barrow, grave mound.
    gravöl (-et), funeral feast.
    gren (-en, -ar), branch.
    grep, see gripa.
    griff|el (-eln, -lar), pencil.
    grift (-en, -er), grave.
    gripa (grep, gripit, gripen), to seize.
    gro (-dde, -tt), to sprout, grow.
    groll (-et), grudge, quarrel.
    grop (-en, -ar), dimple, pit.
    grovhyvlad, rough planed.
    grubb|la (-ade, -at), to brood.
    gruml|a (-ade, -at), to make turbid.
    grund, shallow.
    grund (-et, --), shoal; till --, to the bottom.
    grund (-en, -er), basis, foundation.
    grundmurad, provided with solid floor and walls of masonry.
    grus, (-et), gravel, earth, i -- in ruins.
    gry (-de, -tt), to dawn, break.
    grym, fierce, cruel.
    gråhårig, grayhaired.
    gråskäggig, having gray beard.
    gråta (grät, gråtit), to weep.
    gråtersk|a (-an, -or), woman who weeps.
    gräns (-en, -er), boundary, limit.
    gräs (-et), grass.
    gräselig or gräslig, hideous.
    grät, see gråta.
    grön, green.
    grönklädd, covered with verdure.
    grönlummig, leafy, with dense foliage.
    grönsk|a (-ade, -at), to turn or grow green.
    grönska (-n), verdure.
    grönvirkad, crocheted in green.
    gubb|e (-en, -ar), old man.
    gud (-en, -ar), god.
    gudabarm (-en, -ar), divine bosom.
    gudablod (-et), blood of the gods, of divine ancestry.
    gudabälte (-t, -n), divine girdle.
    gudaglans (-en), divine splendor.
    gudahus (-et, --), temple.
    gudakrans (-en, -ar), divine wreath.
    gudalund (-en, -ar or -er), sacred grove.
    gudatimrad, god-built.
    gudinn|a (-an, -or), goddess.
    gudomlig, divine.
    gul, yellow, golden.
    guld, gull (-et), gold.
    guldbelagd, gold inlaid.
    guldfot (-en, -fötter), gold foot.
    guldgul, golden yellow.
    guldhjälm, (-en, -ar), gold helmet.
    guldhov (-en, -ar), gold-shod hoof.
    guldinlagd, gold inlaid.
    guldkam (-men, -mar), golden comb.
    guldkammig, golden combed.
    guldklo (-n, -r), golden claw.
    guldring (-en, -ar), gold ring.
    guldsadlad, with gold-mounted saddle.
    guldsköld (-en, -ar), gold shield.
    guldstol (-en, -ar), golden chair or seat.
    guldsträng (-en, -ar), gold string.
    guldtand (-en, -tänder), golden tooth.
    gull, see guld.
    gullhov, see guldhov.
    gullmanig, with golden mane.
    guln|a (-ade, -at), to turn yellow.
    gung|a (-ade, -at), to rock.
    gyllene, golden.
    gyllenläder (-ret), gilded leather, bronze leather.
    gå (gick, pl. gingo, gått, gången), to go, extend, move.
    gång (-en, -ar), path, walk, course.
    gång (-en, -er), time, occasion.
    gångare (-n, --), steed, horse.
    går, i --, yesterday.
    gård (-en, -ar), homestead, estate, yard.
    gåv|a (-an, -or), gift.
    gåvo, see giva.
    gäck|a (-ade, -at), to scorn, deceive.
    gäld|a (-ade, -at), to make amends for.
    gäll|a (-de, -t), to be of account, -- lifvet, life is at stake.
    gärd (-en, -er), tribute, reward.
    gärna, willingly, freely.
    gäst (-en, -er), guest.
    gäst|a (-ade, -at), to visit as guest.
    gästabud (-et, --), banquet, feast.
    gästfri, hospitable.
    gästfrihet (-en), hospitality.
    gäl (-en, -ar), pool.
    gäm|ma (-de, -t), to conceal.
    gära (gjorde, gjort, gjord), to do, make.
    gärd|el (-eln, -lar), girdle,
    göt, see gjuta.

    H.

    ha, abbrev. of hava.
    hag|e (-en, -ar), pasture, grove.
    hade, see hava.
    hagelskur (-en, -ar), shower of hail, hail storm.
    hagl|a (-ade, -at), to hail.
    halm (-en), straw.
    hak|a (-ade, -at), to hook.
    hals (-en, -ar), neck.
    halt|a (-ade, -at), to limp, hobble.
    halv, half.
    halvbränd, half burnt.
    halvdränkt, half submerged.
    halvrund (-en, -er), semicircle.
    halvslocknad, half extinguished.
    halvsläckt, half extinguished.
    halvvred, vexed, angry.
    hammare (-n, -- or hamrar), hammer.
    hamn (-en, -ar), harbor.
    hamr|a (ade, -at), to hammer.
    han, he.
    hand (-en, händer), hand.
    handfull, handful.
    handkraft (-en), physical power.
    handsbred, one hand wide.
    handslag (-et, --), hand clasp.
    han|e (-en, -ar), cock.
    hang, see hänga,
    hann, see hunno.
    hans, his.
    harm (-en), anger.
    harp|a (-an, -or), harp.
    harpoljud (-et, --), sound of the harp.
    harpoton (-en, -er), tone of the harp.
    hast, haste.
    hast|a (-ade, -at), to hasten.
    hastig, speedy.
    hat (-et), hatred.
    hat|a (-ade, -at), to hate.
    hatt (-en, -ar), hat.
    hav (-et, --), ocean.
    hava, ha (hade, haft), to have.
    havsbrud (-en, -ar), ocean bride.
    havsskum (-met), ocean spray.
    havstroll (-et, --), sea monster.
    havsval (-en, -ar), whale.
    havsörn (-en, -ar), sea eagle.
    hed (-en, -ar), heath.
    heden, heathen.
    heder (-n), honor.
    hedersgubb|e (-en, -ar), worthy or venerable old man.
    hejsan, hey, hurrah.
    hel, whole, entire.
    helt, quite, entirely.
    helgedom (-en, -ar), temple.
    helig, sacred, holy.
    hell, hail.
    heller, either.
    hellre, helst, rather, more or most willingly.
    helstekt, roasted whole.
    hem (-met, --), home.
    hembygd (-en, -er), native place.
    hemma, at home.
    hemsk, terrible.
    hemväg, (-en, -ar), the way home.
    henne, acc. of hon, her.
    hennes, gen. of hon, hers.
    hermelin (-en), ermine.
    hermelinsmantlad, ermine mantled.
    herr, sir.
    herr|e (-en, -ar), master, lord.
    het, warm.
    het|a (-te, -at), to be called, named.
    hillebard (-en, -er), halberd.
    himlabåg|e (-en, -ar), heavenly arch.
    himlaflamm|a (-an, -or), lightning flash.
    himlarand (-en), horizon.
    him|mel (-meln, -len or -melen, -lar), heaven, sky.
    himmelsk, heavenly.
    himmelsblå, azure blue.
    himlafält (-et, --), firmament, sky.
    hin, the.
    hind (-en, -ar), hind, young deer.
    hind|er (-ret, --), hindrance, obstacle.
    hindr|a (-ade, -at), to hinder.
    hingst (-en, -ar), stallion.
    hinna (hann, pl hunno, hunnit, hunnen), to have time for, overtake.
    hinsidan, on the other side.
    hiss|a (-ade, -at), to hoist; -- segel, to set sail.
    hit, hither.
    hitt|a (-ade, -at), to find.
    hjalt (-et, --), hilt.
    hjord (-en, -ar), flock.
    hjort (-en, -ar), stag.
    hjul (-et, --), wheel.
    hjälm (-en, -ar), helmet.
    hjälmhatt (-en, -ar), helmet, helmet hat.
    hjälp|a (-te, or halp, -t, or hulpit, hulpen), to assist, help.
    hjält|e (-en, -ar), hero.
    hjälteamma (-an, -or), mother of heroes.
    hjältearm (-en, -ar), heroic arm.
    hjältebarm (-en, -ar), heroic bosom.
    hjälteblick (-en, -ar), heroic glance.
    hjältefader (-n, -fäder), heroic father, father of heroes.
    hjältebragd (-en, -er), heroic deed.
    hjältefog (-et), heroic tone or mien.
    hjältekraft (-en), heroic power.
    hjältemod (-et), heroic courage.
    hjältemull (-en), heroic soil, dust of heroes.
    hjälterykte (-t), heroic fame.
    hjältesinne (-t), heroic mind.
    hjälteson (-en, söner), heroic son, son of a hero.
    hjältesång (-en, -er), heroic song.
    hjältevrede (-n), heroic anger.
    hjärta (-t, -n), heart.
    hjärtlig, hearty, sincere.
    hjäss|a (-an, -or), crown of the head.
    holmgång (-en, -ar), duel.
    hon, she.
    honom, acc. of han, him.
    honungG (-en), honey.
    hop (-en, -ar), crowd, throng.
    hopfog|a (-ade, -at), to join together.
    hopp (-et, --), leap.
    hopp (-et), faith, hope.
    hopp|a (-ade, -at), to jump.
    hopp|as (-ades, -ats), to hope.
    hopträng|a (-de, -t), to compress.
    horn (-et, --), horn.
    horndryck (-en), drink from the horn.
    hos, by, with, at the home of.
    hot (-et), threat.
    hot|a (-ade, -at), to threaten.
    hov (-en, -ar), hoof.
    hov (-et, --), court.
    hov, see häva.
    hovman (-nen, -män), courtier.
    hud (-en, -ar), skin, pelt.
    hugg (-et, --), blow, thrust, stroke.
    hugga (högg, huggit, huggen), to hew, cut, strike.
    hull (-et), flesh.
    hulling (-en, -ar), barb, hook.
    hulpit, see hjälpa.
    humle (-n), hops.
    hund (-en, -ar), dog.
    hundra, hundrade, hundred.
    hundramilaslätt (-en, -er), plain of a hundred miles.
    hundraårig, a hundred years old.
    hungrig, hungry.
    hunnit, see hinna.
    hur, huru, how, howsoever.
    hus (-et, --), house, dwelling.
    husfolk (-et, --), house servants.
    husvill, homeless.
    huvud (-et, -en), head.
    huvudskall|e (-en, -ar), skull.
    hucklare (-n, --), hypocrite.
    håg (-en), mind, inclination.
    hål (-et, --), hole.
    håll (-et, --), direction.
    hålla (höll, hållit, hållen), to hold, keep, contain.
    hållning (-en), bearing.
    hån (-et), scorn.
    hår (-et, --), hair.
    hård, hard, cruel, severe.
    hårdhet (-en), hardness, harshness.
    hårdhänt, rough, severe.
    hårvuxen, hairy.
    häg|er (-ern, -rar), heron.
    hägn|a (-ade, -at), to protect.
    hägring (-en, -ar), mirage.
    hälft (-en, -er), a half.
    häll (-en, -ar), hearth, rock.
    häls|a (-ade, -ät), ta greet, acclaim.
    hälsa, (-n), health.
    hälsning (-en, -ar), greeting.
    hämnd (-en), revenge.
    hämn|a (-ade, -at), to avenge.
    hämt|a (-ade, -at), to bring, fetch.
    hän, away.
    hän|da (-de, -t), to happen.
    häng|a (-de, or hang, -t), to häng.
    hänglås (-et, --), padlock.
    hänryckning (-en), ecstasy.
    häpen, astounded.
    här, here.
    här (-en, -ar), army.
    härbud (-et, --), war messenger, or message.
    härd (-en, -ar), hearth.
    härd|a (-ade, -at), to harden.
    härinne, in here.
    härj|a (-ade, -at), to devastate.
    härlig, glorious, beautiful.
    härmed, herewith.
    härnad (-en, -er), warfare, warlike expedition.
    härold (-en, -er), herald.
    härom, concerning it.
    härskarbud (-et, -en), word of command.
    härskarblick (-en, -ar), lordly mien, glance of a ruler.
    härskarnyck (-en, -er), whim of authority.
    härskarord (-et, -en), royal command, word of authority.
    härskri (-et, --, or -n), warcry.
    härsköld (-en, -ar), war shield.
    härslag (-et,--), battle.
    härtåg (-et, --), military expedition.
    häst (-en, -ar), horse.
    häv|a (-de, -t), to raise, lift, rise and fall.
    hävd (-en, -er), annals.
    höft (-en, -er), hip,
    hög (-en, -ar),mound, pile, grave.
    hög, high, loud.
    högbarmad, high-bosomed.
    högg, see hugga.
    högbänk (-en, -ar), high seat, seat of honor.
    höghornad, long-horned.
    högre, higher.
    högsätespelare (-n, --), pillar of the high seat, or seat of honor.
    högvälvd, high arched.
    högättad, of high descent.
    höj|a (-de, -t), to raise, lift.
    höjd (-en, -er), height, eminence.
    hök (-en, -ar), hawk.
    hölj|a (-de, -t), to cover.
    höll, see hålla.
    hör|a (-de, -t), to hear, listen. -- samman, belong together,
      -- till, belong to.
    höst (-en, -ar), autumn.
    höstting (-et, --), fall thing or court.
    höv|as (-des, -ts), to be fitting,
    hövding (-en, -ar), chief.
    hövisk, courtly, polite.

    I.

    i, you.
    i, in, into, at, for, to, by, with.
    ibland, among, sometimes.
    icke, not.
    idel, nothing but.
    idrott (-en, -er), sport, achievement.
    ifrån, from.
    igen, again.
    igenkän|na (-de, -t), to recognize.
    igenom, through.
    ihjäl, to death; slå ----, to kill.
    ihop, together.
    il (-en, -ar), gust of wind.
    il|a (-ade, -at), to run fast.
    illa, bad, evil.
    in, in, on.
    in|driva (-drev, -drivit, -driven), to collect.
    inför, before, face to face with.
    ingen, no, no one, none.
    ingenting, nothing.
    in|giva (-gav, pl. gåvo, -givit, -given), to give, inspire.
    innan, before, ere.
    innanför, within.
    inne, in, within.
    inom, within.
    insteg, see instiga.
    in|stiga (-steg, -stigit, -stigen), to enter.
    insvep|a (-te, -t), to envelop, dress.
    in|taga (-tog, -tagit, -tagen), to seize, take possession of.
    intet, nothing.
    intill, to, unto.
    intog, see intaga.
    in|träda (-trädde, -trätt), to enter.
    inunder, under.
    invid, by, close to.
    invän|da (-de, -t), to interpose objection, answer.
    irr|a (-ade, -at), to wander about aimlessly.
    is (-en, -ar), ice.
    isbjörn (-en, -ar), polar bear.
    itu, in twain.
    iver (-n), zeal, animation.


    J.

    jag, I.
    jag|a (-ade, -at), to hunt, chase, drive.
    jakt (-en, -er), hunt.
    jarl (-en, -ar), jarl, earl.
    joll|er (-ret), foolish prattle.
    jord (-en), earth, soil.
    jordisk, earthly.
    jul (-en, -ar), yule.
    jul|a (-ade, -at), to celebrate yule.
    julerus (-et, ----), yuletide spree.
    jungfru (-n, -r), maiden, virgin.
    jungfrubur (-en, -ar), maiden's bower.
    just, just, exactly.
    juv|er (-ret, ----), udder.
    jägare (-n, ----), hunter.
    jägarskar|a (-an, -or), band of hunters.
    jämnårig, of the same age.
    jämt, always.
    jämte, by, also, besides.
    jämväl, besides.
    järn (-et), iron.
    järnek (-en, -ar), holly oak.
    järnfast, firm or strong as iron.
    järnlans (-en, -ar), iron lance.
    järnsko (-n, -r), iron shoe.
    jätt|e (-en, -ar), giant.
    jättesten (-en, -ar), giant rock.
    jätteverk (-et, ----), giant undertaking.


    K.

    kalk|a (-ade, -at), to cover with lime.
    kall, cold.
    kall|a (-ade, -at), to call.
    kall|as (-ades, -ats), to be named.
    kallbräckt, cold-short, brittle.
    kalln|a (-ade, -at), to grow cold.
    kam (-men, -mar), comb.
    kamin (-en, -er), stove.
    kammar(e) (-n, --), chamber.
    kamp (-en), struggle.
    kamrat (-en, -er), comrade.
    kan, see kunna.
    kanhända, perhaps.
    kanske, perhaps.
    kant, (-en, -er), border.
    kapp, i --, in a race.
    kapp|a (-an, -or), mantle, cloak, hood.
    karg, chary.
    karm (-en, -ar), back and arms of a chair.
    kast|a (-ade, -at), to cast, throw.
    kedj|a (-an, -or), chain.
    kind (-en, -er), cheek.
    klag|a (-ade, -at), to complain.
    klagan, indecl., complaint.
    klagoröst (-en, -er), voice of complaint.
    klandr|a (-ade, -at), to criticise.
    klang, see klinga.
    klang (-en), ring, clang.
    klapp|a (-ade, -at), to clap, beat, knock.
    klar, clear.
    klarnad, clear.
    klenod, (-en, -er), gem, jewel, valuable.
    kling|a (-ade or klang, pl. klungo, -at or klungit), to resound,
    drink a toast.
    kling|a (-an, -or), sword.
    klint (-en, -er), peak, brow of rock.
    klipp|a (-an, -or), cliff, rock.
    klipp|g, rocky.
    klo (-n, -r) claw.
    klok, wise.
    klot (-et, --), sphere, ball.
    klungo, see klinga.
    klyft|a (-an, or), cleft, ravine.
    klyva (klöv, kluvit, kluven), to cleave, split.
    kläda (klädde, klätt), to clothe.
    kläder, no sing., clothes,
    kläm|ma (-de, -t), to squeeze, press.
    klättr|a (-ade, -at), to climb,
    klösja (-te, -t), to tear with claws or nails.
    klöv, see klyva.
    knak|a (-ade, -at), to creak.
    knapp, scarce.
    knapp (-en, -ar), button, knob.
    knappast, hardly.
    knattr|a (-ade, at), to crackle.
    knopp (-en, -ar), bud.
    knopp|as (-ades, -ats), to bud.
    knot (-et), complaint.
    knuten, see knyta.
    knyta (knöt, knutit, knuten), to tie, bind.
    knä (-et, -n), knee.
    knäpp|a (-te, -t), to fasten, buckle; -- händerna, clasp the hands.
    knäsatt, placed in one's lap.
    kog|er (-ret, --), quiver.
    koka (-ade, -at), to boil.
    kolsvart, coal black.
    kolv (-en, -ar), butt.
    komma (kom, kommit, kommen), to come, get, -- fram, come up, forth,
      arrive.
    konst (-en, -er), art.
    konstnär (-en, -er), artist.
    konstarbetad, artistically wrought.
    konsterfaren, skilled, artistic.
    konstfull, artistic.
    konstnär (-en, -er), artist.
    konung (-en, -ar), king.
    konungasal (-en, -ar), king's hall.
    konungason, (-en, -söner), king's son.
    konungastad (-en, -städer), royal city.
    konungaval (-et, --), royal election.
    kopparköl (-en, -ar), copper keel.
    kopparstöpt, molded in copper.
    koppartrösk|el (-eln, -lar), copper threshold.
    kor|a (-ade, -at), to choose.
    korall (-en, -er), coral.
    korn, (-et), barley, grain.
    kornland (-et, --), field of grain.
    kors|a (-ade, -at), to cross.
    kort, short; inom --, shortly, ere long, soon.
    kos, gå, fly sin --, depart.
    kos|a (-an, -or), course.
    kost|a (-ade, -at), to cost.
    kostelig, costly, precious.
    krafs|a (-ade, -at), to scratch.
    kraft (-en, -er), power, strength.
    kraftlös, powerless.
    kram (-et), merchandise, gimcrack, trumpery, trash.
    krans (-en, -ar), wreath.
    krets (-en, -ar), circle.
    krig (-et, --), war.
    kring, round, around, about.
    kringdans|a (-ade, -at) to dance around.
    kring|stryka (-strök, -strukit), to roam about.
    kringsvärm|a (-ade, -at), to roam about.
    kringång|a (-ade, -at), surround by perfume.
    kroknäbb (-et, --), hook-bill, one having a crooked beak.
    kron|a (-an, -or), crown.
    kropp (-en, -ar), body.
    kross|a (ade, -at), to crush.
    kryck|a (-an, -or), crutch.
    krämare (-n, --), merchant, trader.
    kränk|a (-te, -t), to insult, wrong.
    kräv|a (-de, -t), to exact, demand.
    krökt, bent, crooked.
    krön|a (-te, -t), to crown, adore.
    kul|a (-an, -or), cave, den.
    kulen, bleak.
    kull|e (-en, -ar), knoll, hill.
    kum|mel (-let, --), funeral mound, cairn.
    kung (-en, -ar), king.
    kungablod (-et), royal blood.
    kungadotter (-n, -döttrar), king's daughter.
    kungaed (-en, -er), royal oath.
    kungahus (-et, --), king's house, royal house.
    kungahöghet (-en), royal greatness.
    kungasal (-en, -ar), royal hall.
    kungason (-en, -söner), king's son.
    kungastol (-en, -ar), royal seat.
    kungaval (-et, --), royal election.
    kungasäte (-t, -n), royal seat.
    kunglig, royal.
    kungsgård (-en, -ar), king's hall or estate.
    kungsniding (-en, -ar), traitor king.
    kungsord (-et, --), royal word.
    kungssal (-en, -ar), king's hall.
    kunna (pres. kan, kunde, kunnat), to be able, can, know.
    kupig, convex.
    kust (-en, -er), coast, shore.
    kuttr|a (-ade, -at), to coo.
    kvald, see kvälja.
    kvar, remaining, left.
    kvar|bliva (-blev, -blivit, -bliven), to remain.
    kvar|hålla (-höll, -hållit, -hållen), to retain, keep.
    kvarhöll, see kvarhålla.
    kvav, sultry, close; gå i --, go to the bottom.
    kvickn|a (-ade, -at) vid, to revive, come to life again.
    kvida (kved, kvidit), to wail, whine.
    kvinn|a (-an, -or), woman.
    kvinnoskepnad (-en, -er), woman's form.
    kvist (-en, -ar), branch.
    kvittr|a (-ade, -at), to twitter.
    kväda (kvad, kvädit, kväden), to sing, speak.
    kväde (-t, -n), song.
    kvälj|a (-de or kvalde, kvalt, kvald), to choke, torment.
    kväll (-en, -ar), evening.
    kväv|a (-de, -t), to suffocate, quench.
    kyl|a (-de, -t), to cool.
    kyss|a (-te, -t), to kiss.
    käck, brave, spirited.
    käll|a (-an, -or), spring, fountain.
    källare (-n, --), cellar.
    kämp|a (-ade, -at), to fight, struggle.
    kämp|e (-en, -ar), warrior.
    kämpehand (-en, -händer), heroic hand.
    kämpehär (-en, -ar), army of warriors.
    känd, known.
    kän|na (-de, -t), to know, feel.
    känsl|a (-an, -or), feeling.
    kär, dear.
    kärl (-et, --), vessel.
    kärlek (-en), love.
    kärleksbrev (-et, --), love letter.
    kärleksfull, loving.
    kärn|a (-an, -or), kernel.
    kärnfull, rich, pithy.
    kärnfur (-an, -or), sound fir tree.
    kärnspråk (-et, --), wise saying.
    köl (-en, -ar), keel.
    köld (-en), cold.
    kör|a (-de, -t), to drive.

    L.

    lack|a (-ade, -at), to drip (of perspiration).
    lad|a (-an, -or), barn, granary.
    laddning (-en, -ar), cargo.
    lade, see lägga.
    lag (-en, -ar), law.
    lag (-et, --), group, crowd.
    lagerlund (-en, -ar), laurel grove.
    lamm|m (-met, --), lamb.
    land (-et, länder or --), land.
    landsflykt (-en), exile.
    lans (-en, -ar), lance.
    larm (-et), noise, din.
    larm|a (-ade, -at), to make noise.
    le (log, lett), smile, laugh.
    led, mean, ugly.
    led, see lida.
    leda (ledde, lett), to lead, direct.
    ledig, vacant.
    ledsen, sad; --vid, weary of.
    lek (-en, -ar), play, frolic.
    lek|a (-te, -t), to play.
    lekplats (-en, -er), playground.
    let|a (-te or -ade, -at), to search.
    lev|a (-de, -t), to live.
    levnad (-en), life.
    levnadslust (-en), joy of living.
    lida (led, lidit, liden), to suffer pain; -- mot, or emot, approach.
    lidande (-t, -n), suffering.
    ligga (låg, legat, legad), to lie.
    lik, lika, like, just as, equally.
    likafullt, just the same.
    lik|e (no def. sing., -ar), equal.
    likn|a (-ade, -at), to resemble.
    liksom, just as, as though, as.
    likväl, anyway.
    lilj|a (-an, -or), lily.
    liljehy (-n), lily white complexion.
    liljekull|e (-en, -ar), lily mound.
    liljestäng|el (-eln, -lar), lily stem.
    liljevit, lily white.
    lilla, little, small.
    lind (-en, -ar), linden tree.
    lind|a (-ade, -at), to twine around.
    list (-en), deceit, cunning.
    lit|a (-ade, or let, -at), to depend upon.
    liten, little, small.
    liv (-et, --), life, waist.
    livstid (-en, -er), life time.
    ljud (-et, --), sound.
    ljuda (ljöd, ljudit), resound.
    ljuga (ljög, ljugit), to lie.
    ljung (-en), heather.
    ljung|a (-ade, -at), to flash.
    ljungare (-n) the thunderer.
    ljungeld (-en, -ar), flash of lightning.
    ljus, bright, light.
    ljus (-et, --), light.
    ljusalf (-en, -er), light elf.
    ljusblå, light blue.
    ljuslockig, light-haired.
    ljuv, beautiful, sweet.
    ljuvlig, sweet, delightful.
    lock (-en, -ar), lock.
    lock|a (-ade, -at), to entice, lure.
    lodrät, perpendicular.
    log, see le.
    loft (-et, --), loft.
    lossa (-ade, -at), to loosen, set free.
    lott (-en, -er), lot, fate.
    lottning (-en, -ar), casting of lot.
    lov (-et), praise.
    lov|a (-ade, -at), to promise, praise.
    lovlig, permissible.
    luden, hairy, shaggy.
    luft (-en), air.
    luftig, airy.
    lugn (-et), peace, calm, lull.
    lugn, quiet, calm.
    lull|a (-ade, -at), to hum.
    ljummig, leafy, shady.
    lumpen, mean, paltry, sordid.
    lumpor, no sing., rags.
    lund (-en, -er or -ar), grove.
    lung|a (-an, -or), lung.
    lur (-en, -ar), trumpet.
    lur|a (-ade, -at), to lurk.
    lurvhårig, shaggy.
    lust (-en), pleasure, desire.
    lustig, comical, lively, pleasurable.
    lut|a (-ade, -at), to incline, bend, lean.
    luttr|a (-ade, -at), to purify.
    lycka (-n), good fortune.
    lyck|as (-ades, -ats), to succeed.
    lycklig, fortunate, happy.
    lyda, (lydde, lytt), to obey.
    lydig, obedient.
    lyft|a (-ade, or -e, -at, or lyft), to lift.
    lykt|a (-ade, -at), to close.
    lykt|a (-an, -or), lantern, lamp.
    lysa (-te, -t), to shine.
    lysmask (-en, -ar), glowworm.
    lyssn|a (-ade, -at), to listen.
    lys|ta (-te, -t), to desire.
    låg, low.
    låg, see lägga.
    låg|a (-an, -or), flame.
    låg|a (-ade, -at), to glare, glow.
    lån|a (-ade or -te, -at or -t), to borrow, loan.
    LÅNG, long, far.
    långsam, tedious, slow.
    långskepp (-et, --), warship of the viking period.
    lås (-et, --), lock.
    låta (lät, låtit), to let, permit, sound.
    lägga (lade, lagt, lagd), to lay, put; -- i land, to land.
    lägre, lower.
    lämn|a (-ade, -at), to leave.
    lån|a (-te, -t), to borrow, loan.
    länd (-en, -er), loin, side.
    länge, long time, long.
    länger, längre, longer.
    längs (med), along, along the side of.
    längst, longest, farthest.
    längt|a (-ade, -at), to long.
    längtan, indecl., longing.
    längtansfull, longingly.
    längtersk|a (-an, -or), the longing one.
    länte, see läna.
    läpp (-en, -ar), lip.
    lär, likely, it is said.
    lär|a (-de, -t), to learn, teach.
    läx|a (-an, -or), teaching, doctrine.
    lärk|a (-an, -or), lark.
    lärospån (-en, or -et, --), first exploit, achievement.
    läs|a (-te, -t), to Read.
    lät, see låta.
    lätt, light, easy, lightly.
    lödig, of pure metal, genuine.
    löfte (-t, -n), promise.
    lög|a (-ade, -at), to wash.
    lögn (-en, -er), lie.
    löje (-t, -n), laughter, smile.
    lön (-en, -er), reward.
    lönvalv (-et, --), secret vault or chamber.
    löpning (-en, -ar), running, race, run.
    lös, loose.
    lös|a (-te, -t), to loosen, dissolve; -- en uppgift, discharge a duty.
    löslig, loose.
    löv (et, --), leaf.
    löv|as (-ades, -äts), to sprout, become green, get leaves.
    lövsal (-en, -ar), leafy bower, arbor.

    M.

    makja (-ade, -at), to move, shift.
    maka (-n, -r), mate, wife.
    mak|e (-en, -ar), husband.
    makt (-en, -er), power, might.
    malm (-en, -er), ore.
    man (-en, -ar), mane.
    man (-nen, män, or poet, manner), man.
    man, one.
    mandomsrön (-et, --), manly achievement.
    manlig, manly.
    mannaring (-en, -ar), circle of men.
    manshög, man high.
    mant|el (-eln, -lar), mantle, cloak.
    mark (-en, -er), mark (about 1/2 kilogram).
    mark (-en), ground.
    marmorbarm (-en, -ar), marble breast.
    marmorklyft (-en), solid block of marble.
    marmorsten (-en, -ar), marble.
    marmortemp|el (-let, --), marble temple.
    marvad, i --, waterlogged.
    mast (-en, -er), mast.
    mastfur|a (-an, -or), fir tree, mast tree.
    mat (-en), food.
    mat|a (-ade, -at), to feed.
    matt, weak.
    med, with, along, for, to, of.
    mellan, between.
    men, indecl., injury, bane.
    men, but.
    men|a (-ade or -te, -at or -t), to mean, intend,
    mened (-en), perjury,
    mening (-en, -ar), meaning, intention, opinion,
    mer(a), more,
    middag (-en, -ar), midday, dinner.
    midj|a (-an, -or), waist.
    midnattsdagg (-en), midnight dew.
    midnatssol (-en), midnight sun.
    midnatstid (-en), time of midnight.
    midsommar (-en, -somrar), midsummer.
    midsommarfest (-en, -er), festival of midsummer.
    midsommarsol (-en), midsummer sun.
    mig, acc. of jag, me.
    mil (-en, --), mile.
    mild, mild.
    mildhet (-en), mildness, kindness.
    min, mitt, mina, my, mine.
    mindre, less, smaller.
    min|nas (-des, -ts), to remember.
    minne (-t, -n), memory, token of remembrance.
    minst, least, smallest.
    missnöjd, dissatisfied.
    mist|a (-ade, or -te, -at or -t), to lose.
    mjöd (-et), mead.
    mjödhorn (-et, --), meadhorn.
    mjölkvit, milk white.
    mod (-et), courage, valor.
    moder (-n, mödrar), mother.
    modig, brave.
    mogen, ripe.
    mogn|a (-ade, -at), to ripen.
    moln (-et, --), cloud.
    mor, abbrev. of moder.
    mordbrand (-en), incendiarism.
    mordbrännarkung (-en, -ar), incendiary king.
    mogn|a (-ade, -at) sig, to become fully awake.
    morgon (-en, morgnar), morning.
    morgondager (-n), dawn.
    morgondagg (-en), morning dew.
    morgondröm (-men, -mar), morning dream.
    morgonglans (-en), morning light.
    morgongryning (-en), dawn.
    morgonrodnad (-en, -er), glow of dawn, aurora.
    morgonstund (-en, -er), morning hour.
    morgonvind (-en, -ar), morning wind.
    morn|a (-ade, -at) sig, to become fully awake.
    mossväxt (-en, -er), moss.
    mot, against, towards.
    mot|a (-ade, -at), to stop, keep back.
    motväg|a (-de, -t), to counterbalance.
    mulen, dark, gloomy.
    mull (-en), ground, sod.
    multen, decayed.
    mun (-nen, -nar), mouth.
    mund, see mun.
    munter, jolly, jovial, glad.
    mur (-en, -ar), wall.
    mur|a (-ade, -at), to do masonry work.
    must (-en), sap, juice, fat.
    mycket, much.
    myntad, coined.
    må (måtte), may.
    mål (-et, --), goal.
    måål|a (-ade, -at), to paint.
    målsman (-nen, -män), advocate, sponsor.
    mån (månde), perchance, might.
    månad (-en, -er), month.
    månde, see mån.
    mån|e (-en, -ar), moon.
    mången, many a one, many.
    mångfaldig, manifold.
    mångvis, erudite, very wise.
    månne, perhaps, do you think.
    månskensblick (-en, -ar), dim glances.
    månskensförst|e (-en, -ar), moonlight prince.
    mård (-en, -ar), marten.
    måste, must.
    mått (-et, --), measure.
    mäktig, mighty.
    mängd (-en), great number.
    männer, poetical for män, men.
    mänska, see människa.
    mänsklig, human.
    mänsklighet (-en), humanity.
    mänskobröst (-et,--), human heart, breast.
    människ|a (-an, -or), man, human being.
    människokraft (-en, -er), power of man.
    mänskohand (-en, -händer), human hand.
    mänskoätt (-en, -er), human family.
    mänskoöde (-et, -n), human affairs, human destiny.
    märg (-en), marrow.
    märk|a (-te, -t), to notice.
    mästare (-n, --), master.
    mö (-n, -r), maiden.
    möd|a (-an, -or), hardship, pains.
    möderne (-t), mother's side.
    mönstr|a (-ade, -at), to review, examine.
    mörd|a (-ade, -at), to kill, murder.
    mördarhand (-en, -händer), murderer's hand.
    mörk, dark.
    mörkblå, dark blue.
    mörk|er (-ret), darkness.
    mörkn|a (-ade, -at), to grow dark.
    möt|a (-te, -t), to meet.
    möte (-t, -n), meeting.

    N.

    nag|el (-em, -lar), finger nail, spike.
    naken, naked, bare.
    nalk|as (-ades, -ats), to approach.
    namn (-et, --), name.
    namnlös, nameless.
    narr (-en, -ar), fool.
    narrspel (-et, --), foolery.
    natt (-en, nätter), night.
    nattgammal, one night old.
    nattlig, nightly, dark as night.
    natur (-en), nature.
    ned, neder, ner, down.
    nedanför, below.
    neder, see ned.
    nederkall|a (-ade, -at), to call down, invoke.
    nederslagen, see nederslå.
    neder|slå (-slog, -slagit, -slagen), to strike down.
    nederst, lowest.
    nedrig, low, rascally.
    nedsteg, see nedstiga,
    ned|stiga (-steg, -stigit, -stigen), to step down, descend.
    nedåt, downwards.
    nej, no.
    nek|a (-ade, -at), to deny, refuse.
    nerifrån, from below.
    ner, see ned.
    nere, down.
    nick|a (-ade, -at), to nod.
    nidingsdåd (-et,--), villainous deed.
    niding (-en, -ar), outlaw, villain.
    nidingsfunder, no sing., malicious artifices.
    nidingsstång (-en, -stänger), niding post, pillory.
    njuta (njöt, njutit, njuten), to enjoy.
    nog, indeed, enough.
    noga, careful, carefully.
    nord (-en), the North, Scandinavia.
    nordbo (-n, -r), Northerner.
    nordisk, Northern.
    nordland (-et), the Northland, Scandinavia.
    nordman (-nen, -män), Northerner.
    nordmannakung (-en, -ar), king of the North.
    nordmannasätt (-et, --), manner of the North.
    norn|a (-an, -or), norn.
    norr, north.
    norrsken (-et, --), Northern light.
    norräna, Norse tongue.
    nu, now.
    ny, new.
    nyck (-en, -er), whim.
    nyckel (-eln, -lar), key.
    nyfälld, new-fallen.
    nyfödd, newborn.
    nyinvigd, newly dedicated.
    nyskapad, newly created.
    nyss, just now, a while ago, recently.
    nyttig, useful.
    nyvald, newly elected.
    nå (-dde, -tt), to reach.
    någon, some, some one, any, anyone.
    näktergal (-en, -ar), nightingale.
    nämn|a (-de, -t), to mention, call.
    när, when.
    nära, när, near.
    när|a (-de, -t), to nourish.
    näring (-en, -ar, pl. in sense of occupation), nourishment.
    närmast, nearest.
    näs (-et, --), point, peninsula.
    näst, next.
    nät (-et, --), net.
    nöd (-en), misery, hardship.
    nödig, necessary.
    nödvändig, necessary.
    nödvändighet (-en), necessity.
    nöjd, contented.

    O.

    o, oh, O.
    oavvänd, fixed, unceasing.
    obemärkt, unnoticed.
    obeprövad, untried.
    obeväpnad, unarmed.
    och, and.
    ock, also.
    också, also.
    odalbond|e (-en, -bonder), freehold land owner.
    odödlig, immortal.
    off|er (-ret, --), sacrifice.
    offerboll (-en, -ar), sacrificial bowl.
    offerlamp|a (-an, -or), sacrificial fire.
    offerhus (-et, --), sacrificial temple.
    offerkniv (-en, -ar), sacrificial knife.
    offerlund (-en, -ar), sacrificial grove.
    offerfrest (-en, -er), sacrificial priest.
    offersten (-en, -ar), sacrificial stone.
    offerång|a (-an, -or), sacrificial incense.
    offr|a (-ade, -at), to sacrifice.
    ofruktbar, sterile, unfruitful.
    ofta, often.
    ofärd (-en), misfortune, disaster.
    oförsonlig, unrelenting, unforgiving.
    oförsont, unpropitiated.
    ohämnad, unavenged.
    ohörd, unheard, unheeded.
    okänd, unknown.
    om, about, if, concerning, for, during, in, at.
    ombord, aboard.
    omfluten, encompassed, surrounded by water.
    omge, see omgiva.
    om|giva, omge (-gav, -givit, -given), to surround.
    omhäng|a (-ade, -at), to protect, hedge in.
    omkring, around.
    omlind|a (-ade, -at), to entwine.
    omsider, at last.
    omstrål|a (-ade, -at), to surround with light.
    omöjlig, impossible.
    ond, evil, angry, bad.
    onödig, unnecessary.
    opp, upp, up.
    ord (-et, --), word.
    orm (-en, -ar), serpent.
    ormsling|a (-an, -or), serpentine ring or figure.
    orolig, disturbed.
    ort (-en, -er), place, locality.
    oräknelig, innumerable.
    orätt, wrong.
    orätt (-en), injustice, wrong.
    osedd, unseen.
    oskadd, uninjured.
    oskapelig, unshapely.
    oskuld (-en), innocence.
    oskuldsfull, innocent.
    oss, us.
    osviklig, unfailing.
    osådd, unsown.
    outsäglig, unspeakable.
    outtydd, unexplained.
    ovan, above.
    ovan, unaccustomed, unusual.
    ovanfrån, from above.
    ovanför, above.
    ovanom, above.
    ovanuppå, above.
    oviss, uncertain.
    ovän (-nen, -ner), enemy.
    oändlig, illimitable, infinite.

    P.

    palm (-en, -er), palm.
    pann|a (-an, -or), forehead,
    pansar (-et, --), armor, sheath.
    par (-et, --), pair.
    park (-en, -er), park.
    parvis, in pairs.
    pass|a (-ade, -at), to fit, be fitting.
    pek|a (-ade, -at), to point.
    pelargång (-en, -ar), colonnade.
    pelarrad (-en, -er), row of pillars.
    pelarstam (-men, -mar), shaft of column.
    pelarstod (-en, -er), column.
    pels (-en, -ar), fur coat.
    pestsjuk, pestsmitten.
    pil (-en, -ar), arrow.
    pilregn (-et), shower of arrows.
    pilt (-en, -ar), lad.
    plank|a (-an, -or), plank.
    plant|a (-an, -or), plant.
    plats (-en, -er), place, spot.
    plock|a (-ade, -at), to pluck, gather.
    plog (-en, -ar), plow.
    plundr|a (-ade, -at), to plunder.
    port (-en, -ar), gate, portal.
    prakt (-en), splendor.
    pris (-et), price, prize, honor.
    pris|a (-ade, -at), to praise.
    propp|a (-ade, -at), to stuff.
    pryda (prydde, prytt), to adorn.
    präktig, excellent, splendid.
    präst (-en, -er), priest.
    pröv|a (-ade, -at), to test, try.
    puls (-en, -ar), pulse.
    pung (-en, -ar), pouch, purse.
    purpur (-et), purple.
    purpurbetslad, with purple bridle.
    purpurbräm (-et, --), purple border.
    purpurduk (-en), purple cloth.
    purpurglans (-en), purple glow.
    purpurhatt (-en, -ar), purple hat.
    purpurtäcke (-t, -n), purple drapery.
    på, on, upon, at, in, by.
    på|skjuta (-sköt, -skjutit), to push, press forward.
    pärl|a (-an, -or), pearl.

    R.

    rad (-en, -er), row, line.
    radvis, line by line, in lines.
    ragl|a (-ade, -at), to stagger.
    rak, straight.
    rand (-en, ränder), edge, stripe.
    rand|a (-ade, -at), to make lines, stripe, make edge or border.
    rand|as (-ades, -ats), (dagen), to dawn.
    rank|a (-an, -or), vine.
    ras|a (-ade, -at), to rage.
    rasslande, rattling.
    red, see rida.
    redan, already.
    redlig, honest.
    redo|göra (-gjorde, -gjort, -gjord), to give an account.
    regn (-et, --), rain.
    ren, pure, clean.
    ren, contr. of redan, already.
    ren|a (-ade, -at), to cleanse, purify.
    res|a (-te, -t), to rise, raise, go, travel.
    ret|a (-ade, -at), to arouse to anger, irritate.
    rev|a (-ade, -at), to reef; -- segel, take in the sail.
    rida (red, ridit), to ride.
    rig|el (-eln, -lar), bolt.
    rik, rich.
    rike (-t, -n), kingdom, dominion.
    rikedom (-en, -ar), wealth.
    ring (-en, -ar), ring.
    ringa, little, insignificant.
    ring|el (-eln, -lar), coil, ring.
    rist|a (-ade, -at), to cut, scratch.
    rit|a (-ade, -at), to write, trace.
    riva (rev, rivit, riven), to tear.
    ro (-n), peace, quiet.
    ro (-dde, -tt), to row.
    rod|er (-ret, --), rudder.
    roderstång (-en, -stänger), rudder bar.
    rodn|a (-ade, -at), to blush.
    rop|a (-ade, -at), to call, cry, shout.
    ros (-en, -or), rose.
    rosenfärg (-en, -er), rose color.
    rosenfärgad, rose-colored.
    rosengård (-en, -ar), rose garden.
    rosenkalk (-en, -ar), rose calyx.
    rosenkind (-en, -er), rosy cheek.
    rosenknopp (-en, -ar), rosebud.
    rosenläpp (-en, -ar), rosy lip.
    rosenröd, roseate, red.
    rosenving|e (-en, -ar), roseate wing.
    rosig, rosy.
    rost (-en), rust.
    rostad, rusty.
    rot (-en, rötter), root.
    rotfästad, rooted, firm.
    rov (-et, --), prey, quarry.
    rubb|a (-ade, -at), to disturb.
    rubin (-en, -er), ruby.
    rubinknapp (-en, -ar), ruby gem.
    rull|a (-ade, -at), to roll, revolve.
    rum (-met, --), room, place.
    run|a (-an, -or), rune.
    runbeskriven, inscribed with runes.
    rund, round.
    rund (-en, -er), circle.
    rund|a (-ade, -at), to surround.
    rund|el (-eln, -lar), circle.
    runeskrift (-en, -er), runic inscription.
    runetavl|a (-an, -or), runic tablet.
    runogrift (-en, -er), runic crypt.
    runohäll (-en, -ar), rune stone.
    runoflåg|a (-an, -or), rune flame.
    runstav (-en, -ar), rune staff.
    runsten (-en, -ar), rune stone.
    runtomkring, round about.
    rus (-et, --), spree, intoxication.
    rut|a (-an, -or), square, check, pane.
    ruttn|a (-ade, -at), to rot.
    ruv|a (-ade, -at), to brood.
    ryck|a (-te, -t), to tear, pull.
    rygg (-en, -ar), back.
    ryka (rök, rukit, or rykte, rykt), to smoke or steam, emit smoke.
    rykte (-t, -n), report, fame, rumor.
    rymd (-en, -er), space.
    rymlig, spacious.
    rynk|a (-ade, -at), to knit, as eyebrow or forehead.
    rys|a (-te, -t), to shudder.
    ryslig, hideous.
    ryst|a (-ade, -at), to shake.
    ryta (röt, rutit, or rytit), to roar.
    rå (-n, -r), yard (nautical term).
    rå (-dde, -tt) för, to be responsible for, -- över, govern.
    råd (-et, --), advice.
    råda, (rådde, rått), to rule, advise.
    råg (-en), rye.
    råg|a (-ade, -at), to fill to overflowing.
    rån|a (-ade, -at), to rob.
    räck|a (-te, -t), to reach, extend.
    rädas (räddes), to be afraid.
    rädd, afraid.
    rädd|a (-ade, -at), to save.
    räkn|a (-ade, -at), to count, reckon.
    rämna (-ade, -at), to split open.
    rätt, right.
    rätta, med --, justly, by right.
    rätt (-en), justice, right.
    rättvis, just.
    rättvisa (-n), justice.
    räv (-en, -ar), fox.
    röd, red.
    rök, see ryka.
    rök (-en), smoke.
    rökfång (-et, --), smoke escape, flue.
    rökmoln (-et, --), cloud of smoke.
    rön|a (-te, -t), to experience.
    rör|a (-de, -t), to move, touch.
    rörpil (-en, -ar), reed.
    röst (-en, -er), voice.
    röt, see ryta.
    röv|a (-ade, -at), to rob.
    rövare (-n, --), robber.

    S.

    sade, see säga.
    sag|a (-an, -or), saga, story.
    sagt, see säga.
    sak (-en, -er), matter, thing.
    sakn|a (-ade, -at), to miss.
    saknad (-en), regret, longing; känna --, to miss.
    sakta, slowly.
    saktmod (-et), meekness.
    sal (-en, -ar), hall, main room.
    salig, blessed.
    salighet (-en, -er), blessedness.
    salsdörr (-en, -ar), hall door.
    salt (-et), salt, adj. salt.
    saltad, salt.
    saltskum (-met), briny foam.
    sam, see simma.
    samarv (-et, --), joint inheritance.
    saml|a (-ade, -at), to gather.
    samma, the same.
    samman, together.
    sammetsmantel (-eln, -lar), velvet cloak.
    sand (-en), sand.
    sann, true.
    sanning (-en, -ar), truth.
    sans|a (-ade, -at) sig, to compose oneself.
    sansad, reasonable, sober.
    sansking (-en), sense, composure.
    satt, see sltta or sätta.
    schack (-et), chess.
    schackbord (-et, --), chess board.
    scharlakansröd, scarlet.
    se (såg, sett, sedd), to see, look.
    sed (-en, -er), custom.
    sedan, sen, since, after.
    seg|el (-let, --), sail.
    seg|er (-ern, -rar), victory.
    segl|a (-ade, -at), to sail.
    seglare (-n, --), sailor.
    segling (-en, -ar), cruise, sailing.
    segr|a (-ade, -at), to conquer.
    sen, see sedan; -- dess, since then.
    sen, late, tardy; sent omsider, at last.
    sen|a (-an, -or), sinew.
    sett, see se.
    sex, six.
    si, behold.
    sid|a (-an, -or), side.
    sig, himself, herself, itself, themselves.
    silverblank, bright as silver.
    silverbälte (-t, -n), silver belt.
    silke (-t, -n), silk.
    silv|er (-ret), silver.
    silverbild (-en, -er), silver image.
    silverfat (-et, --), silver platter.
    silverfot (-en, -fötter), silver foot.
    silverfår|a (-an, -or), silvery furrow or band.
    silverhjälm (-en, -ar), silver helmet.
    silverhår (-et, --), silvery hair.
    silverhårig, silver-haired, gray.
    silverlock (-en, -ar), silvery lock.
    silvermån|e (-en, -ar), silver moon.
    silverplåt (-en, -ar), silver plate.
    silverport (-en, -ar), silver gate.
    silverskrid|a (-an, -or), silver scabbard.
    silverskir (-et), silver gauze.
    silverskägg (-et), gray beard.
    silverstak|e (-en, -ar), silver candlestick.
    silverstol (-en, -ar), silver chair.
    silvertak (-et, --), silver roof or ceiling.
    silvervåg (-en, -or), silvery wave.
    simma (sam, summit), to swim.
    simmare (-n, --), swimmer.
    sin, sitt, sina, his, her, its, their.
    sinne (-t, -n), mind.
    sir|a (-ade, -at), to adorn, entwine.
    sist, last.
    sitta (satt, pl. sutto, suttit), to sit.
    sjunde, seventh.
    sjunga (sjöng, sjungit, sjungen), to sing.
    sjunka (sjönk, sjunkit" sjunken), to sink.
    själ (-en, -ar), soul.
    själv, self.
    sjö (-n, -ar), lake.
    sjöblå, water blue.
    sjögrön, sea-green.
    sjöhäst (-en, -ar), sea horse.
    sjökonung (-en, -ar), sea king.
    sjöng, see sjunga.
    sjönk, se sjunka.
    skad|a (-ade, -at), to hurt.
    skad|a (-an, -or), injury, harm, waste, misfortune.
    skaft (-et, --), handle.
    skak|a (-ade, -at), to shake.
    skal (-et, --), shell,
    skal|a (-ade, -at), to scale.
    skald (-en, -er), poet.
    skalk (-en, -ar), rogue.
    skall, see skola.
    skallra (-ade, -at), to rattle.
    skall|a (-ade, -at), to resound.
    skall|e (-en, -ar), skull.
    skap|a (-ade, -at), to create.
    skapelse (-n, -r), creation.
    skar, see skära.
    skar|a (-an, -or), flock, crowd.
    skarp, sharp, keen.
    skatt (-en, -er), tax, treasure.
    skatt|a (-ade, -at), to value, treasure.
    skattskyldig, liable to taxation.
    ske (-dde, -tt), to happen.
    sken (-et, --), light.
    sken, see skina.
    skepnad (-en, -er), form.
    skepp (-et, --), ship.
    skeppsbord (-et, --), deck.
    skeppsdäck (-et, --), deck.
    skeppsvrak (-et, --), wreck.
    skick|a (-ade, -at), to send.
    skidgård (-en, -ar), paling, palisade.
    skift|a (-ade, -at), to exchange, apportion, change, shift.
    skifte (-t, -n), vicissitude.
    skiltvakt (-en, -er), sentry.
    skil|ja (-de, -t), to divide, separate, part, distinguish.
    skim|mer (-ret), shimmer, gleam.
    skimr|a (-ade, -at), to shimmer.
    skina (sken, skinit), to shine.
    skinn (-et, --), hide, fur, skin.
    skip|a (-ade, -at) lag, to administer law.
    skir (-et), gauze.
    skiv|a (-an, -or), plate, disk.
    skjuta (sköt, skjutit, skjuten), to shoot, push.
    sko (-dde, -tt), to shoe.
    skog (-en, -ar), forest.
    skola (skall, skulle, skolat), shall, will, must.
    skon|a (-ade, -at), to spare.
    skoning (-en), mercy, exemption.
    skot (-et), sheet, sail.
    skraml|a (-ade, -at), to rattle.
    skrap|a (-ade, -at), to scrape, paw.
    skred, see skrida,
    skrek, see skrika.
    skrev, see skriva.
    skri (-et, -- ), shriek.
    skrida (skred, skridit, skriden), to glide, proceed, walk slowly.
    skrika (skrek, skrikit), to cry.
    skriva, (skrev, skrivit, skriven), to write.
    skrud (-en, -ar), attire.
    skräck (-en), terror.
    skräm|ma (-de, -t), to frighten.
    skugg|a (-an, -or), shadow.
    skuggig, shady.
    skuld (-en, -er), debt, blame, fault.
    skulderblad (-et), shoulder-blade.
    skuldlös, guiltless, innocent.
    skuldr|a (-an, -or), shoulder.
    skull, sake, fault; för någons --, on account of, for the sake
      of some one.
    skulle, see skola.
    skum (-met), foam.
    skum, dark.
    skumma (-ade, -at), to foam.
    skur|a (-ade, -at), to scrub, wash, polish.
    skurit, see skära.
    skuro, see skära.
    skvallrja (-ade, -at), to tattle, gossip.
    sky (-n, -ar), sky, cloud.
    skydd (-et), protection.
    skydd|a (-ade, -at), to protect.
    skygd, indecl., protection.
    skymf (-en, -er), insult.
    skymf|a (-ade, -at), to insult.
    skymt|a (-ade, -at), to appear by a glimpse, catch a glimpse of.
    skynd|a (-ade, -at), to hurry.
    skåd|a (-ade, -at), to see, be-hold.
    skål (-en, -ar), cup, toast, health.
    skåp (-et, --), cupboard.
    skägg (-et, --), beard.
    skäl (-et, --), reason.
    skälv|a (-de or skalv, skälvt), to tremble.
    skämt|a (-ade, -at), to jest.
    skänk (-en, -er), gift.
    skänk|a (-te, -t), to donate, give.
    skär (-et, --), rock, skerry.
    skära (skar, pl. skuro, skurit, skuren), to cut.
    skärad, cleansed, shriven.
    sköld (-en, -ar), shield.
    sköldborg (-en, -ar), circle of shields.
    sköldburen, borne or lifted on a shield.
    sköldegny (-et), din of shields.
    sköldeklang (-en), clang of shields.
    sköldmö (-n, -r), shield maiden, valkyr.
    sköldrand (-en, -ränder), edge of a shield.
    skön, beautiful.
    skönj|a (-de, -t), to discern.
    skörd (-en, -ar), harvest.
    sköt, see skjuta.
    sköte (-t), lap, bosom.
    slag (-et, --), stroke, battle.
    slagsmål (-et, --), fight.
    slagsvärd (-et, --), sword.
    slaktning (-en, -ar), battle, slaughter.
    slapp, slack, lax.
    slav (-en, -ar), slave.
    slet, see slita.
    slita (slet, slitit, sliten), to tear, wear.
    slockn|a (-ade, -at), to become extinct.
    slag, see slå.
    slumr|a (-ade, -at), to slumber.
    slung|a (-ade, -at), to hurl.
    slup (-en, -ar), boat, sloop.
    slut (-et), end; till --, at last.
    sluta (slöt, slutit, sluten), to cease, press, close, attack.
    slutligen, finally.
    sluttande, sloping.
    slå (slog, slagit, slagen), to strike; -- ned, alight,
    cast down, -- an en sång, strike up a song.
    slåss (slogs, slagits), to fight.
    släck|a (-te, -t), to extinguish.
    släd|e (-en, -ar), sleigh, sled.
    slädtravare (-n, --), sleigh-trotter
    släkt (-en, -er), generation, kinsfolk.
    slang|a (-de, -t), to throw.
    släpp|a (-te, -t), to relinquish, release; -- ut, to let out.
    slätt (-en, -er), plain, level place.
    slöj|a (-an, -or), veil.
    slös|a (-ade, -at), to squander.
    smak|a (-ade, -t), to taste.
    smal, slender, narrow.
    smalt, see smälta.
    smattr|a (-ade, -at), to beat, crackle, blare.
    smida (smidde, smitt), to forge.
    smidig, lithe.
    smultron (-et, --), strawberry.
    smyck|a (-ade, -at), to adorn.
    smycke (-t, -n), ornament.
    smyga (smög, smugit), to go stealthily, steal.
    små (pl. of liten), small, little.
    små|le (-log, -lett), to smile.
    smål|ta (-te, or smalt, smultit or smält), to melt.
    smärt, slender.
    smädlig, derisive.
    smärt|a (-an, -or), pain, suffering.
    smög, see smyga.
    snar, soon, near, quick.
    snäck|a (-an, -or), shell, ship.
    snäll, good, quick.
    snö (-n), snow.
    snöberg (-et, --), snow-capped mountain.
    snöbetäckt, snow-covered.
    snöblomm|a (-an, -or), snow drop, snow white flower.
    snög|a (-ade, -at), to snow.
    snöig, snowy.
    snöre (-t, -n), string, cord.
    snövit, snow white.
    sol (-en, -ar), sun.
    solblank, bright as the sun.
    solbrun, sunburnt.
    solhus (-et, --), sun house, conservatory.
    solsken (-et), sunshine.
    som, who, which, that, whom.
    som, as, like.
    sommar (-en, somrar), summer.
    sommarnatt (-en, --natter), summer night.
    sommarsol (-en), summer sun.
    sommartorr, sundried, withered.
    sommarvind (-en, -ar), summer wind.
    somn|a (-ade, -at), to go to sleep.
    son (-en, söner), son.
    sona, see försona.
    sorg (-en, -er), sorrow, care, responsibility.
    sorgfri, carefree.
    sorglig, sad, sorrowful.
    sorglös, carefree.
    sorgsen, sad.
    sorl (-et), hum, commotion.
    sorl|a (-ade, -at), to murmur.
    sotad, sooty.
    sova (sov, sovit), to sleep.
    spak, meek, tractable.
    spar|a (-ade, -at), to save, spare.
    sparr|e (-en, -ar), rafter.
    speg|el (-eln, -lar), mirror.
    spegelklar, clear as a mirror.
    spegelvåg (-en, -or), clear, calm water.
    spegl|a (-ade, -at), to reflect, view in mirror.
    spel (-et, --), play.
    spel|a (-te or -ade, -t or -at), to play.
    spets (-en, -ar), point, tip.
    spill|a (-de, -t), to spill, waste
    spillo, giva till --, to abandon.
    spilt|a (-an, -or), stall.
    spinna (spann, pl. spunno, spunnit, spunnen), to spin.
    spis|el (-eln, -lar), fireplace.
    spjut (-et, --), spear.
    spol|a (-ade, -at), to flush, wash away.
    spolad, spun.
    spord, see spörja.
    sporr|a (-ade, -at), to spur on.
    sprang, see springa.
    sprak|a (-ade, -at), to crackle.
    spratt (-et, --), trick.
    sprida (spred or spridde, spridit), to spread, scatter.
    springa (sprang, pl. sprungo, sprungit), to run, spring,
    break.
    spring|a (-an, -or), crack, narrow opening.
    springare (-n, --), courser.
    sprungo, see springa.
    språk (-et, --), language.
    språk|a (-ade, -at), to converse, talk.
    språng (-et, --), leap.
    spräcklig, mottled, speckled.
    spåman (-nen, -män), sooth-sayer.
    späck|a (-ade, -at), to fill, Interlard.
    späd, tender, infantile.
    spok|a (-ade,-at), to haunt.
    spän|na (-de, -t), to stretch out, bend, draw, buckle, -- hop, clinch.
    spörja (sporde, sport, spord), to inquire, learn, hear, ask.
    stack, see sticka.
    stad (-en, städer), city.
    stadig, steady, constant.
    stal, see stjäla.
    stam (-men, -mar), stem, post, trunk, framework.
    stamfar, see stamfader.
    stamfader (-n, -fäder), progenitor.
    stamm|a (-ade, -at) från, to descend from.
    stamp|a (-ade, -at), to stamp.
    stann|a (-ade, -at), to stop, remain.
    stark, strong.
    stav (-en, -ar), staff.
    steg, see stiga.
    steg (-et, --), step.
    sten (-en, -ar), stone.
    stenek (-en, -ar), holly oak.
    sticka (stack, pl. stucko, stuckit), to stick, reach forth,
      -- i brand, put on fire.
    stick|a (-ade, -at), to knit.
    stickbloss (-et, --), wood torch.
    stift|a (-ade, -at), to found, establish.
    stig (-en, -ar), path.
    stiga (steg, stigit), to step, -- upp, to arise, -- av, to dismount.
    stiltje (-n), calm.
    stilla, still.
    stinga (stäng, pl. stungo, stungit, stungen), to pierce, sting.
    stjälk (-en, -ar), stem,
    stjäla (stal, pl. stulo, stulit, stulen), to steal.
    stjarn|a (-an, -or), star.
    stjärnekrans (-en, -ar), starry wreath.
    stjärnenatt (-en, --, -nätter), starry night.
    stjärnetlfilt (-et, --), starry tent.
    stjarnevim|mel (-let), starry throng.
    stjärnklar, starlight,
    stjärnskott (-et, --), shooting star.
    stjärt (-en, -ar), tail.
    stod, see stå.
    stoft, (-et), dust, earth.
    stol (-en, -ar), chair, seat.
    stolt, proud.
    stolthet (-en), pride.
    stor, great, large.
    storm (-en, -ar), storm.
    storm|a (-ade, -at), to storm.
    stormig, stormy.
    stormörn (-en, -ar), storm eagle.
    strand (-en, stränder), shore.
    strandlös, without a shore, endless.
    strax, immediately,
    strid (-en, -er), battle, strife, conflict.
    strid, swift, rapid,
    strida,(stred, stridit), to fight.
    stridsbror, stridsbroder, comrade in arms.
    strimm|a (-an, -or), line, streak.
    stryka (strök, strukit, struken), strike, give up, roam.
    strådöd (-en), natural death.
    strål|a (-ade, -at), to beam, shine.
    strålbägare (-n, --), sparkling bowl.
    strål|e (-en, -ar), ray.
    sträck|a (-te, -t), to stretch, extend.
    sträckning (-en, -ar), stretching, extent.
    sträng (-en, -ar), string, chord.
    sträng, severe.
    strö (strödde, strött), to strew, scatter.
    ström (-men, -mar), stream.
    strömm|a (-ade, -at), to flow, stream.
    strömoln (-et, --), small, scattered clouds.
    stulen, see stjäla.
    stum, dumb, silent.
    stund (-en, -er), moment.
    stund|a (-ade, -at), to be impending, about to happen.
    stundom, occasionally.
    stungo, see stinga.
    stup|a (-ade, or stöp, -at), to fall (in battle).
    stycke (-t, -n), piece.
    styr|a (-de,-t), to steer, direct.
    styre (-t, -n), helm.
    styrbord, starboard.
    styrka (-n), strength.
    styrman (-nen, -män), pilot.
    styv, stiff.
    stå (stod, stått), stånd; -- åter, to remain.
    stål (-et), steel.
    stålblank, bright as steel, burnished.
    stålblå, steel blue.
    stålbåg|e (-en, -ar), steel bow
    stålbägare, (-n, --), steel goblet.
    stålhandsk|e (-en, -ar), gauntlet.
    stålgjuten, of wrought steel.
    stålhjälm (-en, -ar), steel helmet.
    stålbeklädd, steel clad, mailed.
    stålrand (-en, -ränder), band or edge of steel.
    stålsko (-n, -r), skate.
    stålskodd, steel shod,
    stång (-en, stänger), pole, pike.
    stång|a (-ade, -at), to butt, gore.
    ställ|a (-de, -t), to place, put.
    ställe (-t, -n) place.
    stäm|ma (-de, -t), to summon; -- möte, to set a meeting,
      make an appointment.
    stämm|a(-an, -or), voice,
    ständig, constant.
    stäng|a (-de, -t), to shut.
    stäng|el (-eln, -lar), stalk.
    stäv (-en, -ar), stem.
    stäv|a (-an, -or), pail.
    stödja (stödde, stött, stödd), to support, lean.
    stöp, see stupa.
    större, greater, large.
    störst, greatest, largest.
    stört|a (-ade, -at) fram, rush forward.
    stöt (-en, -ar), blow.
    stöt|a (-te, -t), to strike, encounter.
    suck (-en, -ar), sigh.
    suck|a (-ade, -at), to sigh.
    sund (-et, --), sound.
    sunnanskog (-en, -ar), southern forest.
    sus (-et), murmur, rustle, sough.
    sus|a (-ade, -at), to murmur, rustle, whizz.
    sutto, see sitta.
    svag, weak.
    sval, cool.
    svalg (-et, --), mouth, jaw.
    svall, (-et), swell, surge.
    svall|a (-ade, -at), to swell.
    svallvåg (-en), surge, roller.
    svandunsbarm (-en, -ar), bosom as soft as swan's down.
    svar (-et, --), answer.
    svar|a (-ade, -at), to answer.
    svart, black.
    svartklädd, dressed in black.
    svartekung (-en), black art king.
    svartskäggig, having black beard, swarthy.
    svarv|a (-ade, -at), to lathe, turn.
    sveda (svedde, svett), to singe, burn.
    svedjeland (-et, --), fire swept land, burnt clearing.
    svek (-et, --), deceit.
    sven (-nen, -ner), youth, page, comrade.
    svett (-en), perspiration.
    svika (svek, svikit, sviken), to fail, betray.
    svikt|a (-ade, -at), to give way under weight.
    svindl|a (-ade, -at), to grow dizzy.
    sving|a (-ade, -at), to swing, fly.
    svurit, see svärja.
    svår, hard, difficult.
    sväng|a (-de, -t), to swing.
    svära (svor, pl. svuro, svurit), to swear, take oath.
    svärdlös, swordless, disarmed.
    svärdshugg (-et, --), blow or strike of the sword.
    svärja (svor, pl. svuro, svurit, svuren), to swear, make solemn promise,
      or take oath.
    svärm|a (-ade, -at), to swarm, roam, dream.
    svärmare (-n, --), dreamer, visionary.
    sväv|a (-ade, -at), to hover, rove.
    syn (-en, -er), sight, vision.
    syn|a (-ade, -at), to examine, spy.
    syn|as (-tes, -ts), to seem, appear.
    syskonstjärn|a (-an, -or), sister star.
    syssl|a (-ade, -at), to be busy.
    syst|er (-ern, -rar), sister.
    så (-dde, -tt), to sow.
    så, thus, so.
    såg, see se.
    såll|a (-ade, -at), to sift.
    sång (-en, -er), song.
    sångare (-n, --), singer.
    sångarskara (-an, -or), group of singers.
    sångfåg|el (-eln, -lar), songbird.
    sär (-et, --), wound.
    sår|a (-ade, -at), to wound.
    säd (-en), seed.
    säga (sade, sagt), to say, tell, relate.
    säg|en (-nen, -ner), saying, legend.
    säker, sure, secure.
    sälja (sålde, sålt, såld), to sell.
    säll, happy, blessed.
    säll|e (-en, -ar), fellow, vulgar fellow.
    sällhet (-en), bliss.
    sällsam, singular.
    sän|da (-de, -t), to send.
    sändebud (-et, --), messenger.
    sänder, i --, at a time.
    sändman (-nen, --män), messenger.
    säng (-en, -ar), bed.
    sänk|a (-te, -t), to lower, sink.
    särskild, special, separate.
    säte (-t, -n), seat.
    sätta (satte, satt), to put, locate, fix; -- sig, to sit down,
      locate; -- ut, set out; -- åstad, start, sally forth.
    säv (-en), rushes.
    söder (-n), South.
    sök|a (-te, -t), to seek.
    sömn|a (-ade, -at), to sew, embroider.
    sömn (-en), sleep.
    sömnig, sleepy, drowsy.
    sömnlös, sleepless.
    sörj|a (-de, -t), to grieve.
    sov|a (-de, -t), to put to sleep.

    T.

    ta, abbrev. of taga.
    tack (-en), thanks.
    tack|a (-ade, -at), to thank.
    tad|el (-let), blame, reproach, blemish.
    tafs (-en, -ar), tassel.
    tag (-et, --), hold, grip.
    taga, ta (tog, tagit, tagen), to take.
    tak (-et, --), roof, ceiling.
    tal (-et, --), speech, number.
    tal|a (-ade, or -te, -at, or -t), to speak.
    tank|e (-en, -ar), thought.
    tanklös, thoughtless.
    tapper, brave.
    tapp|a (-ade, -at), to lose.
    teck|en (-net, --), sign, omen.
    teckn|a (-ade, -at), to trace, write, make signs.
    teg, see tiga.
    temp|el (-let, --), temple.
    tempelbrand (-en), burning of the temple.
    tempeljungfru (-n, -r), temple maiden.
    tempellund (-en, -ar), temple grove.
    tempelrund (-en, -er), temple circle.
    tempelrök (-en), smoke from the burning temple.
    tempelskändare (-n, --), one who profanes the temple.
    tempelsläkte (-t, -n), temple tribe.
    tempeltilj|a (-an, -or), temple floor.
    tempelvalv (-et, --), temple arch, dome.
    tempelvägg (-en, -ar), temple wall.
    tid (-en, -er), time.
    tidning (-en, -ar), news.
    tiga (teg, tegat), to keep silent.
    tigg|a (-de, -t), to beg.
    tiggarstav (-en, -ar), beggar's staff.
    tllj|a (-an, -or), floor.
    till, to, as, for.
    tillbaka, back, in return.
    till|bedja (-bad, -bedit, -bedd), to worship.
    tillhopa, together.
    tillhor|a (-de, -t), to belong to.
    tillika, also.
    till|komma (-kom, -kommit), to come into existence, to befit,
      be proper, incumbent upon.
    tills, until.
    tillsamman, together.
    til|lägga (-lade, -lagt), to add.
    timme (-en, -ar), hour.
    timr|a (-ade, -at), to build.
    ting (-et, --), thing, court of justice.
    tinga, see betinga.
    tinn|e (-en, -ar), pinnacle.
    tinning (-en, -ar), temple.
    tio, ten.
    titt|a (-ade, -at), to keep, look.
    tjus|a (-ade, -at), to fascinate.
    tjuv (-en, -ar), thief.
    tjäll (-et, --), hut, home.
    tofs (-en, -ar), tassel.
    tog, see taga.
    tolv, twelve.
    tolvmannakraft, strength of twelve men.
    tolvt (-en, -er), dozen.
    tom, empty.
    tomhänt, indecl., empty handed.
    tomt (-en, -er), plot, lot.
    ton (-en, -er), tone, sound.
    topp (-en, -ar), top.
    torn (-et, --), tower.
    torr, dry.
    torv (-en), sod, turf.
    torv|a (-an, -or), turf, sod.
    tre, three.
    travare (-n, --), trotter.
    trenne, three.
    trevlig, pleasant.
    trettio, thirty.
    triv|as (-des, -ts), to thrive, feel at home.
    tro (-dde, -tt), to believe, think.
    tro (-n), faith, belief, trust.
    trofast, faithful, steadfast.
    trogen, faithful.
    trohet (-en), faithfulness.
    troll (-et, --), goblin, monster.
    trolldom (-en), witchcraft.
    trollpar (-et, --), pair of monsters.
    trollsäng (-en, -er), incantation.
    trolös, faithless.
    tron (-en, -er), throne.
    trots (-et), defiance; in spite of.
    trots|a (-ade, -at), to defy.
    trotsig, defiant.
    tryck|a (-te, -t), to press.
    tryckning (-en, -ar), pressure.
    trygg, secure.
    träbeläte (-t, -n), wooden image.
    träd (-et, --), tree.
    träda (trädde, trätt), to step, walk, proceed.
    träff|a (-ade, -at), to meet with, hit, strike.
    träl (-en, -ar), serf, slave.
    trängla (-de, -t), to press.
    trög, dull.
    trösk|el (-eln, -lar), threshold.
    tröst (-en), consolation.
    trött, weary.
    tröttad, tired.
    tröttnia (-ade, -at), to grow tired.
    tröttsam, tiresome.
    tu, two.
    tugg|a (-ade, -at), to chew.
    tull (-en, -ar), toll.
    tuml|a (-ade, -at), to tumble, roll.
    tummje (-en, -ar), thumb.
    tung, heavy.
    tung|a (-an, -or), tongue.
    turturduv|a (-an, -or), turtledove.
    tusen, thousand.
    tusental (-et, --), a thousand.
    tuv|a (-an, -or), knoll.
    tvekan, indecl., hesitation.
    tvemännings, two together.
    tvenne, two.
    tvinga (tvang, pi. tvungo, tvungit, tvungen), to compel, subdue.
    tvinn|a (-ade, -at), to twine.
    tvist (-en, -er), quarrel.
    tvist|a (-ade, -at), to dispute.
    två, two.
    tvång (-et), compulsion.
    tvänne, two.
    ty, because, for.
    tyck|a (-te,-t), to think, mean.
    tyst|a (-ade, -at), to silence.
    tyck|as (-tes, -ts), to appear, seem.
    tyst, silent, quiet.
    tystn|a (-ade, -at), to become silent.
    tystnad (-en), silence.
    tyvärr, alas.
    tå, (-n, -r), toe.
    tåg (-et), march, campaign.
    tåg|a (-ade, -at), to march.
    tål|a (-de, -t), to endure.
    tålig, patient.
    tår (-en, -ar), tear.
    tårlös, tearless.
    täck|e (-et, -en) covering.
    tälj|a (-de, -t), to enumerate, relate, count.
    tält (-et, --), tent.
    tält|a (-ade, -at), tö put up tents, encamp.
    tämja (tämde or tamde, tamt or tamt, tamd), to tame.
    tänlda (-de, -t), to kindle, light.
    tänk|a (-te, -t), to think.
    tär|a (-de, -t), to consume,
    tärn|a (-an, -or), lass, maiden.
    tärning (-en, -ar), die, dice,
    tät, close.
    tävl|a (-ade, -at), to contest, vie, compete.
    töckenbud (-et, --), gloomy messenger.
    töcknig, misty.
    töm|ma (-de, -t), to empty, drain.
    töra (torde), perchance, no douht, may.
    töras (tordes, torts), to dare.
    törst (-en), thirst.
    törst|a (-ade, -at), to thirst.

    U.

    ull (-en), wool.
    ulv (-en, -ar) wolf.
    undan, away.
    under, under, beneath, during.
    und|er (-ret, --), wonder.
    underbar, wonderful.
    underlig, wonderful.
    undr|a (-ade, -at), to wonder.
    ung, young.
    ungdom (-en), youth.
    ungdomsblod (-et), youthful blood.
    ungdomsvän (-nen, -ner), friend from childhood.
    ung|e (-en, -ar), young one.
    ungersven (-nen, -ner), young man, swain.
    ungträd (-et, --), young tree.
    unn|a (-ade, -at), to allow, permit without grudging.
    upp, up.
    upp|föda (-födde, -fött), to bring up.
    upp|bara (-bar, -burit, -buren), to support.
    upp|lösa (-te, -t), to dissolve.
    uppsparka, to kick up.
    uppsteg, see uppstiga. -
    upp|stiga (-steg, -stigit, -stigen), to ascend, rise.
    uppstå (-stod, -stått, -stånden), to arise.
    uppå, upon, on.
    ur (-oxe) (-en, -ar), musk ox.
    ur, from, out of.
    urn|a (-an, -or), urn.
    usel, mean, sordid, wretched.
    ut, ute, out.
    utan, without.
    utanför, outside.
    utav, of, among.
    ute|bliva (-blev, -blivit, -bliven), to fail to appear, remain away.
    uti, in.
    utlys|a (-te, -t), to announce, appoint.
    utsäde (-t), seed for planting.
    utav, out of.
    utöver, over, above, beyond.
    uppbära (-bar, pi. buro, -burit, buren), to support.

    V.

    vad, what, whatsoever.
    vad'a (-ade, -at), to wade.
    vagg|a (-ade, -at), to rock, wave.
    vagg|a (-an, -or), cradle.
    vaggsång (-en, -er), cradle song.
    vaj|a (-ade, -at), to wave.
    vak (-en, -ar), opening in the ice.
    vak|a (-ade, -at), to watch, keep awake.
    vak|a (-an, -or), thrush.
    vaken, awake.
    vakn|a (-ade, -at), to awaken.
    vakt (-en, -er), guard.
    vakt|a (-ade, -at), to watch, guard.
    vakt|el (-eln, -lar), quail.
    val (-en, -ar), whale.
    val (-et, --), choice, election.
    val|a (-an, -or), seeress.
    valhallaarving (-en, -ar), heir of Valhalla.
    valhallabarn (-et, --), child of Valhalla.
    valhallason (-en, --söner), son of Valhalla,
    valhallastol (-en), seat of Valhalla.
    valkyri|a (-an, -or), valkyr.
    vallhö (-et), meadow hay.
    valplats (-en, -er), battlefield.
    valv (-et, --), arch.
    valvdörr (-en, -ar), arch door.
    van, accustomed.
    van|a (-an, -or), habit.
    vandr|a (-ade, -at), to walk, wander.
    vandrare (-n, -- ), wanderer, walker.
    vankelmod (-et), fickleness, inconstancy.
    vantro (-n), superstition.
    vantrofylld, full of superstition.
    vap|en (-net, --), weapon.
    vapenbrak (-et), din of arms.
    vapenbroder (-n, -bröder), comrade in arms.
    vapenklang (-en), clash of arms.
    var, see vara.
    var, each, every, wherever, where.
    vara (är, var pl. voro, varit), to be.
    vara, tag dig till --, beware, look out.
    varann, varannan, each other, every other.
    varda (vart, vorden), begin to be, become.
    varenda, every.
    varför, why.
    varg i veum, outlaw, profaner of the temple.
    varhelst, wherever.
    varifrån, whence.
    varje, every.
    varligen, carefully.
    varm, warm.
    varmed, whereby.
    varn|a (-ade, -at), to warn.
    varning (-en, -ar), warning.
    vars, whose.
    varsam, cautious.
    varthelst, whithersoever.
    varöver, over or across which.
    vass, sharp.
    vatt|en (-net, --), water.
    vattendrag (-et, --), water course, stream.
    vattenfåg|el (-eln, -lar), waterfowl.
    vattenlilj|a (-an, -or), water lily.
    vattn|a (-ade, -at), to moisten,
    vaulunderverk (-et, --), product of Vaulund.
    ve, woe.
    ved (-en), wood, fuel.
    vedergäll|a (-de, -t), to repay, make retribution.
    vek, weak.
    veklig, weakly.
    vem, who.
    vemhelst, whosoever.
    vemodsfull, melancholy.
    verk (-et, --), work, deed.
    veta (visste, vetat), to know.
    vett (-et), sense.
    vi, we.
    vi, why, wherefore.
    vid, by, in, on, at.
    vidunderlig, strange, weird.
    vift|a (-ade, -at), to flap, wave, beckon.
    vig|a (-de, -t), to consecrate, wed.
    vigd, consecrated.
    vik (-en, -ar), bay.
    vika (vek, vikit, viken), to yield, turn aside.
    viking (-en, -ar), viking.
    vikingabalk (-en, -ar), viking code.
    vikingafärd (-en, -ar), viking expedition.
    vikingaliv (-et, --), viking life.
    vikingahämnd (-en), viking revenge.
    vikingaskepp (-et, --), viking ship.
    vikingavinst (-en, -er), viking profit.
    vikingavis, in viking fashion.
    vikt (-en, -er), weight.
    vil|a (-ade, -at), to rest.
    vild, wild.
    vilddjur (-et, --), wild animal.
    vilja (pr. vill, ville, velat), will, want to.
    vilj|a (-an, -or), will.
    vildsint, ferocious.
    vilken, who, which.
    vill, see vilja.
    villig, willing.
    viml|a (-ade, -at), to throng, abound.
    vin (-et), wine.
    vina (ven, vinit), to whistle, shriek.
    vinbägare (-n), wine goblet.
    vind (-en, -ar), wind.
    vindkall, producing wintry storms.
    vingad, winged.
    ving|e (-en, -ar), wing.
    vink|a (-ade, -at), to beckon.
    vinna (vann, pl. vunno, vunnit, vunnen), to win, acquire.
    vinpokal (-en, -ar), wine goblet.
    vinst (-en, -er), profit, gain.
    vint|er (-ern, -rar), winter.
    vintergrön, evergreen.
    vinterhim|mel, (-len or himmeln, -lar), wintry sky.
    vinterkväll (-en, -ar), winter evening.
    vinterköld (-en), winter cold.
    vir|a (-ade, -at), to wind, twine.
    virk|a (-ade, -at), to crochet.
    virvelvind (-en, -ar), whirlwind.
    virvl|a (-ade, -at), to whirl.
    vis (-et, --), manner.
    vis, wise.
    vis|a (-an, -or), ditty, song.
    vis|a (-ade, -at), to show, direct.
    visdomsrun|a (-an, -or), rune of wisdom, sage legend.
    vishet (-en), wisdom.
    visk|a (-ade, -at), to whisper.
    viskning (-en, -ar), whispering.
    viss, certain.
    vissn|a (-ade, -at), to wither.
    vist|as (-ades, -ats), to sojourn, remain, stay.
    visthus (-et, --), larder.
    vit, white.
    vitaktig, whitish.
    vitgrå, light gray, white and gray.
    vitklädd, dressed in white.
    vitskummig, white-capped, foaming.
    vitt, så --, as far as.
    vitter, lettered, cultured, learned.
    vitullig, woolly.
    vittberömd, far-famed.
    vorden, see varda.
    voro, see vara,
    vred, angry.
    vrede (-n), anger.
    vredesmod (-et), anger.
    vredgad, angry.
    vredg|as (-ades, -ats), to be or become angry.
    vrå (-n, -r), nook, corner of a room.
    vrål|a (-ade, -at), to howl.
    vräk|a (-te, -t), to hurl, heave.
    vuxen, see växa.
    vådlig, risky, dangerous.
    våg (-en, -or), wave.
    våg (-en, -ar), scale.
    våg|a (-ade, -at), to dare, venture.
    vågskål (-en, -ar), scale.
    våld (-et), force, tyranny.
    vår (-en, -ar), spring.
    vår, our.
    vård (-en, -ar), monument.
    vård (-en), care.
    vård|a (-ade, -at), to take care of.
    vårdag (-en, -ar), spring day.
    vårdkas (-en, -ar), signal fire
    våris (-en), spring ice.
    vårsol (-en), spring sun.
    vårsky (-n, -ar), spring cloud.
    våt, wet.
    väck|a (-te, -t), to awaken.
    väd|er (-ret), weather.
    vädj|a (-ade, -at), to appeal.
    väg (-en, -ar), road, path, way.
    väg|a (-de, -t), to weigh.
    vägg (-en, -ar), wall.
    vägra (-de, -t), to refuse.
    väl, well, indeed.
    välan, well then.
    välbekant, well-known.
    väld, indecl., partiality.
    välde (-t), power, authority.
    väldig, mighty.
    välfägnad (-en), good cheer.
    välja (valde, valt, vald), to choose.
    välkommen, welcome.
    välkomstgåv|a (-an, -or), gift of welcome.
    välkänd, well-known.
    väll|a (-de, -t), to gush.
    välment, well-meant.
    välsign|a (-ade, -at), to bless.
    välsk, Gaelic.
    vält|a (-te, -t), to roll, overturn.
    välv|a (-de, -t), to arch.
    vän (-nen, -ner), friend.
    vän|da (-de, -t), to turn.
    vänlig, friendly.
    vänskap (-en), friendship.
    vänster, left.
    vänt|a (-ade, -at), to wait, expect.
    vänsäll, sociable, amiable.
    väntan, indecl., waiting.
    väpn|a (-ade, -at), to arm.
    värd (en, -ar), host.
    värd, worth.
    värde (-t), worth.
    värdig, worthy.
    värld (-en, -ar), earth, world.
    världsbålslåg|a (-an, -or), flame of the universal pyre.
    världshav (-et, -- ), main ocean.
    världshavsbölj|a (-an, -or), wave of the ocean main.
    världskung (-en), world king.
    världsmoder (-n), mother of the world.
    värn (-et, -- ), defense.
    värnlös, defenseless.
    värst, worst.
    väs|a (-te, -t), to hiss.
    väsen, indecl., being, noise, commotion.
    västanvind (-en, -ar), west wind.
    väster (-n), west.
    västerhav (-et, -- ), Western Sea, North Sea.
    västersal (-en, -ar), western hall.
    västersalt (-et), western salt, North Sea.
    västervåg (-en, -or), western billow or sea.
    väv (-en, -ar), web, textile fabric.
    väv|a (-de, -t), to weave.
    väx|a (-te, -t or vuxit), to grow.
    växl|a (-ade, -at), to change, alternate.
    växt (-en, -er), growth, stature, plant.
    vörd|a (-ade, -at), to respect.
    vördnad (-en), respect.

    Y.

    yng|el (-let, -- ), brood.
    yngling (-en, -ar), young man, youth.
    ypp|a (-ade, -at), to reveal, lay bare.
    ypperst, foremost.
    yppig, luxurious.
    yr|a (-de, -t), to be delirious, rave, whirl.
    yttre, outer.
    yv|as (-des, -ts), to glory in, boast.

    Å.

    å, on.
    å (-n, -ar), stream.
    åbo (-n, -r), inhabitant, denizen.
    åd|er (-ern, -ror), vein.
    ålderdom (-en), old age.
    ånger (-n), contrition.
    ångest (-en), anxiety, fear.
    år (-et, --), year.
    år|a (-an, -or), oar.
    årsbarn (-et, --), born the same year, coeval.
    årsväxt (-en), harvest, crop.
    ås (-en, -ar), ridge.
    åsk|a (-an, -or), thunder.
    åskdiger, thunder laden.
    åskmoln (-et, --), thundercloud.
    åstad, away, forth.
    åter, again.
    åt, to, in, toward.
    åter|flyga (-flög, -flugit, -flugen), to fly back.
    åter|födas (-föddes, -fötts), to be born again.
    återkomst (-en), return.
    återliv|a (-ade, -at), to revive, quicken to life.
    återtän|da (-de, -t), to rekindle.
    återställ|a (-de, -t), to restore.
    återvän|da (-de, -t), to return.
    åtskilj|a (-de, -t), to separate.
    åtsporde, see åtspörja.
    åt|spörja (-sporde, -sport, -spord), to question, ask.

    Ä.

    ädel, noble.
    ädelsten (-en, -ar), precious stone.
    äg|a (-de, -t), to own, possess.
    ägare (-n, --), owner.
    ägg (-et, --), egg.
    ägn|a (-ade, -at), devote, dedicate.
    ägor, no sing., possessions, estate.
    älg (-en, -ar), elk.
    älsk|a (-ade, -at), to love.
    älskare (-n, --), lover.
    älskling (-en, -ar), darling.
    älskog (-en), love.
    älv (-en, -ar), river.
    älv|a (-an, -or), elf.
    älvkung (-en, -ar), elf king.
    än, yet, then, ever; om --, even if.
    än ... än, now ... now, either ... or.
    änd|a (-n, -r), end.
    ändå, anyway.
    änk|a (-an, -or), widow.
    ännu, yet.
    äntligen, final.
    äntring (-en), boarding.
    äpple (-t, -n), apple.
    är, see vara.
    ära (-n), honor, glory.
    är|a (-ade, -at), to honor.
    ärende (-t, -n), errand.
    ärlig, honest.
    ärrig, scarred.
    ärv|a (-de, -t), to inherit.
    ätt (-en, -er), family, tribe.
    ättartal (-et, --), descent, ancestry.
    ättefar, ättefader, progenitor.
    ättehög (-en, -ar), tribal funeral mound.
    ättekull|e (-en, -ar), barrow, ancestral grave.
    ättelängd (-en, -er), pedigree.
    även, even, also.
    äventyr (-et, --), adventure.
    ävenväl, also, likewise.

    Ö.

    ö (-n, -ar), island.
    öde (-t, -n), fate.
    öde, deserted, waste.
    ödslig, desolate.
    öga (-t, ögon), eye.
    ögonblick (-et, --), moment.
    ök|en (-nen, -nar), desert.
    öl (-et), ale.
    öm, tender.
    ömk|a (-ade, -at), to pity.
    ömkan, indecl., compassion, pity.
    öppen, open, frank.
    öppn|a (-ade, -at), to open.
    öra (-t, öron), ear.
    örn (-en, -ar), eagle.
    örneving|e (-en, -ar), eagle's wing.
    ös|a (-te, -t), to pour.
    öster (-n), east.
    österut, in the east, towards the east.
    östervåg (-en, -or), Eastern sea, Baltic.
    över, over, above, across.
    överallt, everywhere.
    över|flyga (-flög, -flugit, -flugen), to spread over.
    överflöd (-et), plenty, surplus.
    överflög, see överflyga.
    över|giva (-gav, -givit, -given), to desert.
    överhand (-en), upper hand, mastery.
    överman (-nen, -män), superior.
    övermod (-et), recklessness, arrogance, pride.
    överpräst (-en, -er), high priest.
    överskygg|a (-de, -t), to overshadow.
    översåll|a (-ade, -at), to overstrew.
    övertalare (-n, --), persuader.
*/








End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of Fritiofs Saga, by Esaias Tegner

*** END OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK FRITIOFS SAGA ***

***** This file should be named 8518-8.txt or 8518-8.zip *****
This and all associated files of various formats will be found in:
        http://www.gutenberg.org/8/5/1/8518/

Produced by David Starner, Tapio Riikonen and the Online
Distributed Proofreading Team


Updated editions will replace the previous one--the old editions
will be renamed.

Creating the works from public domain print editions means that no
one owns a United States copyright in these works, so the Foundation
(and you!) can copy and distribute it in the United States without
permission and without paying copyright royalties.  Special rules,
set forth in the General Terms of Use part of this license, apply to
copying and distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works to
protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm concept and trademark.  Project
Gutenberg is a registered trademark, and may not be used if you
charge for the eBooks, unless you receive specific permission.  If you
do not charge anything for copies of this eBook, complying with the
rules is very easy.  You may use this eBook for nearly any purpose
such as creation of derivative works, reports, performances and
research.  They may be modified and printed and given away--you may do
practically ANYTHING with public domain eBooks.  Redistribution is
subject to the trademark license, especially commercial
redistribution.



*** START: FULL LICENSE ***

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE
PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK

To protect the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free
distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg"), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full Project
Gutenberg-tm License (available with this file or online at
http://gutenberg.org/license).


Section 1.  General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works

1.A.  By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree to
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
(trademark/copyright) agreement.  If you do not agree to abide by all
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or destroy
all copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in your possession.
If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound by the
terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the person or
entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph 1.E.8.

1.B.  "Project Gutenberg" is a registered trademark.  It may only be
used on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement.  There are a few
things that you can do with most Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement.  See
paragraph 1.C below.  There are a lot of things you can do with Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works if you follow the terms of this agreement
and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.  See paragraph 1.E below.

1.C.  The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ("the Foundation"
or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection of Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works.  Nearly all the individual works in the
collection are in the public domain in the United States.  If an
individual work is in the public domain in the United States and you are
located in the United States, we do not claim a right to prevent you from
copying, distributing, performing, displaying or creating derivative
works based on the work as long as all references to Project Gutenberg
are removed.  Of course, we hope that you will support the Project
Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting free access to electronic works by
freely sharing Project Gutenberg-tm works in compliance with the terms of
this agreement for keeping the Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with
the work.  You can easily comply with the terms of this agreement by
keeping this work in the same format with its attached full Project
Gutenberg-tm License when you share it without charge with others.

1.D.  The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
what you can do with this work.  Copyright laws in most countries are in
a constant state of change.  If you are outside the United States, check
the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this agreement
before downloading, copying, displaying, performing, distributing or
creating derivative works based on this work or any other Project
Gutenberg-tm work.  The Foundation makes no representations concerning
the copyright status of any work in any country outside the United
States.

1.E.  Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:

1.E.1.  The following sentence, with active links to, or other immediate
access to, the full Project Gutenberg-tm License must appear prominently
whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg-tm work (any work on which the
phrase "Project Gutenberg" appears, or with which the phrase "Project
Gutenberg" is associated) is accessed, displayed, performed, viewed,
copied or distributed:

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org

1.E.2.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is derived
from the public domain (does not contain a notice indicating that it is
posted with permission of the copyright holder), the work can be copied
and distributed to anyone in the United States without paying any fees
or charges.  If you are redistributing or providing access to a work
with the phrase "Project Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on the
work, you must comply either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1
through 1.E.7 or obtain permission for the use of the work and the
Project Gutenberg-tm trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or
1.E.9.

1.E.3.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is posted
with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any additional
terms imposed by the copyright holder.  Additional terms will be linked
to the Project Gutenberg-tm License for all works posted with the
permission of the copyright holder found at the beginning of this work.

1.E.4.  Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License terms from this work, or any files containing a part of this
work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg-tm.

1.E.5.  Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this
electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
Gutenberg-tm License.

1.E.6.  You may convert to and distribute this work in any binary,
compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or proprietary form, including any
word processing or hypertext form.  However, if you provide access to or
distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg-tm work in a format other than
"Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other format used in the official version
posted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm web site (www.gutenberg.org),
you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense to the user, provide a
copy, a means of exporting a copy, or a means of obtaining a copy upon
request, of the work in its original "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other
form.  Any alternate format must include the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.

1.E.7.  Do not charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,
performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg-tm works
unless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.8.  You may charge a reasonable fee for copies of or providing
access to or distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works provided
that

- You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
     the use of Project Gutenberg-tm works calculated using the method
     you already use to calculate your applicable taxes.  The fee is
     owed to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he
     has agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to the
     Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation.  Royalty payments
     must be paid within 60 days following each date on which you
     prepare (or are legally required to prepare) your periodic tax
     returns.  Royalty payments should be clearly marked as such and
     sent to the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the
     address specified in Section 4, "Information about donations to
     the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation."

- You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who notifies
     you in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt that s/he
     does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm
     License.  You must require such a user to return or
     destroy all copies of the works possessed in a physical medium
     and discontinue all use of and all access to other copies of
     Project Gutenberg-tm works.

- You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of any
     money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
     electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days
     of receipt of the work.

- You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
     distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm works.

1.E.9.  If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work or group of works on different terms than are set
forth in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing from
both the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation and Michael
Hart, the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark.  Contact the
Foundation as set forth in Section 3 below.

1.F.

1.F.1.  Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable
effort to identify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread
public domain works in creating the Project Gutenberg-tm
collection.  Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may contain
"Defects," such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate or
corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other intellectual
property infringement, a defective or damaged disk or other medium, a
computer virus, or computer codes that damage or cannot be read by
your equipment.

1.F.2.  LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the "Right
of Replacement or Refund" described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg-tm trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work under this agreement, disclaim all
liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including legal
fees.  YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT
LIABILITY, BREACH OF WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH F3.  YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE
LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL, DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR
INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
DAMAGE.

1.F.3.  LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discover a
defect in this electronic work within 90 days of receiving it, you can
receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
written explanation to the person you received the work from.  If you
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium with
your written explanation.  The person or entity that provided you with
the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in lieu of a
refund.  If you received the work electronically, the person or entity
providing it to you may choose to give you a second opportunity to
receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund.  If the second copy
is also defective, you may demand a refund in writing without further
opportunities to fix the problem.

1.F.4.  Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you 'AS-IS' WITH NO OTHER
WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO
WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTIBILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.

1.F.5.  Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied
warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of damages.
If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement violates the
law of the state applicable to this agreement, the agreement shall be
interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or limitation permitted by
the applicable state law.  The invalidity or unenforceability of any
provision of this agreement shall not void the remaining provisions.

1.F.6.  INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
providing copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in accordance
with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the production,
promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works,
harmless from all liability, costs and expenses, including legal fees,
that arise directly or indirectly from any of the following which you do
or cause to occur: (a) distribution of this or any Project Gutenberg-tm
work, (b) alteration, modification, or additions or deletions to any
Project Gutenberg-tm work, and (c) any Defect you cause.


Section  2.  Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg-tm

Project Gutenberg-tm is synonymous with the free distribution of
electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of computers
including obsolete, old, middle-aged and new computers.  It exists
because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations from
people in all walks of life.

Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
assistance they need, are critical to reaching Project Gutenberg-tm's
goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg-tm collection will
remain freely available for generations to come.  In 2001, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
and permanent future for Project Gutenberg-tm and future generations.
To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation
and how your efforts and donations can help, see Sections 3 and 4
and the Foundation web page at http://www.pglaf.org.


Section 3.  Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive
Foundation

The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non profit
501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the
state of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal
Revenue Service.  The Foundation's EIN or federal tax identification
number is 64-6221541.  Its 501(c)(3) letter is posted at
http://pglaf.org/fundraising.  Contributions to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent
permitted by U.S. federal laws and your state's laws.

The Foundation's principal office is located at 4557 Melan Dr. S.
Fairbanks, AK, 99712., but its volunteers and employees are scattered
throughout numerous locations.  Its business office is located at
809 North 1500 West, Salt Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887, email
business@pglaf.org.  Email contact links and up to date contact
information can be found at the Foundation's web site and official
page at http://pglaf.org

For additional contact information:
     Dr. Gregory B. Newby
     Chief Executive and Director
     gbnewby@pglaf.org


Section 4.  Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation

Project Gutenberg-tm depends upon and cannot survive without wide
spread public support and donations to carry out its mission of
increasing the number of public domain and licensed works that can be
freely distributed in machine readable form accessible by the widest
array of equipment including outdated equipment.  Many small donations
($1 to $5,000) are particularly important to maintaining tax exempt
status with the IRS.

The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
States.  Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a
considerable effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up
with these requirements.  We do not solicit donations in locations
where we have not received written confirmation of compliance.  To
SEND DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any
particular state visit http://pglaf.org

While we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we
have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
against accepting unsolicited donations from donors in such states who
approach us with offers to donate.

International donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make
any statements concerning tax treatment of donations received from
outside the United States.  U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.

Please check the Project Gutenberg Web pages for current donation
methods and addresses.  Donations are accepted in a number of other
ways including checks, online payments and credit card donations.
To donate, please visit: http://pglaf.org/donate


Section 5.  General Information About Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.

Professor Michael S. Hart is the originator of the Project Gutenberg-tm
concept of a library of electronic works that could be freely shared
with anyone.  For thirty years, he produced and distributed Project
Gutenberg-tm eBooks with only a loose network of volunteer support.


Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks are often created from several printed
editions, all of which are confirmed as Public Domain in the U.S.
unless a copyright notice is included.  Thus, we do not necessarily
keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper edition.


Most people start at our Web site which has the main PG search facility:

     http://www.gutenberg.org

This Web site includes information about Project Gutenberg-tm,
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation, how to help produce our new eBooks, and how to
subscribe to our email newsletter to hear about new eBooks.
